Internet Archive	
Web Video Texts Audio Software About Account  TVNews  OpenLibrary
(navigation image)
Home	American Libraries | Canadian Libraries | Universal Library | Community Texts | Project Gutenberg | Children's Library | Biodiversity Heritage Library | Additional Collections
Search:      Find Advanced Search
Anonymous User (login or join us)	Upload
See other formats
Full text of "A passage to India"
A PASSAGE TO INDIA 
PART I: MOSQUE 
CHAPTER I 

Except for the Marabar Caves—and they are twenty m
iles off —the city of Chandrapore presents 
nothing extraordinary. Edged rather than washed by the river Ganges, it trails for a couple 
of miles along the bank, scarcely distinguishable from the rubbish it deposits so freely. There 
are no bathing-steps on the river front, as the Ganges happens not to be holy here; indeed 
there is no river front, and bazaars shut out the wide and shifting panorama of the stream. The 
streets are mean, the temples ineffective, and though a few fine houses exist they are
 hidden 
away in gardens or down alleys whose filth deters all but the invited guest. Chandrapore was 
never large or beautiful, but two hundred years ago it lay on the road between Upper India, 
then imperial, and the sea, and the fine houses date from that period. The zest for decoration 
stopped in the eighteenth century, nor was it ever democratic. There is no painting and scarcely 
any carving in the bazaars. The very wood seems made of mud, the inhabitants of mud moving. 
So abased, so monotonous is 
everything that meets the eye, that when the Ganges comes 
down it might be expected to wash the excrescence back into the soil. Houses do fall, people 
are drowned and left rotting, but the general outline of the town persists, swelling here, shrinking 
there, like some low but indestructible form of life. 

Inland, the prospect alters. There is an oval Maidan, and a long sallow hospital. Houses belonging 
to Furasians stand on the high ground by the railway station. Beyond the railway—which 
runs paral
lel to the river— the land sinks, then rises again rather steeply. On the second rise is 
laid out the little civil station, and viewed hence Chandrapore appears to be a totally different 
place. It is a city of gardens. It is no city, but a forest sparsely scattered with huts. It is a tropical 
pleasaunce washed by a noble river. The toddy palms and neem trees and mangoes and pepul 
that were hidden behind the bazaars now become visible and in their turn hide the bazaars. 
They rise from the gardens whe
re ancient tanks nourish them, they burst out of stifiing purlieus 
and unconsidered temples. Seeking light and air, and endowed with more strength than man or 
his works, they soar above the lower deposit to greet one another with branches and beckoning 
leaves, and to build a city for the birds. Especially after the rains do they screen what passes 
below, but at all times, even when scorched or leafiess, they glorify the city to the English people 
who inhabit the rise, so that new-comers cannot believe
 it to be as meagre as it is described, 
and have to be driven down to acquire disillusionment. As for the civil station itself, it 
provokes no emotion. It charms not; neither does it repel. It is sensibly planned, with a redbrick 
club on its brow, and farther back a grocer's and a cemetery, and the bungalows are disposed 
along roads that intersect at right angles. It has nothing hideous in it, and only the view 
is beautiful; it shares nothing with the city except the overarching sky. 
The sky too has 
its changes, but they are less marked than those of the vegetation and the 
river. Clouds map it tip at times, but it is normally a dome of blending tints, and the main tint 
blue. By day the blue will pale down into white where it touches the white of the land, after 
sunset it has a new circumference— orange, melting upwards into tenderest purple. But the core 
of blue persists, and so it is by night. Then the stars hang like lamps from the immense vault. 
The distance between the vault and them is as 
nothing to the distance behind them, and that 
farther distance, though beyond colour, last freed itself from blue. 

The sky settles everything— not only climates and seasons but when the earth shall be beautiful. 
By herself she can do little— only feeble outbursts of fiowers. But when the sky chooses, 
glory can rain into the Chandrapore bazaars or a benediction pass from horizon to horizon. The 
sky can do this because it is so strong and so enormous. Strength comes from the sun, infused 
in it dai
ly; size from the prostrate earth. No mountains infringe on the curve. League after 
league the earth lies fiat, heaves a little, is fiat again. Only in the south, where a group of fists 
and fingers are thrust up through the soil, is the endless expanse interrupted. These fists and 
fingers are the Marabar Hills, containing the extraordinary caves. 



CHAPTER II 

Abandoning his bicycle, which fell before a servant could catch it, the young man sprang up 

on to the verandah. He was all animation. "Hamid
ullah, Hamidullah! am I late?" he cried. 

"Do not apologize," said his host. "You are always late." 

"Kindly answer my question. Am I late? Has Mahmoud Ali eaten all the food? If so I go 

elsewhere. Mr. Mahmoud Ali, how are you?" 

"Thank you. Dr. Aziz, I am dying." 

"Dying before your dinner? Oh, poor Malimoud Ali!" 

"Hamidullah here is actually dead. He passed away just as you rode up on your bike." 

"Yes, that is so," said the other. "Imagine us both as addressing you from another and a 

happier 
world." 

"Does there happen to be such a thing as a hookah in that happier world of yours?" 

"Aziz, don't chatter. We are having a very sad talk." 

The hookah had been packed too tight, as was usual in his friend's house, and bubbled 

sulkily. He coaxed it. Yielding at last, the tobacco jetted up into his lungs and nostrils, driving 

out the smoke of burning cow dung that had filled them as he rode through the bazaar. It was 

delicious. He lay in a trance, sensuous but healthy, through which the talk
 of the two others did 

not seem particularly sad—they were discussing as to whether or no it is possible to be friends 

with an Englishman. Mahmoud Ali argued that it was not, Hamidullah disagreed, but with so 

many reservations that there was no friction between them. Delicious indeed to lie on the broad 

verandah with the moon rising in front and the servants preparing dinner behind, and no trouble 

happening. 

"Well, look at my own experience this morning." 

"I only contend that it is possible
 in England," replied Hamidullah, who had been to that 

country long ago, before the big rush, and had received a cordial welcome at Cambridge. 

"It is impossible here. Aziz! The red-nosed boy has again insulted me in Court. I do not 

blame him. He was told that he ought to insult me. Until lately he was quite a nice boy, but the 

others have got hold of him." 

"Yes, they have no chance here, that is my point. They come out intending to be gentlemen, 

and are told it will not do. Look at Lesley, look
 at Blakiston, now it is your red-nosed boy, 

and Fielding will go next. Why, I remember when Turton came out first. It was in another part 

of the Province. You fellows will not believe me, but I have driven with Turton in his carriage— 

Turton! Oh yes, we were once quite intimate. He has shown me his stamp collection." 

"He would expect you to steal it now. Turton! But red-nosed boy will be far worse than Turton! " 

"I do not think so. They all become exactly the same, not worse, not better. I giv
e any Englishman 

two years, be he Turton or Burton. It is only the difference of a letter. And I give any 

Englishwoman six months. All are exactly alike. Do you not agree with me?" 

"I do not," replied Mahmoud Ali, entering into the bitter fun, and feeling both pain and 

amusement at each word that was uttered. "For my own part I find such profound differences 

among our rulers. Red-nose mumbles, Turton talks distinctly, Mrs. Turton takes bribes, Mrs. 

Red-nose does not and cannot, because so far t
here is no Mrs. Red-nose." 

"Bribes?" 

"Did you not know that when they were lent to Central India over a Canal Scheme, some 

Rajah or other gave her a sewing machine in solid gold so that the water should run through his 

state?" 

"And does it? 

"No, that is where Mrs. Turton is so skilful. When we poor blacks take bribes, we perform 

what we are bribed to perform, and the law discovers us in consequence. The English take and 

do nothing. I admire them." 

"We all admire them. Aziz, please pass me
 the hookah." 

"Oh, not yet—hookah is so jolly now." 

"You are a very selfish boy." He raised his voice suddenly, and shouted for dinner. Servants 



shouted back that it was ready. They meant that they wished it was ready, and were so understood, 

for nobody moved. Then Hamidullah continued, but with changed manner and evident 

emotion. 

"But take my case—the case of young Hugh Bannister. Here is the son of my dear, my dead 

friends, the Reverend and Mrs. Bannister, whose goodness to me in Engl
and I shall never forget 

or describe. They were father and mother to me, I talked to them as I do now. In the vacations 

their Rectory became my home. They entrusted all their children to me~I often carried little 

Hugh about~I took him up to the Funeral of Queen Victoria, and held him in my arms above the 

crowd." 

"Queen Victoria was different," murmured Mahmoud Ali. 

"I learn now that this boy is in business as a leather merchant at Cawnpore. Imagine how I 

long to see him and to pay his fare th
at this house may be his home. But it is useless. The 

other Anglo-Indians will have got hold of him long ago. He will probably think that I want 

something, 

and I cannot face that from the son of my old friends. Oh, what in this country has gone 

wrong with everything. Vakil Sahib? I ask you." 

Aziz joined in. "Why talk about the English? Brrrr . . . ! Why be either friends with the fellows 

or not friends? Let us shut them out and be jolly. Queen Victoria and Mrs. Bannister were 

the only excepti
ons, and they're dead." 

"No, no, I do not admit that, I have met others." 

"So have I," said Mahmoud Ali, unexpectedly veering. "All ladies are far from alike." Their 

mood was changed, and they recalled little kindnesses and courtesies. "She said 'Thank you so 

much' in the most natural way." "She offered me a lozenge when the dust irritated my throat." 

Hamidullah could remember more important examples of angelic ministration, but the other, 

who only knew Anglo-India, had to ransack his memory fo
r scraps, and it was not surprising 

that he should return to "But of course all this is exceptional. The exception does not prove the 

rule. The average woman is like Mrs. Turton, and, Aziz, you know what she is." Aziz did not 

know, but said he did. He too generalized from his disappointments—it is difficult for members 

of a subject race to do otherwise. Granted the exceptions, he agreed that all Englishwomen are 

haughty and venal. The gleam passed from the conversation, whose wintry surface unr
olled and 

expanded interminably. 

A servant announced dinner. They ignored him. The elder men had reached their eternal 

politics, Aziz drifted into the garden. The trees smelt sweet— green-blossomed champak— and 

scraps of Persian poetry came into his head. Dinner, dinner, dinner . . . but when he returned to 

the house for it, Mahmoud Ali had drifted away in his turn, to speak to his sais. "Come and see 

my wife a little then," said Hamidullah, and they spent twenty minutes behind the purdah. 


Hamidullah 

Begum was a distant aunt of Aziz, and the only female relative he had in Chandrapore, 

and she had much to say to him on this occasion about a family circumcision that had been 

celebrated with imperfect pomp. It was difficult to get away, because until they had had their 

dinner she would not begin hers, and consequently prolonged her remarks in case they should 

suppose she was impatient. Having censured the circumcision, she bethought her of kindred 

topics, and asked Aziz when he wa
s going to be married. 

Respectful but irritated, he answered, "Once is enough." 

"Yes, he has done his duty," said Hamidullah. "Do not tease him so. He carries on his family, 

two boys and their sister." 

"Aunt, they live most comfortably with my wife's mother, where she was living when she 

died. I can see them whenever I like. They are such very, very small children." 

"And he sends them the whole of his salary and lives like a low-grade clerk, and tells no one 

the reason. What more do you requi
re him to do?" 

But this was not Hamidullah Begum's point, and having courteously changed the conversation 

for a few moments she returned and made it. She said, "What is to become of all our 



daughters if men refuse to marry? They will marry beneath them, or--" And she began the ofttold 

tale of a lady of Imperial descent who could find no husband in the narrow circle where her 

pride permitted her to mate, and had lived on unwed, her age now thirty, and would die unwed, 

for no one would have her
 now. While the tale was in progress, it convinced the two men, the 

tragedy seemed a slur on the whole community; better polygamy almost, than that a woman 

should die without the joys God has intended her to receive. Wedlock, motherhood, power in 

the house—for what else is she born, and how can the man who has denied them to her stand 

up to face her creator and his own at the last day? Aziz took his leave saying "Perhaps . . but 

later . . ."--his invariable reply to such an appeal. 

"You mustn
't put off what you think right," said Hamidullah. "That is why India is in such a 

plight, because we put off things." But seeing that his young relative looked worried, he added 

a few soothing words, and thus wiped out any impression that his wife might have made. 

During their absence, Mahmoud All had gone off in his carriage leaving a message that he 

should be back in five minutes, but they were on no account to wait. They sat down to meat 

with a distant cousin of the house, Mohammed Latif, who
 lived on Hamidullah's bounty and who 

occupied the position neither of a servant nor of an equal. He did not speak unless spoken to, 

and since no one spoke kept unoffended silence. Now and then he belched, in compliment to 

the richness of the food. A gentle, happy and dishonest old man; all his life he had never done 

a stroke of work. So long as some one of his relatives had a house he was sure of a home, and 

it was unlikely that so large a family would all go bankrupt. His wife led a similar exi
stence some 

hundreds of miles away —he did not visit her, owing to the expense of the railway ticket. Presently 

Aziz chaffed him, also the servants, and then began quoting poetry, Persian, Urdu, a little 

Arabic. His memory was good, and for so young a man he had read largely; the themes he preferred 

were the decay of Islam and the brevity of Love. They listened delighted, for they took 

the public view of poetry, not the private which obtains in England. It never bored them to hear 

words, word
s; they breathed them with the cool night air, never stopping to analyse; the name 

of the poet, Hafiz, Hali, Iqbal, was sufficient guarantee. India—a hundred Indias— whispered 

outside beneath the indifferent moon, but for the time India seemed one and their own, and 

they regained their departed greatness by hearing its departure lamented, they felt young again 

because reminded that youth must fiy. A servant in scarlet interrupted him; he was the chuprassi 

of the Civil Surgeon, and he handed A
ziz a note. 

"Old Callendar wants to see me at his bungalow," he said, not rising. "He might have the 

politeness to say why." 

"Some case, I daresay." 

"I daresay not, I daresay nothing. He has found out our dinner hour, that's all, and chooses 

to interrupt us every time, in order to show his power." 

"On the one hand he always does this, on the other it may be a serious case, and you cannot 

know," said Hamidullah, considerately paving the way towards obedience. "Had you not 

better clean your t
eeth after pan?" 

"If my teeth are to be cleaned, I don't go at all. I am an Indian, it is an Indian habit to take 

pan. The Civil Surgeon must put up with it. Mohammed Latif, my bike, please." 

The poor relation got up. Slightly immersed in the realms of matter, he laid his hand on the 

bicycle's saddle, while a servant did the actual wheeling. Between them they took it over a tintack. 

Aziz held his hands under the ewer, dried them, fitted on his green felt hat, and then with 

unexpected energy whi
zzed out of Hamidullah's compound. 

"Aziz, Aziz, imprudent boy. ..." But he was far down the bazaar, riding furiously. He had 

neither light nor bell nor had he a brake, but what use are such adjuncts in a land where the 

cyclist's only hope is to coast from face to face, and just before he collides with each it vanishes? 

And the city was fairly empty at this hour. When his tyre went fiat, he leapt off and 

shouted for a tonga. 

He did not at first find one, and he had also to dispose of his bicycle
 at a friend's house. He 

dallied furthermore to clean his teeth. But at last he was rattling towards the civil lines, with a 



vivid sense of speed. As he entered their arid tidiness, depression suddenly seized him. The 

roads, named after victorious generals and intersecting at right angles, were symbolic of the net 

Great Britain had thrown over India. He felt caught in their meshes. When he turned into Major 

Callendar's compound he could with difficulty restrain himself from getting down from th
e tonga 

and approaching the bungalow on foot, and this not because his soul was servile but because 

his feelings—the sensitive edges of him— feared a gross snub. There had been a "case" last 

year—an Indian gentleman had driven up to an official's house and been turned back by the 

servants and been told to approach more suitably— only one case among thousands of visits to 

hundreds of officials, but its fame spread wide. The young man shrank from a repetition of it. 

He compromised, and st
opped the driver just outside the fiood of light that fell across the verandah. 

The Civil Surgeon was out. 

"But the sahib has left me some message?" 

The servant returned an indifferent "No." Aziz was in despair. It was a servant whom he had 

forgotten to tip, and he could do nothing now because there were people in the hall. He was 

convinced that there was a message, and that the man was withholding it out of revenge. While 

they argued, the people came out. Both were ladies. Aziz lifted his hat.
 The first, who was in 

evening dress, glanced at the Indian and turned instinctively away. 

"Mrs. Lesley, it _is_ a tonga," she cried. 

"Ours?" enquired the second, also seeing Aziz, and doing likewise. 

"Take the gifts the gods provide, anyhow," she screeched, and both jumped in. "0 Tonga 

wallah, club, club. Why doesn't the fool go?" 

"Go, I will pay you to-morrow," said Aziz to the driver, and as they went off he called courteously, 

"You are most welcome, ladies." They did not reply, being full
 of their own affairs. 

So it had come, the usual thing— just as Mahmoud Ali said. The inevitable snub— his bow ignored, 

his carriage taken. It might have been worse, for it comforted him somehow that Mesdames 

Callendar and Lesley should both be fat and weigh the tonga down behind. Beautiful 

women would have pained him. He turned to the servant, gave him a couple of rupees, and 

asked again whether there was a message. The man, now very civil, returned the same answer. 

Major Callendar had dri
ven away half an hour before. 

"Saying nothing?" 

He had as a matter of fact said, "Damn Aziz"— words that the servant understood, but was 

too polite to repeat. One can tip too much as well as too little, indeed the coin that buys the 

exact truth has not yet been minted. 

"Then I will write him a letter." 

He was offered the use of the house, but was too dignified to enter it. Paper and ink were 

brought on to the verandah. He began: "Dear Sir,— At your express command I have hastened 

as a s
ubordinate should—" and then stopped. "Tell him I have called, that is sufficient," he said, 

tearing the protest up. "Here is my card. Call me a tonga." 

"Huzoor, all are at the club." 

"Then telephone for one down to the railway station." And since the man hastened to do 

this he said, "Enough, enough, I prefer to walk." He commandeered a match and lit a cigarette. 

These attentions, though purchased, soothed him. They would last as long as he had rupees, 

which is something. But to shake the dus
t of Anglo-India off his feet! To escape from the net 

and be back among manners and gestures that he knew! He began a walk, an unwonted exercise. 

He was an athletic little man, daintily put together, but really very strong. Nevertheless 

walking fatigued him, as it fatigues everyone in India except the new-corner. There is something 

hostile in that soil. It either yields, and the foot sinks into a depression, or else it is unexpectedly 

rigid and sharp, pressing stones or crystals against the tread
. A series of these little surprises 

exhausts; and he was wearing pumps, a poor preparation for any country. At the edge of 

the civil station he turned into a mosque to rest. 

He had always liked this mosque. It was gracious, and the arrangement pleased him. The 

courtyard— entered through a ruined gate— contained an ablution tank of fresh clear water. 



which was always in motion, being indeed part of a conduit that supplied the city. The courtyard 

was paved with broken slabs. The covered pa
rt of the mosque was deeper than is usual; its effect 

was that of an English parish church whose side has been taken out. Where he sat, he 

looked into three arcades whose darkness was illuminated by a small hanging lamp and by the 

moon. The front—in full moonlight—had the appearance of marble, and the ninety-nine names 

of God on the frieze stood out black, as the frieze stood out white against the sky. The contest 

between this dualism and the contention of shadows within pleased Aziz, and he 
tried to symbolize 

the whole into some truth of religion or love. A mosque by winning his approval let loose 

his imagination. The temple of another creed, Hindu, Christian, or Greek, would have bored him 

and failed to awaken his sense of beauty. Here was Islam, his own country, more than a Faith, 

more than a battle-cry, more, much more . . . Islam, an attitude towards life both exquisite and 

durable, where his body and his thoughts found their home. 

His seat was the low wall that bounded the co
urtyard on the left. The ground fell away beneath 

him towards the city, visible as a blur of trees, and in the stillness he heard many small 

sounds. On the right, over in the club, the English community contributed an amateur orchestra. 

Elsewhere some Hindus were drumming— he knew they were Hindus, because the rhythm 

was uncongenial to him,— and others were bewailing a corpse— he knew whose, having certified 

it in the afternoon. There were owls, the Punjab mail . . . and flowers smelt delic
iously in the 

station-master's garden. But the mosque— that alone signified, and he returned to it from the 

complex appeal of the night, and decked it with meanings the builder had never intended. 

Some day he too would build a mosque, smaller than this but in perfect taste, so that all who 

passed by should experience the happiness he felt now. And near it, under a low dome, should 

be his tomb, with a Persian inscription: 

Alas, without me for thousands of years 

The Rose will blossom and the 
Spring will bloom. 

But those who have secretly understood my heart— 

They will approach and visit the grave where I lie. 

He had seen the quatrain on the tomb of a Deccan king, and regarded it as profound 

philosophy— he always held pathos to be profound. The secret understanding of the heart! He 

repeated the phrase with tears in his eyes, and as he did so one of the pillars of the mosque 

seemed to quiver. It swayed in the gloom and detached itself Belief in ghosts ran in his blood, 

but he s
at firm. Another pillar moved, a third, and then an Englishwoman stepped out into the 

moonlight. Suddenly he was furiously angry and shouted: "Madam! Madam! Madam!" 

"Oh! Oh!" the woman gasped. 

"Madam, this is a mosque, you have no right here at all; you should have taken off your 

shoes; this is a holy place for Moslems." 

"I have taken them off" 

"You have?" 

"I left them at the entrance." 

"Then I ask your pardon." 

Still startled, the woman moved out, keeping the ablution-tank between them. 
He called 

after her, "I am truly sorry for speaking." 

"Yes, I was right, was I not? If I remove my shoes, I am allowed?" 

"Of course, but so few ladies take the trouble, especially if thinking no one is there to see." 

"That makes no difference. God is here." 

"Madam!" 

"Please let me go." 

"Oh, can I do you some service now or at any time?" 

"No, thank you, really none— good night. " 

"May I know your name?" 

She was now in the shadow of the gateway, so that he could not see her face, but sh
e saw 

his, and she said with a change of voice, "Mrs. Moore." 



"Mrs. ~" Advancing, he found that she was old. A fabric bigger than the mosque fell to 

pieces, and he did not know whether he was glad or sorry. She was older than Hamidullah Begum, 

with a red face and white hair. Her voice had deceived him. 

"Mrs. Moore, I am afraid I startled you. I shall tell my community—our friends—about you. 

That God is here-very good, very fine indeed. I think you are newly arrived in India." 

"Yes— ho
w did you know?" 

"By the way you address me. No, but can I call you a carriage?" 

"I have only come from the club. They are doing a play that I have seen in London, and it 

was so hot. " 

"What was the name of the play?" 

"Cousin Kate." 

"I think you ought not to walk at night alone, Mrs. Moore. There are bad characters about 

and leopards may come across from the Marabar Hills. Snakes also." 

She exclaimed; she had forgotten the snakes. 

"For example, a six-spot beetle," he continued. "You pick 
it up, it bites, you die." 

"But you walk about yourself" 

"Oh, I am used to it." 

"Used to snakes?" 

They both laughed. "I'm a doctor," he said. "Snakes don't dare bite me." They sat down side 

by side in the entrance, and slipped on their evening shoes. "Please may I ask you a question 

now? Why do you come to India at this time of year, just as the cold weather is ending?" 

"I intended to start earlier, but there was an unavoidable delay." 

"It will soon be so unhealthy for you! And why ever do 
you come to Chandrapore?" 

"To visit my son. He is the City Magistrate here." 

"Oh no, excuse me, that is quite impossible. Our City Magistrate's name is Mr. Heaslop. I 

know him intimately." 

"He's my son all the same," she said, smiling. 

"But, Mrs. Moore, how can he be?" 

"I was married twice." 

"Yes, now I see, and your first husband died." 

"He did, and so did my second husband." 

"Then we are in the same box," he said cryptically. "Then is the City Magistrate the entire of 

your family now?
" 

"No, there are the younger ones— Ralph and Stella in England." 

"And the gentleman here, is he Ralph and Stella's half-brother?" 

"Quite right." 

"Mrs. Moore, this is all extremely strange, because like yourself I have also two sons and a 

daughter. Is not this the same box with a vengeance?" 

"What are their names? Not also Ronny, Ralph, and Stella, surely?" 

The suggestion delighted him. "No, indeed. How funny it sounds! Their names are quite different 

and will surprise you. Listen, please.
 I am about to tell you my children's names. The first 

is called Ahmed, the second is called Karim, the third— she is the eldest— Jamila. Three children 

are enough. Do not you agree with me?" 

"I do." 

They were both silent for a little, thinking of their respective families. She sighed and rose to 

go. 

"Would you care to see over the Minto Hospital one morning?" he enquired. "I have nothing 

else to offer at Chandrapore." 

"Thank you, I have seen it already, or I should have liked to come w
ith you very much." 

"I suppose the Civil Surgeon took you." 

"Yes, and Mrs. Callendar." 

His voice altered. "Ah! Avery charming lady." 



"Possibly, when one knows her better." 
"What? What? You didn't like her?" 

"She was certainly intending to be kind, but I did not find her exactly charming." 
He burst out with: "She has just taken my tonga without my permission—do you call that 
being charming?~and Major Callendar interrupts me night after night from where I am dining 
with my friends and I go 
at once, breaking tip a most pleasant entertainment, and he is not 
there and not even a message. Is this charming, pray? But what does it matter? I can do nothing 
and he knows it. I am just a subordinate, my time is of no value, the verandah is good 
enough for an Indian, yes, yes, let him stand, and Mrs. Callendar takes my carriage and cuts 
me dead ..." 
She listened. 

He was excited partly by his wrongs, but much more by the knowledge that someone sympathized 
with them. It was this that led him to r
epeat, exaggerate, contradict. She had proved 
her sympathy by criticizing her fell owcountry woman to him, but even earlier he had known. The 
flame that not even beauty can nourish was springing up, and though his words were querulous 
his heart began to glow secretly. Presently it burst into speech. 
"You understand me, you know what others feel. Oh, if others resembled you! " 
Rather surprised, she replied: "I don't think 1 understand people very well. I only know 
whether I like or dislike them." 
"Th
en you are an Oriental." 

She accepted his escort back to the club, and said at the gate that she wished she was a 
member, so that she could have asked him in. 

"Indians are not allowed into the Chandrapore Club even as guests," he said simply. He did 
not expatiate on his wrongs now, being happy. As he strolled downhill beneath the lovely moon, 
and again saw the lovely mosque, he seemed to own the land as much as anyone owned it. 
What did it matter if a few flabby Hindus had preceded him there, and a
 few chilly English 
succeeded? 
CHAPTER III 

The third act of Cousin Kate_ was well advanced by the time Mrs. Moore re-entered the 
club. Windows were barred, lest the servants should see their mem-sahibs acting, and the heat 
was consequently immense. One electric fan revolved like a wounded bird, another was out of 
order. Disinclined to return to tile audience, she went into the billiard room, where she was 
greeted by "I want to see the _real_ India," and her appropriate life came back with a rush. 

This was Adela Quested, the queer, cautious girl whom Ronny had commissioned her to bring 
from England, and Ronny was her son, also cautious, whom Miss Quested would probably 
though not certainly marry, and she herself was an elderly lady. 

"I want to see it too, and I only wish we could. Apparently the Turtons will arrange something 
for next Tuesday." 

"It'll end in an elephant ride, it always does. Look at this evening. Cousin Kate!_ Imagine, 
Cousin Kate!_ But where have you been off to? Did you su
cceed in catching the moon in the 
Ganges?" 

The two ladies had happened, the night before, to see the moon's reflection in a distant 
channel of the stream. The water had drawn it out, so that it had seemed larger than the real 
moon, and brighter, which had pleased them. 
"I went to the mosque, but I did not catch the moon." 
"The angle would have altered—she rises later." 

"Later and later," yawned Mrs. Moore, who was tired after her walk. "Let me think— we don't 
see the other side of the moon ou
t here, no." 

"Come, India's not as bad as all that," said a pleasant voice. "Other side of the earth, if you 
like, but we stick to the same old moon." Neither of them knew the speaker nor did they ever 
see him again. He passed with his friendly word through red-brick pillars into the darkness. 
"We aren't even seeing the other side of the world; that's our complaint," said Adela. Mrs. 



Moore agreed; she too was disappointed at the dullness of their new life. They had made such 

a romantic voyage ac
ross the Mediterranean and through the sands of Egypt to the harbour of 

Bombay, to find only a gridiron of bungalows at the end of it. But she did not take the 

disappointment 

as seriously as Miss Quested, for the reason that she was forty years older, and had 

learnt that Life never gives us what we want at the moment that we consider appropriate. 

Adventures 

do occur, but not punctually. She said again that she hoped that something interesting 

would be arranged for next Tuesday. 

"Have a drin
k," said another pleasant voice. "Mrs. Moore—Miss Quested—have a drink, have 

two drinks." They knew who it was this time— the Collector, Mr. Turton, with whom they had 

dined. Like themselves, he had found the atmosphere of Cousin Kate_ too hot. Ronny, he told 

them, was stage-managing in place of Major Callendar, whom some native subordinate or other 

had let down, and doing it very well; then he turned to Ronny's other merits, and in quiet, decisive 

tones said much that was fiattering. It wa
sn't that the young man was particularly good at 

the games or the lingo, or that he had much notion of the Law, but— apparently a large but— 

Ronny was dignified. 

Mrs. Moore was surprised to learn this, dignity not being a quality with which any mother 

credits her son. Miss Quested learnt it with anxiety, for she had not decided whether she liked 

dignified men. She tried indeed to discuss this point with Mr. Turton, but he silenced her with a 

good-humoured motion of his hand, and continued w
hat he had come to say. "The long and the 

short of it is Heaslop's a sahib; he's the type we want, he's one of us," and another civilian who 

was leaning over the billiard table said, " Hear, hear! " The matter was thus placed beyond 

doubt, and the Collector passed on, for other duties called him. 

Meanwhile the performance ended, and the amateur orchestra played the National Anthem. 

Conversation and billiards stopped, faces stiffened. It was the Anthem of the Army of Occupation. 

it reminded ever
y member of the club that he or she was British and in exile. It produced a 

little sentiment and a useful accession of willpower. The meagre tune, the curt series of demands 

on Jehovah, fused into a prayer unknown in England, and though they perceived neither 

Royalty nor Deity they did perceive something, they were strengthened to resist another day. 

Then they poured out, offering one another drinks. 

"Adela, have a drink; mother, a drink." 

They refused— they were weary of drinks— and Miss Q
uested, who always said exactly what 

was in her mind, announced anew that she was desirous of seeing the real India. 

Ronny was in high spirits. The request struck him as comic, and he called out to another 

passer-by: "Fielding! how's one to see the real India?" 

"Try seeing Indians," the man answered, and vanished. 

"Who was that?" 

"Our schoolmaster— Government College." 

"As if one could avoid seeing them," sighed Mrs. Lesley. 

"I've avoided," said Miss Quested. "Excepting my own servant, I'
ve scarcely spoken to an 

Indian since landing." 

"Oh, lucky you." 

"But I want to see them." 

She became the centre of an amused group of ladies. One said, "Wanting to see Indians! 

How new that sounds!" Another, "Natives! why, fancy!" A third, more serious, said, "Let me 

explain. 

Natives don't respect one any the more after meeting one, you see." 

"That occurs after so many meetings." 

But the lady, entirely stupid and friendly, continued: "What I mean is, I was a nurse before 

my marriage, a
nd came across them a great deal, so I know. I really do know the truth about 

Indians. A most unsuitable position for any Englishwoman— I was a nurse in a Native State. 



One's only hope was to hold sternly aloof." 

"Even from one's patients?" 

"Why, the kindest thing one can do to a native is to let him die," said Mrs. Callendar. 

"How if he went to heaven? "asked Mrs. Moore, with a gentle but crooked smile. 

"He can go where he likes as long as he doesn't come near me. They give me the creeps."
 

"As a matter of fact I have thought what you were saying about heaven, and that is why I 

am against Missionaries," said the lady who had been a nurse. "I am all for Chaplains, but all 

against Missionaries. Let me explain." 

But before she could do so, the Collector intervened. 

"Do you really want to meet the Aryan Brother, Miss Quested? That can be easily fixed up. I 

didn't realize he'd amuse you." He thought a moment. "You can practically see any type you 

like. Take your choice. I know the G
overnment people and the landowners, Heaslop here can 

get hold of the barrister crew, while if you want to specialize on education, we can come down 

on Fielding." 

"I'm tired of seeing picturesque figures pass before me as a frieze," the girl explained. "It 

was wonderful when we landed, but that superficial glamour soon goes." 

Her impressions were of no interest to the Collector; he was only concerned to give her a 

good time. Would she like a Bridge Party? He explained to her what that was—not
 the game, 

but a party to bridge the gulf between East and West; the expression was his own invention, 

and amused all who heard it. 

"I only want those Indians whom you come across socially—as your friends." 

"Well, we don't come across them socially," he said, laughing. "They're full of all the virtues, 

but we don't, and it's now eleven-thirty, and too late to go into the reasons." 

"Miss Quested, what a name! " remarked Mrs. Turton to her husband as they drove away. 

She had not taken to the 
new young lady, thinking her ungracious and cranky. She trusted that 

she hadn't been brought out to marry nice little Heaslop, though it looked like it. Her husband 

agreed with her in his heart, but he never spoke against an Englishwoman if he could avoid doing 

so, and he only said that Miss Quested naturally made mistakes. He added: "India does 

wonders for the judgment, especially during the hot weather; it has even done wonders for 

Fielding." Mrs. Turton closed her eyes at this name and remarke
d that Mr. Fielding wasn't 

pukka, and had better marry Miss Quested, for she wasn't pukka. Then they reached their bungalow, 

low and enormous, the oldest and most uncomfortable bungalow in the civil station, with 

a sunk soup plate of a lawn, and they had one drink more, this time of barley water, and went 

to bed. Their withdrawal from the club had broken up the evening, which, like all gatherings, 

had an official tinge. A community that bows the knee to a Viceroy and believes that the divinity 


that hedges a king can be transplanted, must feel some reverence for any viceregal substitute. 

At Chandrapore the Turtons were little gods; soon they would retire to some suburban villa, and 

die exiled from glory. 

"It's decent of the Burra Sahib," chattered Ronny, much gratified at the civility that had been 

shown to his guests. "Do you know he's never given a Bridge Party before? Coming on top of 

the dinner too! I wish I could have arranged something myself, but when you know the natives 

bette
r you'll realize it's easier for the Burra Sahib than for me. They know him— they know be 

can't be fooled— I'm still fresh comparatively. No one can even begin to think of knowing this 

country until he has been in it twehty years.— Hullo, the mater! Here's your cloak.— Well: for an 

example of the mistakes one makes. Soon after I came out I asked one of the Pleaders to have 

a smoke with me-only a cigarette, mind. I found afterwards that he had sent touts all over the 

bazaar to announce the
 fact— told all the litigants, 'Oh, you'd better come to my Vakil Mahmoud 

Ali— he's in with the City Magistrate.' Ever since then I've dropped on him in Court as hard as I 

could. It's taught me a lesson, and I hope him." 

"Isn't the lesson that you should invite all the Pleaders to have a smoke with you?" 

"Perhaps, but time's limited and the flesh weak. I prefer my smoke at the club amongst my 

own sort, I'm afraid." 



"Why not ask the Pleaders to the club?" Miss Quested persisted. 

"Not all
owed." He was pleasant and patient, and evidently understood why she did not understand. 

He implied that he had once been as she, though not for long. Going to the verandah, 

he called firmly to the moon. His sais answered, and without lowering his head, he ordered his 

trap to be brought round. 

Mrs. Moore, whom the club had stupefied, woke up outside. She watched the moon, whose 

radiance stained with primrose the purple of the surrounding sky. In England the moon had 

seemed dead and alien; here 
she was caught in the shawl of night together with earth and all 

the other stars. A sudden sense of unity, of kinship with the heavenly bodies, passed into the 

old woman and out, like water through a tank, leaving a strange freshness behind. She did not 

dislike Cousin Kate_ or the National Anthem, but their note had died into a new one, just as 

cocktails and cigars had died into invisible flowers. When the mosque, long and domeless, 

gleamed at the turn of the road, she exclaimed, "Oh, yes—that'
s where I got to—that's where 

I've been." 

"Been there when?" asked her son. 

"Between the acts." 

"But, mother, you can't do that sort of thing." 

"Can't mother?" she replied. 

"No, really not in this country. It's not done. There's the danger from snakes for one thing. 

They are apt to lie out in the evening." 

"Ah yes, so the young man there said." 

"This sounds very romantic," said Miss Quested, who was exceedingly fond of Mrs. Moore, 

and was glad she should have had this little escapade.
 "You meet a young man in a mosque, 

and then never let me know! " 

"I was going to tell you, Adela, but something changed the conversation and I forgot. My 

memory grows deplorable." 

"Was he nice?" 

She paused, then said emphatically: "Very nice." 

"Who was he?" Ronny enquired. 

"A doctor. I don't know his name." 

"A doctor? I know of no young doctor in Chandrapore. How odd! What was he like?" 

"Rather small, with a little moustache and quick eyes. He called out to me when I was in the 

dark pa
rt of the mosque— about my shoes. That was how we began talking. He was afraid I had 

them on, but I remembered luckily. He told me about his children, and then we walked back to 

the club. He knows you well." 

"I wish you had pointed him out to me. I can't make out who he is." 

"He didn't come into the club. He said he wasn't allowed to." 

Thereupon the truth struck him, and he cried, "Oh, good gracious! Not a Mohammedan? 

Why ever didn't you tell me you'd been talking to a native? I was going all
 wrong." 

"A Mohammedan! How perfectly magnificent!" exclaimed Miss Quested. "Ronny, isn't that 

like your mother? While we talk about seeing the real India, she goes and sees it, and then forgets 

she's seen it." 

But Ronny was ruffled. From his mother's description he had thought the doctor might be 

young Muggins from over the Ganges, and had brought out all the comradely emotions. What a 

mix-up! Why hadn't she indicated by the tone of her voice that she was talking about an Indian? 

Scratchy an
d dictatorial, he began to question her. "He called to you in the mosque, did 

he? How? Impudently? What was he doing there himself at that time of night?— No, it's not their 

prayer time."— This in answer to a suggestion of Miss Quested's, who showed the keenest interest. 

"So he called to you over your shoes. Then it was impudence. It's an old trick. I wish you 

had had them on." 

"I think it was impudence, but I don't know about a trick," said Mrs. Moore. "His nerves 

were all on edge— I cou
ld tell from his voice. As soon as I answered he altered." 



"You oughtn't to have answered." 

"Now look here," said the logical girl, "wouldn't you expect a Mohammedan to answer if you 

asked him to take off his hat in church?" 

"It's different, it's different; you don't understand." 

"I know I don't, and I want to. What is the difference, please?" 

He wished she wouldn't interfere. His mother did not signify—she was just a globe-trotter, a 

temporary escort, who could retire to England with wha
t impressions she chose. But Adela, who 

meditated spending her life in the country, was a more serious matter; it would be tiresome if 

she started crooked over the native question. Pulling up the mare, he said, "There's your 

Ganges." 

Their attention was diverted. Below them a radiance had suddenly appeared. It belonged 

neither to water nor moonlight, but stood like a luminous sheaf upon the fields of darkness. He 

told them that it was where the new sand-bank was forming, and that the dark ravel
led bit at 

the top was the sand, and that the dead bodies floated down that way from Benares, or would 

if the crocodiles let them. "It's not much of a dead body that gets down to Chandrapore." 

"Crocodiles down in it too, how terrible!" his mother murmured. The young people glanced 

at each other and smiled; it amused them when the old lady got these gentle creeps, and harmony 

was restored between them consequently. She continued: "What a terrible river! what a 

wonderful river! "and sighed. The r
adiance was already altering, whether through shifting of the 

moon or of the sand; soon the bright sheaf would be gone, and a circlet, itself to alter, be burnished 

upon the streaming void. The women discussed whether they would wait for the change 

or not, while the silence broke into patches of unquietness and the mare shivered. On her account 

they did not wait, but drove on to the City Magistrate's bungalow, where Miss Quested 

went to bed, and Mrs. Moore had a short interview with her son. 

He
 wanted to enquire about the Mohammedan doctor in the mosque. It was his duty to report 

suspicious characters and conceivably it was some disreputable hakirn who had prowled up 

from the bazaar. When she told him that it was someone connected with the Minto Hospital, he 

was relieved, and said that the fellow's name must be Aziz, and that he was quite all right, 

nothing against him at all. 

"Aziz! what a charming name!" 

"So you and he had a talk. Did you gather he was well disposed?" 

Ignorant of
 the force of this question, she replied, "Yes, quite, after the first moment." 

"I meant, generally. Did he seem to tolerate us~the brutal conqueror, the sundried bureaucrat, 

that sort of thing?" 

"Oh, yes, I think so, except the Callendars~he doesn't care for the Callendars at all." 

"Oh. So he told you that, did he? The Major will be interested. I wonder what was the aim 

of the remark." 

"Ronny, Ronny! you're never going to pass it on to Major Callendar?" 

"Yes, rather. I must, in fact!" 

"But
, my dear boy--" 

"If the Major heard I was disliked by any native subordinate of mine, I should expect him to 

pass it on tome." 

"But, my dear boy~a private conversation!" 

"Nothing's private in India. Aziz knew that when he spoke out, so don't you worry. He had 

some motive in what he said. My personal belief is that the remark wasn't true." 

"How not true?" 

"He abused the Major in order to impress you." 

"I don't know what you mean, dear." 

"It's the educated native's latest dodge. They used 
to cringe, but the younger generation 

believe in a show of manly independence. They think it will pay better with the itinerant M.P. 

But whether the native swaggers or cringes, there's always something behind every remark he 

makes, always something, and if nothing else he's trying to increase his izzat~in plain knglo- 



Saxon, to score. Of course there are exceptions." 

"You never used to judge people like this at home." 

"India isn't home," he retorted, rather rudely, but in order to silence her
 he had been using 

phrases and arguments that he had picked up from older officials, and he did not feel quite sure 

of himself When he said "of course there are exceptions" he was quoting Mr. Turton, while " 

increasing the izzat" was Major Callendar's own. The phrases worked and were in current use at 

the club, but she was rather clever at detecting the first from the second hand, and might press 

him for definite examples. 

She only said, "I can't deny that what you say sounds very sensible, but
 you really must not 

hand on to Major Callendar anything I have told you about Doctor Aziz." 

He felt disloyal to his caste, but he promised, adding, "In return please don't talk about Aziz 

to Adela." 

"Not talk about him? Why?" 

"There you go again, mother~I really can't explain every thing. I don't want Adela to be 

worried, that's the fact; she'll begin wondering whether we treat the natives properly, and all 

that sort of nonsense." 

"But she came out to be worried—that's exactly why she's 
here. She discussed it all on the 

boat. We had a long talk when we went on shore at Aden. She knows you in play, as she put it, 

but not in work, and she felt she must come and look round, before she decided—and before 

you decided. She is very, very fair-minded." 

"I know," he said dejectedly. 

The note of anxiety in his voice made her feel that he was still a little boy, who must have 

what he liked, so she promised to do as he wished, and they kissed good night. He had not 

forbidden 

her to 
think about Aziz, however, and she did this when she retired to her room. In the 

light of her son's comment she reconsidered the scene at the mosque, to see whose impression 

was correct. Yes, it could be worked into quite an unpleasant scene. The doctor had begun by 

bullying her, had said Mrs. Callendar was nice, and then— finding the ground safe— had changed; 

he had alternately whined over his grievances and patronized her, had run a dozen ways in a 

single sentence, had been unreliable, inqu
isitive, vain. Yes, it was all true, but how false as a 

summary of the man; the essential life of him had been slain. 

Going to hang up her cloak, she found that the tip of the peg was occupied by a small wasp. 

She had known this wasp or his relatives by day; they were not as English wasps, but had long 

yellow legs which hung down behind when they flew. Perhaps he mistook the peg for a 

branch— no Indian animal has any sense of an interior. Bats, rats, birds, insects will as soon nest 

inside a 
house as out; it is to them a normal growth of the eternal jungle, which alternately 

produces houses trees, houses trees. There he clung, asleep, while jackals in the plain bayed 

their desires and mingled with the percussion of drums. 

"Pretty dear," said Mrs. Moore to the wasp. He did not wake, but her voice floated out, to 

swell the night's uneasiness. 

CHAPTER IV 

The Collector kept his word. Next day he issued invitation cards to numerous Indian gentlemen 

in the neighbourhood, stating that h
e would be at home in the garden of the club between 

the hours of five and seven on the following Tuesday, also that Mrs. Turton would be glad 

to receive any ladies of their families who were out of purdah. His action caused much excitement 

and was discussed in several worlds. 

"It is owing to orders from the L.G.," was Mahmoud All's explanation. "Turton would never 

do this unless compelled. Those high officials are different— they sympathize, the Viceroy 

sympathizes, 

they would have us trea
ted properly. But they come too seldom and live too far away. 

Meanwhile—" 

"It is easy to sympathize at a distance," said an old gentleman with a beard. "I value more 



the kind word that is spoken close to my ear. Mr. Turton has spoken it, from whatever cause. He 

speaks, we hear. I do not see why we need discuss it further." Quotations followed from the Koran. 

"We have not all your sweet nature, Nawab Bahadur, nor your learning." 

"The Lieutenant-Governor may be my very good friend, but I give
 him no trouble. —How do 

you do, Nawab Bahadur? —Quite well, thank you. Sir Gilbert; how are you?~And all is over. But I 

can be a thorn in Mr. Turton's flesh, and if he asks me I accept the invitation. I shall come in 

from Dilkusha specially, though I have to postpone other business." 

"You will make yourself chip," suddenly said a little black man. 

There was a stir of disapproval. Who was this ill-bred upstart, that he should criticize the 

leading Mohammedan landowner of the district? Mahmo
ud Ali, though sharing his opinion, felt 

bound to oppose it. "Mr. Ram Chand!" he said, swaying forward stiffly with his hands on his 

hips. 

"Mr. Mahmoud Ali!" 

"Mr. Ram Chand, the Nawab Bahadur can decide what is cheap without our valuation, I 

think." 

"I do not expect I shall make myself cheap," said the Nawab Bahadur to Mr. Ram Chand, 

speaking very pleasantly, for he was aware that the man had been impolite and he desired to 

shield him from the consequences. It had passed through his mind to
 reply, "I expect I shall 

make myself cheap," but he rejected this as the less courteous alternative. "I do not see why 

we should make ourselves cheap. I do not see why we should. The invitation is worded very 

graciously." Feeling that he could not further decrease the social gulf between himself and his 

auditors, he sent his elegant grandson, who was in attendance on him, to fetch his car. When it 

came, he repeated all that he had said before, though at greater length, ending up with "Till 

Tue
sday, then, gentlemen all, when I hope we may meet in the flower gardens of the club." 

This opinion carried great weight. The Nawab Bahadur was a big proprietor and a philanthropist, 

a man of benevolence and decision. His character among all the communities in the 

province stood high. He was a straightforward enemy and a staunch friend, and his hospitality 

was proverbial. "Give, do not lend; after death who will thank you?" was his favourite remark. 

He held it a disgrace to die rich. When such a 
man was prepared to motor twenty-five miles to 

shake the Collector's hand, the entertainment took another aspect. For he was not like some 

eminent men, who give out that they will come, and then fail at the last moment, leaving the 

small fry floundering. If he said he would come, he would come, he would never deceive his 

supporters. The gentlemen whom he had lectured now urged one another to attend the party, 

although convinced at heart that his advice was unsound. 

He had spoken in the little r
oom near the Courts where the pleaders waited for clients; clients, 

waiting for pleaders, sat in the dust outside. These had not received a card from Mr. Turton. 

And there were circles even beyond these—people who wore nothing but a loincloth, people 

who wore not even that, and spent their lives in knocking two sticks together before a scarlet 

doll— humanity grading and drifting beyond the educated vision, until no earthly invitation 

can embrace it. 

All invitations must proceed from heaven 
perhaps; perhaps it is futile for men to initiate 

their own unity, they do but widen the gulfs between them by the attempt. So at all events 

thought old Mr. Graysford and young Mr. Sorley, the devoted missionaries who lived out beyond 

the slaughterhouses, always travelled third on the railways, and never came up to the club. In 

our Father's house are many mansions, they taught, and there alone will the incompatible multitudes 

of mankind be welcomed and soothed. Not one shall be turned away by the
 servants on 

that verandah, be he black or white, not one shall be kept standing who approaches with a loving 

heart. And why should the divine hospitality cease here? Consider, with all reverence, the 

monkeys. May there not be a mansion for the monkeys also? Old Mr. Graysford said No, but 

young Mr. Sorley, who was advanced, said Yes; he saw no reason why monkeys should not have 

their collateral share of bliss, and he had sympathetic discussions about them with his Hindu 

friends. And the jackals
? Jackals were indeed less to Mr. Sorley's mind, but he admitted that the 



mercy of God, being infinite, may well embrace all mammals. And the wasps? He became uneasy 

during the descent to wasps, and was apt to change the conversation. And oranges, cactuses, 

crystals and mud? and the bacteria inside Mr. Sorley? No, no, this is going too far. We 

must exclude someone from our gathering, or we shall be left with nothing. 

CHAPTER V 

The Bridge Party was not a success—at least it was not what Mrs.
 Moore and Miss Quested 

were accustomed to consider a successful party. They arrived early, since it was given in their 

honour, but most of the Indian guests had arrived even earlier, and stood massed at the farther 

side of the tennis lawns, doing nothing. 

"It is only just five," said Mrs. Turton. "My husband will be up from his office in a moment 

and start the thing. I have no idea what we have to do. It's the first time we've ever given a 

party like this at the club. Mr. Heaslop, when I'm dea
d and gone will you give parties like this? 

It's enough to make the old type of Burra Sahib turn in his grave." 

Ronny laughed deferentially. "You wanted something not picturesque and we've provided it," 

he remarked to Miss Quested. "What do you think of the Aryan Brother in a topi and spats?" 

Neither she nor his mother answered. They were gazing rather sadly over the tennis lawn. 

No, it was not picturesque; the East, abandoning its secular magnificence, was descending into 

a valley whose farthe
r side no man can see. 

"The great point to remember is that no one who's here matters; those who matter don't 

come. Isn't that so, Mrs. Turton?" 

"Absolutely true," said the great lady, leaning back. She was "saving herself up," as she 

called it—not for anything that would happen that afternoon or even that week, but for some 

vague future occasion when a high official might come along and tax her social strength. Most 

of her public appearances were marked by this air of reserve. 

Assured of h
er approbation, Ronny continued: "The educated Indians will be no good to us 

if there's a row, it's simply not worth while conciliating them, that's why they don't matter. Most 

of the people you see are seditious at heart, and the rest 'Id run squealing. The cultivator— he's 

another story. The Pathan— he's a man if you like. But these people— don't imagine they're India." 

He pointed to the dusky line beyond the court, and here and there it flashed a pince-nez 

or shuffled a shoe, as if aware
 that he was despising it. European costume had lighted like a 

leprosy. Few had yielded entirely, but none were untouched. There was a silence when he had 

finished speaking, on both sides of the court; at least, more ladies joined the English group, but 

their words seemed to die as soon as uttered. Some kites hovered overhead, impartial, over the 

kites passed the mass of a vulture, and with an impartiality exceeding all, the sky, not deeply 

coloured but translucent, poured light from its whole ci
rcumference. It seemed unlikely that the 

series stopped here. Beyond the sky must not there be something that overarches all the skies, 

more impartial even than they? Beyond which again . . . 

They spoke of Cousin Kate_. 

They had tried to reproduce their own attitude to life upon the stage, and to dress up as the 

middle-class English people they actually were. Next year they would do Quality Street_ or 

The Yeomen of the Guard_. Save for this annual incursion, they left literature alone. The men 

had no time for it, the women did nothing that they could not share with the men. Their ignorance 
of the Arts was notable, and they lost no opportunity of proclaiming it to one another; it 
was the Public School attitude; flourishing more vigorously than it can yet hope to do in England. 
If Indians were shop, the Arts were bad form, and Ronny had repressed his mother when 
she enquired after his viola; a viola was almost a demerit, and certainly not the sort of instrument 
one mentioned in public. She n
oticed now how tolerant and conventional his judgments 
had become; when they had seen Cousin Kate_ in London together in the past, he had 
scorned it; now he pretended that it was a good play, in order to hurt nobody's feelings. An 
"unkind notice" had appeared in the local paper, "the sort of thing no white man could have 
written," as Mrs. Lesley said. The play was praised, to be sure, and so were the stage management 
and the performance as a whole, but the notice contained the following sentence: "Mis
s 



Derek, though she charmingly looked her part, lacked the necessary experience, and occasionally 

forgot her words." This tiny breath of genuine criticism had given deep offence, not indeed 

to Miss Derek, who was as hard as nails, but to her friends. Miss Derek did not belong to 

Chandrapore. She was stopping for a fortnight with the McBrydes, the police people, and she 

had been so good as to fill up a gap in the cast at the last moment. A nice impression of local 

hospitality she would carry a
way with here 

"To work, Mary, to work," cried the Collector, touching his wife on the shoulder with a 

switch. 

Mrs. Turton got up awkwardly. "What do you want me to do? Oh, those purdah women! I 

never thought any would come. Oh dear! " 

A little group of Indian ladies had been gathering in a third quarter of the grounds, near a 

rustic summer-house in which the more timid of them had already taken refuge. The rest stood 

with their backs to the company and their faces pressed into a bank of shrub
s. At a little distance 

stood their male relatives, watching the venture. The sight was significant: an island 

bared by the turning tide, and bound to grow. 

"I consider they ought to come over to me." 

"Come along, Mary, get it over." 

"I refuse to shake hands with any of the men, unless it has to be the Nawab Bahadur." 

"Whom have we so far?" He glanced along the line. "H'm! h'm! much as one expected. We 

know why he's here, I think—over that contract, and he wants to get the right side of me 
for 

Mohurram, and he's the astrologer who wants to dodge the municipal building regulations, and 

he's that Parsi, and he's—Hullo! there he goes— smash into our hollyhocks. Pulled the left rein 

when he meant the right. All as usual." 

"They ought never to have been allowed to drive in; it's so bad for them," said Mrs. Turton, 

who had at last begun her progress to the summer-house, accompanied by Mrs. Moore, Miss 

Quested, and a terrier. "Why they come at all I don't know. They hate it as much 
as we do. Talk 

to Mrs. McBryde. Her husband made her give purdah parties until she struck." 

"This isn't a purdah party," corrected Miss Quested. 

"Oh, really," was the haughty rejoinder. 

"Do kindly tell us who these ladies are," asked Mrs. Moore. 

"You're superior to them, anyway. Don't forget that. You're superior to everyone in India except 

one or two of the Ranis, and they're on an equality." 

Advancing, she shook hands with the group and said a few words of welcome in Urdu. She 

had learnt 
the lingo, but only to speak to her servants, so she knew none of the politer forms 

and of the verbs only the imperative mood. As soon as her speech was over, she enquired of 

her companions, "Is that what you wanted?" 

"Please tell these ladies that I wish we could speak their language, but we have only just 

come to their country." 

"Perhaps we speak yours a little," one of the ladies said. 

"Why, fancy, she understands!" said Mrs. Turton. 

"Eastbourne, Piccadilly, High Park Corner," said another
 of the ladies. 

"Oh yes, they're English-speaking." 

"But now we can talk: how delightful! " cried Adela, her face lighting up. 

"She knows Paris also," called one of the onlookers. 

"They pass Paris on the way, no doubt," said Mrs. Turton, as if she was describing the 

movements of migratory birds. Her manner had grown more distant since she had discovered 

that some of the group was Westernized, and might apply her own standards to her. 

"The shorter lady, she is my wife, she is Mrs. Bhattacharya
," the onlooker explained. "The 

taller lady, she is my sister, she is Mrs. Das." 

The shorter and the taller ladies both adjusted their saris, and smiled. There was a curious 

uncertainty about their gestures, as if they sought for a new formula which neither East nor 

West could provide. When Mrs. Bhattacharya' s husband spoke, she turned away from him, but 



she did not mind seeing the other men. Indeed all the ladies were uncertain, cowering, recovering, 

giggling, making tiny gestures of atonem
ent or despair at all that was said, and alternately 

fondling the terrier or shrinking from him. Miss Quested now had her desired opportunity; 

friendly Indians were before her, and she tried to make them talk, but she failed, she strove in 

vain against the echoing walls of their civility. Whatever she said produced a murmur of 

deprecation, 

varying into a murmur of concern when she dropped her pocket-handkerchief She tried 

doing nothing, to see what that produced, and they too did nothing. Mrs. 
Moore was equally 

unsuccessful. Mrs. Turton waited for them with a detached expression; she had known what 

nonsense it all was from the first. 

When they took their leave, Mrs. Moore had an impulse, and said to Mrs. Bhattacharya, 

whose face she liked, "I wonder whether you would allow us to call on you some day." 

"When?" she replied, inclining charmingly. 

"Whenever is convenient." 

"All days are convenient." 

"Thursday ..." 

"Most certainly." 

"We shall enjoy it greatly, it would be a real p
leasure. What about the time?" 

"All hours." 

"Tell us which you would prefer. We're quite strangers to your country; we don't know when 

you have visitors," said Miss Quested. 

Mrs. Bhattacharya seemed not to know either. Her gesture implied that she had known, 

since Thursdays began, that English ladies would come to see her on one of them, and so always 

stayed in. Everything pleased her, nothing surprised. She added, "We leave for Calcutta 

to-day." 

"Oh, do you?" said Adela, not at first seein
g the implication. Then she cried, "Oh, but if you 

do we shall find you gone." 

Mrs. Bhattacharya did not dispute it. But her husband called from the distance, "Yes, yes, 

you come to us Thursday." 

"But you'll be in Calcutta." 

"No, no, we shall not." He said something swiftly to his wife in Bengali. "We expect you 

Thursday." 

"Thursday ..." the woman echoed. 

"You can't have done such a dreadful thing as to put off going for our sake?" exclaimed Mrs. 

Moore. 

"No, of course not, we are not su
ch people." He was laughing. 

"I believe that you have. Oh, please—it distresses me beyond words." 

Everyone was laughing now, but with no suggestion that they had blundered. A shapeless 

discussion occurred, during which Mrs. Turton retired, smiling to herself The upshot was that 

they were to come Thursday, but early in the morning, so as to wreck the Bhattacharya plans as 

little as possible, and Mr. Bhattacharya would send his carriage to fetch them, with servants to 

point out the way. Did he 
know where they lived? Yes, of course he knew, he knew everything; 

and he laughed again. They left among a flutter of compliments and smiles, and three ladies, 

who had hitherto taken no part in the reception, suddenly shot out of the summer-house like 

exquisitely coloured swallows, and salaamed them. 

Meanwhile the Collector had been going his rounds. He made pleasant remarks and a few 

jokes, which were applauded lustily, but he knew something to the discredit of nearly every one 

of his guests, 
and was consequently perfunctory. When they had not cheated, it was bhang, 

women, or worse, and even the desirables wanted to get something out of him. He believed 

that a "Bridge Party" did good rather than harm, or he would not have given one, but he was 

under no illusions, and at the proper moment he retired to the English side of the lawn. The 

impressions he left behind him were various. Many of the guests, especially the humbler and 



less Anglicized, were genuinely grateful. To be addressed 
by so high an official was a permanent 

asset. They did not mind how long they stood, or how little happened, and when seven o'clock 

struck, they had to be turned out. Others were grateful with more intelligence. The Nawab Bahadur, 

indifferent for himself and for the distinction with which he was greeted, was moved by 

the mere kindness that must have prompted the invitation. He knew the difficulties. Hamidullah 

also thought that the Collector had played up well. But others, such as Mahmoud Ali, we
re cynical; 

they were firmly convinced that Turton had been made to give the party by his official superiors 

and was all the time consumed with impotent rage, and they infected some who were 

inclined to a healthier view. Yet even Mahmoud Ali was glad he had come. Shrines are fascinating, 

especially when rarely opened, and it amused him to note the ritual of the English club, and 

to caricature it afterwards to his friends. 

After Mr. Turton, the official who did his duty best was Mr. Fielding, th
e Principal of the little 

Government College. He knew little of the district and less against the inhabitants, so he was in 

a less cynical state of mind. Athletic and cheerful, he romped about, making numerous mistakes 

which the parents of his pupils tried to cover up, for he was popular among them. When the 

moment for refreshments came, he did not move back to the English side, but burnt his mouth 

with gram. He talked to anyone and he ate anything. Amid much that was alien, he learnt that 

the 
two new ladies from England had been a great success, and that their politeness in wishing 

to be Mrs. Bhattacharya's guests had pleased not only her but all Indians who heard of it. It 

pleased Mr. Fielding also. He scarcely knew the two new ladies, still he decided to tell them 

what pleasure they had given by their friendliness. 

He found the younger of them alone. She was looking through a nick in the cactus hedge at 

the distant Marabar Hills, which had crept near, as was their custom at sunset; 
if the sunset had 

lasted long enough, they would have reached the town, but it was swift, being tropical. He gave 

her his information, and she was so much pleased and thanked him so heartily that he asked 

her and the other lady to tea. 

"I'd like to come very much indeed, and so would Mrs. Moore, I know." 

"I'm rather a hermit, you know." 

"Much the best thing to be in this place." 

"Owing to my work and so on, I don't get up much to the club." 

"I know, I know, and we never get down from it. I 
envy you being with Indians." 

"Do you care to meet one or two?" 

"Very, very much indeed; it's what I long for. This party to-day makes me so angry and miserable. 

I think my countrymen out here must be mad. Fancy inviting guests and not treating 

them properly! You and Mr. Turton and perhaps Mr. McBryde are the only people who showed 

any common politeness. The rest make me perfectly ashamed, and it's got worse and worse." 

It had. The Englishmen had intended to play up better, but had been prevent
ed from doing 

so by their women folk, whom they had to attend, provide with tea, advise about dogs, etc. 

When tennis began, the barrier grew impenetrable. It had been hoped to have some sets between 

East and West, but this was forgotten, and the courts were monopolized by the usual 

club couples. Fielding resented it too, but did not say so to the girl, for he found something 

theoretical in her outburst. Did she care about Indian music? he enquired; there was an old professor 

down at the College
, who sang. 

"Oh, just what we wanted to hear. And do you know Doctor Aziz?" 

"I know all about him. I don't know him. Would you like him asked too?" 

"Mrs. Moore says he is so nice." 

"Very well. Miss Quested. Will Thursday suit you?" 

"Indeed it will, and that morning we go to this Indian lady's. All the nice things are coming 

Thursday." 

"I won't ask the City Magistrate to bring you. I know he'll be busy at that time." 

"Yes, Ronny is always hard-worked," she replied, contemplating the hills. H
ow lovely they 

suddenly were! But she couldn't touch them. In front, like a shutter, fell a vision of her married 



life. She and Ronny would look into the club like this every evening, then drive home to dress; 

they would see the Lesleys and the Callendars and the Turtons and the Burtons, and invite 

them and be invited by them, while the true India slid by unnoticed. Colour would remain—the 

pageant of birds in the early morning, brown bodies, white turbans, idols whose flesh was scarlet 

or b
lue—and movement would remain as long as there were crowds in the bazaar and bathers 

in the tanks. Perched up on the seat of a dogcart, she would see them. But the force that 

lies behind colour and movement would escape her even more effectually than it did now. She 

would see India always as a frieze, never as a spirit, and she assumed that it was a spirit o'f 

which Mrs. Moore had had a glimpse. 

And sure enough they did drive away from the club in a few minutes, and they did dress, 

and to din
ner came Miss Derek and the McBrydes, and the menu was: Julienne soup full of bullety 

bottled peas, pseudo-cottage bread, fish full of branching bones, pretending to be plaice, 

more bottled peas with the cutlets, trifle, sardines on toast: the menu of Anglo-India. A dish 

might be added or subtracted as one rose or fell in the official scale, the peas might rattle less 

or more, the sardines and the vermouth be imported by a different firm, but the tradition remained; 

the food of exiles, cooked by 
servants who did not understand it. Adela thought of the 

young men and women who had come out before her, P. & O. full after P. & O. full, and had 

been set down to the same food and the same ideas, and been snubbed in the same goodhumoured 

way until they kept to the accredited themes and began to snub others. "I should 

never get like that," she thought, for she was young herself; all the same she knew that she 

had come up against something that was both insidious and tough, and against which she 


needed allies. She must gather around her at Chandrapore a few people who felt as she did, 

and she was glad to have met Mr. Fielding and the Indian lady with the unpronounceable name. 

Here at all events was a nucleus; she should know much better where she stood in the course 

of the next two days. 

Miss Derek— she companioned a Maharani in a remote Native State. She was genial and gay 

and made them all laugh about her leave, which she had taken because she felt she deserved 

it, not because th
e Maharani said she might go. Now she wanted to take the Maharajah's 

motor-car as well; it had gone to a Chiefs' Conference at Delhi, and she had a great scheme for 

burgling it at the junction as it came back in the train. She was also very funny about the Bridge 

Party— indeed she regarded the entire peninsula as a comic opera. "If one couldn't see the 

laughable side of these people one 'Id be done for," said Miss Derek. Mrs. McBryde— it was she 

who had been the nurse— ceased not to exclaim
, "Oh, Nancy, how topping! Oh, Nancy, how killing! 

I wish I could look at things like that." Mr. McBryde did not speak much; he seemed nice. 

When the guests had gone, and Adela gone to bed, there was another interview between 

mother and son. He wanted her advice and support— while resenting interference. "Does Adela 

talk to you much?" he began. "I'm so driven with work, I don't see her as much as I hoped, but 

I hope she finds things comfortable." 

"Adela and I talk mostly about India. Dear, si
nce you mention it, you're quite right— you 

ought to be more alone with her than you are." 

Yes, perhaps, but then people'id gossip." 

"Well, they must gossip sometime! Let them gossip." 

"People are so odd out here, and it's not like home— one's always facing the footlights, as 

the Burra Sahib said. Take a silly little example: when Adela went out to the boundary of the 

club compound, and Fielding followed her. I saw Mrs. Callendar notice it. They notice everything, 

until they're perfectly 
sure you're their sort. " 

"I don't think Adela'll ever be quite their sort— she's much too individual." 

"I know, that's so remarkable about her," he said thoughtfully. Mrs. Moore thought him 

rather absurd. Accustomed to the privacy of London, she could not realize that India, seemingly 

so mysterious, contains none, and that consequently the conventions have greater force. "I 

suppose nothing's on her mind," he continued. 

"Ask her, ask her yourself, my dear boy." 



"Probably she's heard tales
 of the heat, but of course I should pack her off to the Hills every 

April~rm not one to keep a wife grilling in the Plains." 

"Oh, it wouldn't be the weather." 

"There's nothing in India but the weather, my dear mother; it's the Alpha and Omega of the 

whole affair." 

"Yes, as Mrs. McBryde was saying, but it's much more the Anglo-Indians themselves who 

are likely to get on Adela's nerves. She doesn't think they behave pleasantly to Indians, you 

see." 

"What did I tell you?" he exclaimed, losing
 his gentle manner. "I knew it last week. Oh, how 

like a woman to worry over a side-issue!" 

She forgot about Adela in her surprise. "A side-issue, a side-issue?" she repeated. "How can 

it be that?" 

"We're not out here for the purpose of behaving pleasantly!" 

"What do you mean?" 

"What I say. We're out here to do justice and keep the peace. Them's my sentiments. India 

isn't a drawingroom." 

"Your sentiments are those of a god," she said quietly, but it was his manner rather than his 

sentimen
ts that annoyed her. 

Trying to recover his temper, he said, "India likes gods." 

"And Englishmen like posing as gods." 

"There's no point in all this. Here we are, and we're going to stop, and the country's got to 

put up with us, gods or no gods. Oh, look here," he broke out, rather pathetically, "what do you 

and Adela want me to do? Go against my class, against all the people I respect and admire out 

here? Lose such power as I have for doing good in this country because my behaviour isn't 

plea
sant? You neither of you understand what work is, or you 'Id never talk such eyewash. I 

hate talking like this, but one must occasionally. It's morbidly sensitive to go on as Adela and 

you do. I noticed you both at the club to-day—after the Burra Sahib had been at all that trouble 

to amuse you. I am out here to work, mind, to hold this wretched country by force. I'm not a 

missionary or a Labour Member or a vague sentimental sympathetic literary man. I'm just a 

servant of the Government; it's th
e profession you wanted me to choose myself, and that's that. 

We're not pleasant in India, and we don't intend to be pleasant. We've something more important 

to do." 

He spoke sincerely. Every day he worked hard in the court trying to decide which of two untrue 

accounts was the less untrue, trying to dispense justice fearlessly, to protect the weak 

against the less weak, the incoherent against the plausible, surrounded by lies and flattery. That 

morning he had convicted a railway clerk of overch
arging pilgrims for their tickets, and a Pathan 

of attempted rape. He expected no gratitude, no recognition for this, and both clerk and Pathan 

might appeal, bribe their witnesses more effectually in the interval, and get their sentences reversed. 

It was his duty. But he did expect sympathy from his own people, and except from newcomers 

he obtained it. He did think he ought not to be worried about "Bridge Parties" when the 

day's work was over and he wanted to play tennis with his equals or rest h
is legs upon a long 

chair. 

He spoke sincerely, but she could have wished with less gusto. How Ronny revelled in the 

drawbacks of his situation! How he did rub it in that he was not in India to behave pleasantly, 

and derived positive satisfaction therefrom! He reminded her of his public-schooldays. The 

traces of young-man humanitarianism had sloughed off, and he talked like an intelligent and 

embittered boy. His words without his voice might have impressed her, but when she heard the 

self-sati
sfied lilt of them, when she saw the mouth moving so complacently and competently 

beneath the little red nose, she felt, quite illogically, that this was not the last word on India. 

One touch of regret—not the canny substitute but the true regret from the heart— would have 

made him a different man, and the British Empire a different institution. 

"I'm going to argue, and indeed dictate," she said, clinking her rings. "The English are out 



here to be pleasant." 

"How do you make that out, mot
her?" he asked, speaking gently again, for he was ashamed 
of his irritability. 

"Because India is part of the earth. And God has put us on the earth in order to be pleasant 
to each other. God . . . is . . . love." She hesitated, seeing how much he disliked the argument, 
hut something made her go on. "God has put us on earth to love our neighbours and to show 
it, and He is omnipresent, even in India, to see how we are succeeding." 
He looked gloomy, and a little anxious. He knew this religious strain i
n her, and that it was a 
symptom of bad health; there had been much of it when his stepfather died. He thought, "She 
is certainly ageing, and I ought not to be vexed with anything she says." 
"The desire to behave pleasantly satisfies God . . . The sincere if impotent desire wips His 
blessing. I think everyone fails, but there are so many kinds of failure. Good will and more good 
will and more good will. Though I speak with the tongues of . . ." 
He waited until she had done, and then said gently, "I q
uite see that. I suppose I ought to 
get off to my files now, and you'll be going to bed." 

"I suppose so, I suppose so." They did not part for a few minutes, but the conversation had 
become unreal since Christianity had entered it. Ronny approved of religion as long as it endorsed 
the National Anthem, but he objected when it attempted to influence his life. Then he 
would say in respectful yet decided tones, "I don't think it does to talk about these things, every 
fellow has to work out his own religi
on," and any fellow who heard him muttered, "Hear! " 
Mrs. Moore felt that she had made a mistake in mentioning God, but she found him increasingly 
difficult to avoid as she grew older, and he had been constantly in her thoughts since she 
entered India, though oddly enough he satisfied her less. She must needs pronounce his name 
frequently, as the greatest she knew, yet she had never found it less efficacious. Outside the 
arch there seemed always an arch, beyond the remotest echo a silence. And she reg
retted afterwards 
that she had not kept to the real serious subject that had caused her to visit India— 
namely, the relationship between Ronny and Adela. Would they, or would they not, succeed in 
becoming engaged to be married? 
CHAPTER VI 

! Aziz had not gone to the Bridge Party. Immediately after his meeting with Mrs. Moore he 
was diverted to other matters. Several surgical cases came in, and kept him busy. He ceased to 
be either outcaste or poet, and became the medical student, very gay, and ful
l of details of 
operations 

which he poured into the shrinking ears of his friends. His profession fascinated him at 
times, but he required it to be exciting, and it was his hand, not his mind, that was scientific. 
The knife he loved and used skilfully, and he also liked pumping in the latest serums. But the 
boredom of rEgime and hygiene repelled him, and after inoculating a man for enteric, he would 
go away and drink unfiltered water himself "What can you expect from the fellow?" said dour 
Major Ca
llendar. "No grits, no guts." But in his heart he knew that if Aziz and not he had operated 
last year on Mrs. Graysford's appendix, the old lady would probably have lived. And this 
did not dispose him any better towards his subordinate. 

There was a row the morning after the mosque—they were always having rows. The Major, 
who had been up half the night, wanted damn well to know why Aziz had not come promptly 
when summoned. 

"Sir, excuse me, I did. I mounted my bike, and it bust in front of the Cow 
Hospital. So I had 
to find a tonga. " 

"Bust in front of the Cow Hospital, did it? And how did you come to be there?" 
"I beg your pardon?" 

"Oh Lord, oh Lord! When I live here "--he kicked the gravel--" and you live there—not ten 
minutes from me— and the Cow Hospital is right ever so far away the other side of you— 
there— then how did you come to be passing the Cow Hospital on the way to me? Now do 
some work for a change." 



He strode away in a temper, without waiting for the excuse, which
 as far as it went was a 
sound one: the Cow Hospital was in a straight line between Hamidullah's house and his own, so 
Aziz had naturally passed it. He never realized that the educated Indians visited one another 
constantly, and were weaving, however painfully, a new social fabric. Caste "or something of 
the sort" would prevent them. He only knew that no one ever told him the truth, although he 
had been in the country for twenty years. 

Aziz watched him go with amusement. When his spirits were up he 
felt that the English are 
a comic institution, and he enjoyed being misunderstood by them. But it was an amusement of 
the emotions and nerves, which an accident or the passage of time might destroy; it was apart 
from the fundamental gaiety that he reached when he was with those whom he trusted. A 
disobliging 

simile involving Mrs. Callendar occurred to his fancy. "I must tell that to Mahmoud Ali, 
it'll make him laugh," he thought. Then he got to work. He was competent and indispensable, 
and he knew 
it. The simile passed from his mind while he exercised his professional skill. 
During these pleasant and busy days, he heard vaguely that the Collector was giving a 
party, and that the Nawab Bahadur said everyone ought to go to it. His fellowassistant. Doctor 
Panna Lai, was in ecstasies at the prospect, and was urgent that they should attend it together 
in his newtum-tum. The arrangement suited them both. Aziz was spared the indignity of a bicycle 
or the expense of hiring, while Dr. Panna Lai, who was
 timid and elderly, secured someone 
who could manage his horse. He could manage it himself, but only just, and he was afraid of 
the motors and of the unknown turn into the club grounds. "Disaster may come," he said politely, 
"but we shall at all events get there safe, even if we do not get back." And with more 
logic: "It will, I think, create a good impression should two doctors arrive at the same time." 
But when the time came, Aziz was seized with a revulsion, and determined not to go. For 
one thing
 his spell of work, lately concluded, left him independent and healthy. For another, the 
day chanced to fall on the anniversary of his wife's death. She had died soon after he had fallen 
in love with her; he had not loved her at first. Touched by Western feeling, he disliked union 
with a woman whom he had never seen; moreover, when he did see her, she disappointed him, 
and he begat his first child in mere animality. The change began after its birth. He was won by 
her love for him, by a loyalty that im
plied something more than submission, and by her efforts 
to educate herself against that lifting of the purdah that would come in the next generation if 
not in theirs. She was intelligent, yet had old-fashioned grace. Gradually he lost the feeling that 
his relatives had chosen wrongly for him. Sensuous enjoyment— well, even if he had had it, it 
would have dulled in a year, and he had gained something instead, which seemed to increase 
the longer they lived together. She became the mother of a son . .
 . and in giving him a second 
son she died. Then he realized what he had lost, and that no woman could ever take her place; 
a friend would come nearer to her than another woman. She had gone, there was no one like 
her, and what is that uniqueness but love? He amused himself, he forgot her at times: but at 
other times he felt that she had sent all the beauty and joy of the world into Paradise, and he 
meditated suicide. Would he meet her beyond the tomb? Is there such a meetingplace? Though 
orthodox, h
e did not know. God's unity was indubitable and indubitably announced, but on all 
other points he wavered like the average Christian; his belief in the life to come would pale to a 
hope, vanish, reappear, all in a single sentence or a dozen heart-beats, so that the corpuscles of 
his blood rather than he seemed to decide which opinion he should hold, and for how long. It 
was so with all his opinions. Nothing stayed, nothing passed that did not return; the circulation 
was ceaseless and kept him young, a
nd he mourned his wife the more sincerely because he 
mourned her seldom. 

It would have been simpler to tell Dr. Lai that he had changed his mind about the party, but 
until the last minute he did not know that he had changed it; indeed, he didn't change it, it 
changed itself Unconquerable aversion welled. Mrs. Callendar, Mrs. Lesley—no, he couldn't 
stand them in his sorrow: they would guess it— for he dowered the British matron with strange 
insight— and would delight in torturing him, they woul
d mock him to their husbands. When he 



should have been ready, he stood at the Post Office, writing a telegram to his children, and 

found on his return that Dr. Lai had called for him, and gone on. Well, let him go on, as befitted 

the coarseness of his nature. For his own part, he would commune with the dead. 

And unlocking a drawer, he took out his wife's photograph. He gazed at it, and tears 

spouted from his eyes. He thought, "How unhappy I am! " But because he really was unhappy, 

another emo
tion soon mingled with his self-pity: he desired to remember his wife and could 

not. Why could he remember people whom he did not love? They were always so vivid to him, 

whereas the more he looked at this photograph, the less he saw. She had eluded him thus, ever 

since they had carried her to her tomb. He had known that she would pass from his hands and 

eyes, but had thought she could live in his mind, not realizing that the very fact that we have 

loved the dead increases their unreality, and tha
t the more passionately we invoke them the 

further they recede. A piece of brown cardboard and three children—that was all that was left of 

his wife. It was unbearable, and he thought again, "How unhappy I am! " and became happier. 

He had breathed for an instant the mortal air that surrounds Orientals and all men, and he drew 

back from it with a gasp, for he was young. "Never, never shall I get over this," he told himself 

"Most certainly my career is a failure, and my sons will be badly brought
 up." Since it was certain, 

he strove to avert it, and looked at some notes he had made on a case at the hospital. 

Perhaps some day a rich person might require this particular operation, and he gain a large 

sum. The notes interesting him on their own account, he locked the photograph up again. Its 

moment was over, and he did not think about his wife any more. 

After tea his spirits improved, and he went round to see Hamidullah. Hamidullah had gone 

to the party, but his pony had not, so Aziz borr
owed it, also his friend's riding breeches and polo 

mallet. He repaired to the Maidan. It was deserted except at its rim, where some bazaar youths 

were training. Training for what? They would have found it hard to say, but the word had got 

into the air. Round they ran, weedy and knock-kneed—the local physique was wretched— with an 

expression on their faces not so much of determination as of a deterinination to be determined. 

"Maharajah, salaam," he called for a joke. The youths stopped and la
ughed. He advised them 

not to exert themselves. They promised they would not, and ran on. 

Riding into the middle, he began to knock the ball about. He could not play, but his pony 

could, and he set himself to learn, free from all human tension. He forgot the whole damned 

business of living as he scurried over the brown platter of the Maidan, with the evening wind on 

his forehead, and the encircling trees soothing his eyes. The ball shot away towards a stray 

subaltern who was also practising; he
 hit it back to Aziz and called, "Send it along again." 

"All right." 

The new-comer had some notion of what to do, but his horse had none, and forces were 

equal. Concentrated on the ball, they somehow became fond of one another, and smiled when 

they drew rein to rest. Aziz liked soldiers— they either accepted you or swore at you, which was 

preferable to the civilian's hauteur— and the subaltern liked anyone who could ride. 

"Often play?" he asked. 

"Never." 

"Let's have another chukker." 


As he hit, his horse bucked and off he went, cried, "Oh God! "and jumped on again. "Don't 

you ever fall off?" 

"Plenty." 

"Not you." 

They reined up again, the fire of good fellowship in their eyes. But it cooled with their bodies, 

for athletics can only raise a temporary glow. Nationality was returning, but before it could 

exert its poison they parted, saluting each other. "If only they were all like that," each thought. 

Now it was sunset. A few of his co-religionists had come to the Maidan, an
d were praying 

with their faces towards Mecca. A Brahminy Bull walked towards them, and Aziz, though 

disinclined 

to pray himself, did not see why they should be bothered with the clumsy and idolatrous 



animal. He gave it a tap with his polo mallet. As he did so, a voice from the road hailed him: it 

was Dr. Panna Lai, returning in high distress from the Collector's party. 

"Dr. Aziz, Dr. Aziz, where you been? I waited ten full minutes' time at your house, then I 

went. " 

"I am so awfully sorr
y ~I was compelled to go to the Post Office." 

One of his own circle would have accepted this as meaning that he had changed his mind, 

an event too common to merit censure. But Dr. Lai, being of low extraction, was not sure 

whether an insult had not been intended, and he was further annoyed because Aziz had buffeted 

the Brahminy Bull. "Post Office? Do you not send your servants?" he said. 

"I have so few~my scale is very small." 

"Your servant spoke to me. I saw your servant." 

"But, Dr. Lai, con
sider. How could I send my servant when you were coming: you come, we 

go, my house is left alone, my servant comes back perhaps, and all my portable property has 

been carried away by bad characters in the meantime. Would you have that? The cook is deaf— 

I can never count on my cook—and the boy is only a little boy. Never, never do I and Hassan 

eave the house at the same time together. It is my fixed rule." He said all this and much more 

out of civility, to save Dr. Lai's face. It was not offe
red as truth and should not have been criticized 

as such. But the other demolished it—an easy and ignoble task. "Even if this so, what prevents 

leaving a chit saying where you go?" and so on. Aziz detested ill breeding, and made his 

pony caper. "Farther away, or mine will start out of sympathy," he wailed, revealing the true 

source of his irritation. "It has been so rough and wild this afternoon. It spoiled some most 

valuable blossoms in the club garden, and had to be dragged back by four men. 
English ladies 

and gentlemen looking on, and the Collector Sahib himself taking a note. But, Dr. Aziz, I'll not 

take up your valuable time. This will not interest you, who have so many engagements and 

telegrams. I am just a poor old doctor who thought right to pay my respects when I was asked 

and where I was asked. Your absence, I may remark, drew commentaries." 

"They can damn well comment." 

"It is fine to be young. Damn well! Oh, very fine. Damn whom?" 

"I go or not as I please." 

"Yet you p
romise me, and then fabricate this tale of a telegram. Go forward. Dapple." 

They went, and Aziz had a wild desire to make an enemy for life. He could do it so easily by 

galloping near them. He did it. Dapple bolted. He thundered back on to the Maidan. The glory 

of his play with the subaltern remained for a little, he galloped and swooped till he poured with 

sweat, and until he returned the pony to Hamidullah's stable he felt the equal of any man. Once 

on his feet, he had creeping fears. Was he in
 bad odour with the powers that be? Had he offended 

the Collector by absenting himself? Dr. Panna La! was a person of no importance, yet 

was it wise to have quarrelled even with him? The complexion of his mind turned from human 

to political. He thought no longer, "Can I get on with people?" but "Are they stronger than I?" 

breathing the prevalent miasma. 

At his home a chit was awaiting him, bearing the Government stamp. It lay on his table like 

a high explosive, which at a touch might blow his f
limsy bungalow to bits. He was going to be 

cashiered because he had not turned up at the party. When he opened the note, it proved to be 

quite different; an invitation from Mr. Fielding, the Principal of Government College, asking him 

to come to tea the day after to-morrow. His spirits revived with violence. They would have revived 

in any case, for he possessed a soul that could suffer but not stifle, and led a steady life 

beneath his mutability. But this invitation gave him particular joy, becau
se Fielding had asked 

him to tea a month ago, and he had forgotten about it-never answered, never gone, just forgotten. 

And here came a second invitation, without a rebuke or even an allusion to his slip. Here 

was true courtesy— the civil deed that shows the good heart— and snatching up his pen he wrote 

an affectionate reply, and hurried back for news to Hamidullah's. For he had never met the 

Principal, and believed that the one serious gap in his life was going to be filled. He longed to 

k
now everything about the splendid fellow— his salary, preferences, antecedents, how best one 



might please him. But Hamidullah was still out, and Mahmoud Ali, who was in, would only make 

silly rude jokes about the party. 

CHAPTER VII 

This Mr. Fielding had been caught by India late. He was over forty when he entered that 

oddest portal, the Victoria Terminus at Bombay, and—having bribed a European ticket 

inspector—took his luggage into the compartment of his first tropical train. The journe
y remained 

in his mind as significant. Of his two carriage companions one was a youth, fresh to the 

East like himself, the other a seasoned Anglo-Indian of his own age. A gulf divided him from 

either; he had seen too many cities and men to be the first or to become the second. New 

impressions 

crowded on him, but they were not the orthodox new impressions; the past conditioned 

them, and so it was with his mistakes. To regard an Indian as if he were an Italian is not, 

for instance, a common err
or, nor perhaps a fatal one, and Fielding often attempted analogies 

between this peninsula and that other, smaller and more exquisitely shaped, that stretches into 

the classic waters of the Mediterranean. 

His career, though scholastic, was varied, and had included going to the bad and repenting 

thereafter. By now he was a hard-bitten, good-tempered, intelligent fellow on the verge of middle 

age, with a belief in education. He did not mind whom he taught; public schoolboys, mental 

defectives and
 policemen, had all come his way, and he had no objection to adding Indians. 

Through the influence of friends, he was nominated Principal of the little college at Chandrapore, 

liked it, and assumed he was a success. He did succeed with his pupils, but the gulf between 

himself and his countrymen, which he had noticed in the train, widened distressingly. He 

could not at first see what was wrong. He was not unpatriotic, he always got on with Englishmen 

in England, all his best friends were English, 
so why was it not the same out here? Outwardly 

of the large shaggy type, with sprawling limbs and blue eyes, he appeared to inspire 

confidence until he spoke. Then something in his manner puzzled people and failed to allay the 

distrust which his profession naturally inspired. There needs must be this evil of brains in India, 

but woe to him through whom they are increased! The feeling grew that Mr. Fielding was a 

disruptive 

force, and rightly, for ideas are fatal to caste, and he used ideas by t
hat most potent 

method— interchange. Neither a missionary nor a student, he was happiest in the give-and-take 

of a private conversation. The world, he believed, is a globe of men who are trying to reach one 

another and can best do so by the help of good will plus culture and intelligence— a creed ill 

suited to Chandrapore, but he had come out too late to lose it. He had no racial feeling— not 

because he was superior to his brother civilians, but because he had matured in a different 

atmos
phere, 

where the herdinstinct does not flourish. The remark that did him most harm at the 

club was a silly aside to the effect that the socalled white races are really pinko-grey. He only 

said this to be cheery, he did not realize that "white" has no more to do with a colour than "God 

save the King" with a god, and that it is the height of impropriety to consider what it does connote. 

The pinko-grey male whom he addressed was subtly scandalized; his sense of insecurity 

was awoken, and he commun
icated it to the rest of the herd. 

Still, the men tolerated him for the sake of his good heart and strong body; it was their 

wives who decided that he was not a sahib really. They disliked him. He took no notice of them, 

and this, which would have passed without comment in feminist England, did him harm in a 

community where the male is expected to be lively and helpful. Mr. Fielding never advised one 

about dogs or horses, or dined, or paid his midday calls, or decorated trees for one's children a
t 

Christmas, and though he came to the club, it was only to get his tennis or billiards, and to go. 

This was true. He had discovered that it is possible to keep in with Indians and Englishmen, but 

that he who would also keep in with Englishwomen must drop the Indians. The two wouldn't 

combine. Useless to blame either party, useless to blame them for blaming one another. It just 

was so, and one had to choose. Most Englishmen preferred their own kinswomen, who, coming 



out in increasing numbers,
 made life on the home pattern yearly more possible. He had found it 

convenient and pleasant to associate with Indians and he must pay the price. As a rule no 

Englishwoman 

entered the College except for official functions, and if he invited Mrs. Moore and 

Miss Quested to tea, it was because they were new-comers who would view everything with an 

equal if superficial eye, and would not turn on a special voice when speaking to his other 

guests. 

The College itself had been slapped down by the Pub
lic Works Department, but its grounds 

included an ancient garden and a garden-house, and here he lived for much of the year. He was 

dressing after a bath when Dr. Aziz was announced. Lifting up his voice, he shouted from the 

bedroom, "Please make yourself at home." The remark was unpremeditated, like most of his 

actions; it was what he felt inclined to say. 

To Aziz it had a very definite meanng. "May I really, Mr. Fielding? It's very good of you," he 

called back; "I like unconventional behaviou
r so extremely." His spirits flared up, he glanced 

round the living-room. Some luxury in it, but no order —nothing to intimidate poor Indians. It 

was also a very beautiful room, opening into the garden through three high arches of wood. 

"The fact is I have long wanted to meet you," he continued. "I have heard so much about your 

warm heart from the Nawab Bahadur. But where is one to meet in a wretched hole like 

Chandrapore?" He came close up to the door. "When I was greener here, I'll tell you w
hat. I 

used to wish you to fall ill so that we could meet that way." They laughed, and encouraged by 

his success he began to improvise. "I said to myself. How does Mr. Fielding look this morning? 

Perhaps pale. And the Civil Surgeon is pale too, he will not be able to attend upon him when 

the shivering commences. I should have been sent for instead. Then we would have had jolly 

talks, for you are a celebrated student of Persian poetry." 

You know me by sight, then." 

Of course, of course. You kn
ow me?" 

I know you very well by name." 

I have been here such a short time, and always in the bazaar. No wonder you have never 
seen me, and I wonder you know my name. I say, Mr. Fielding?" 

Yes?" 

Guess what I look like before you come out. That will be a kind of game." 

You're five feet nine inches high," said Fielding, surmising this much through the ground 
glass of the bedroom door. 

Jolly good. What next? Have I not a venerable white beard?" 

Blast! 

Anything wrong?" 

I've stamped on my las
t collar stud." 

Take mine, take mine." 

Have you a spare one?" 

Yes, yes, one minute." 

Not if you're wearing it yourself" 

No, no, one in my pocket." Stepping aside, so that his outline might vanish, he wrenched 
off his collar, and pulled out of his shirt the back stud, a gold stud, which was part of a set that 
his brother-in-law had brought him from Europe. " Here it is," he cried. 
"Come in with it if you don't mind the unconventionality." 

"One minute again." Replacing his collar, he prayed th
at it would not spring up at the back 
during tea. Fielding's bearer, who was helping him to dress, opened the door for him. 
"Many thanks." They shook hands smiling. He began to look round, as he would have with 
any old friend. Fielding was not surprised at the rapidity of their intimacy. With so emotional a 
people it was apt to come at once or never, and he and Aziz, having heard only good of each 
other, could afford to dispense with preliminaries. 
"But I always thought that Englishmen kept their roo
ms so tidy. It seems that this is not so. 



I need not be so ashamed." He sat down gaily on the bed; then, forgetting himself entirely, 

drew up his legs and folded them under him. "Everything ranged coldly on shelves was what 

_I_ thought.—I say, Mr. Fielding, is the stud going to go in?" 

"Ihae madoots." 

"What's that last sentence, please? Will you teach me some new words and so improve my 

English?" 

Fielding doubted whether "everything ranged coldly on shelves" could be improved. He was 

of
ten struck with the liveliness with which the younger generation handled a foreign tongue. 

They altered the idiom, but they could say whatever they wanted to say quickly; there were 

none of the babuisms ascribed to them up at the club. But then the club moved slowly; it still 

declared that few Mohammedans and no Hindus would eat at an Englishman's table, and that 

all Indian ladies were in impenetrable purdah. Individually it knew better; as a club it declined 

to change. 

"Let me put in your stud
. I see . . . the shirt back's hole is rather small and to rip it wider a 

pity." 

"Why in hell does one wear collars at all?" grumbled Fielding as he bent his neck. 

"We wear them to pass the Police." 

"What's that?" 

"If I'm biking in English dress—starch collar, hat with ditch—they take no notice. When I 

wear a fez, they cry, 'Your lamp's out!' Lord Curzon did not consider this when he urged natives 

of India to retain their picturesque costumes.— Hooray! Stud's gone in.— Sometimes I shu
t my 

eyes and dream I have splendid clothes again and am riding into battle behind Alamgir. Mr. 

Fielding, must not India have been beautiful then, with the Mogul Empire at its height and 

Alamgir reigning at Delhi upon the Peacock Throne?" 

"Two ladies are coming to tea to meet you— I think you know them." 

"Meet me? I know no ladies." 

"Not Mrs. Moore and Miss Quested?" 

"Oh yes— I remember." The romance at the mosque had sunk out of his consciousness as 

soon as it was over. "An excessively
 aged lady; but will you please repeat the name of her 

companion?" 

"Miss Quested." 

"Just as you wish." He was disappointed that other guests were coming, for he preferred to 

be alone with his new friend. 

"You can talk to Miss Quested about the Peacock Throne if you like— she's artistic, they say." 

"Is she a Post Impressionist?" 

"Post Impressionism, indeed! Come along to tea. This world is getting too much for me altogether." 

Aziz was offended. The remark suggested that he, an obscure Indi
an, had no right to have 

heard of Post Impressionism— a privilege reserved for the Ruling Race, that. He said stiffly, "I do 

not consider Mrs. Moore my friend, I only met her accidentally in my mosque," and was adding 

"a single meeting is too short to make a friend," but before he could finish the sentence the 

stiffness vanished from it, because he felt Fielding's fundamental good will. His own went out to 

it, and grappled beneath the shifting tides of emotion which can alone bear the voyager t
o an 

anchorage but may also carry him across it on to the rocks. He was safe really— as safe as the 

shore-dweller who can only understand stability and supposes that every ship must be wrecked, 

and he had sensations the shore-dweller cannot know. Indeed, he was sensitive rather than 

responsive. 

In every remark he found a meaning, but not always the true meaning, and his life 

though vivid was largely a dream. Fielding, for instance, had not meant that Indians are obscure, 

but that Post Impre
ssionism is; a gulf divided his remark from Mrs. Turton's "Why, they 

speak English," but to Aziz the two sounded alike. Fielding saw that something had gone wrong, 

and equally that it had come right, but he didn't fidget, being an optimist where personal relations 

were concerned, and their talk rattled on as before. 



"Besides the ladies I am expecting one of my assistants—Narayan Godbole." 

"Oho, the Deccani Brahman!" 

"He wants the past back too, but not precisely Alamgir." 

"I should think 
not. Do you know what Deccani Brahmans say? That England conquered India 

from them—from them, mind, and not from the Moguls. Is not that like their cheek? They 

have even bribed it to appear in text-books, for they are so subtle and immensely rich. Professor 

Godbole must be quite unlike all other Deccani Brahmans from all I can hear say. A most 

sincere chap." 

"Why don't you fellows run a club in Chandrapore, Aziz?" 

"Perhaps—some day . . . just now I see Mrs. Moore and— what's her name— c
oming." 

How fortunate that it was an "unconventional" party, where formalities are ruled out! On 

this basis Aziz found the English ladies easy to talk to, he treated them like men. Beauty would 

have troubled him, for it entails rules of its own, but Mrs. Moore was so old and Miss Quested 

so plain that he was spared this anxiety. Adela's angular body and the freckles on her face were 

terrible defects in his eyes, and he wondered how God could have been so unkind to any female 

form. His attitude 
towards her remained entirely straightforward in consequence. 

"I want to ask you something. Dr. Aziz," she began. "I heard from Mrs. Moore how helpful 

you were to her in the mosque, and how interesting. She learnt more about India in those few 

minutes' talk with you than in the three weeks since we landed." 

"Oh, please do not mention a little thing like that. Is there anything else I may tell you 

about my country?" 

"I want you to explain a disappointment we had this morning; it must be some poi
nt of Indian 

etiquette." 

"There honestly is none," he replied. "We are by nature a most informal people." 

"I am afraid we must have made some blunder and given offence," said Mrs. Moore. 

"That is even more impossible. But may I know the facts?" 

"An Indian lady and gentleman were to send their carriage for us this morning at nine. It 

has never come. We waited and waited and waited; we can't think what happened." 

"Some misunderstanding," said Fielding, seeing at once that it was the type of inc
ident that 

had better not be cleared up. 

"Oh no, it wasn't that," Miss Quested persisted. "They even gave up going to Calcutta to 

entertain us. We must have made some stupid blunder, we both feel sure." 

"I wouldn't worry about that." 

"Exactly what Mr. Heaslop tells me," she retorted, reddening a little. "If one doesn't worry, 

how's one to understand?" 

The host was inclined to change the subject, but Aziz took it up warmly, and on learning 

fragments of the delinquents' name pronounced that t
hey were Hindus. 

" Slack Hindus— they have no idea of society; I know them very well because of a doctor at 

the hospital. Such a slack, unpunctual fellow! It is as well you did not go to their house, for it 

would give you a wrong idea of India. Nothing sanitary. I think for my own part they grew 

ashamed of their house and that is why they did not send." 

"That's a notion," said the other man. 

"I do so hate mysteries," Adela announced. 

"We English do." 

"I dislike them not because I'm Englis
h, but from my own personal point of view," she corrected. 

"I like mysteries but I rather dislike muddles," said Mrs. Moore. 

"A mystery is a muddle." 

"Oh, do you think so, Mr. Fielding?" 

"A mystery is only a high-sounding term for a muddle. No advantage in stirring it up, in either 

case. Aziz and I know well that India's a muddle." 

"India's— Oh, what an alarming idea!" 

"There'll be no muddle when you come to see me," said Aziz, rather out of his depth. "Mrs. 



Moore and every one~I invite
 you all~oh, please." 

The old lady accepted: she still thought the young doctor excessively nice; moreover, a new 

feeling, half languor, half excitement, bade her turn down any fresh path. Miss Quested accepted 

out of adventure. She also liked Aziz, and believed that when she knew him better he 

would unlock his country for her. His invitation gratified her, and she asked him for his address. 

Aziz thought of his bungalow with horror. It was a detestable shanty near a low bazaar. 

There was practi
cally only one room in it, and that infested with small black flies. "Oh, but we 

will talk of something else now," he exclaimed. "I wish I lived here. See this beautiful room! Let 

us admire it together for a little. See those curves at the bottom of the arches. What delicacy! It 

is the architecture of Question and Answer. Mrs. Moore, you are in India; I am not joking." The 

room inspired him. It was an audience hall built in the eighteenth century for some high official, 

and though of wood had rem
inded Fielding of the Loggia de' Lanzi at Florence. Little rooms, 

now Europeanized, clung to it on either side, but the central hall was unpapered and unglassed, 

and the air of the garden poured in freely. One sat in public—on exhibition, as it were—in full 

view of the gardeners who were screaming at the birds and of the man who rented the tank for 

the cultivation of water chestnut. Fielding let the mango trees too— there was no knowing who 

might not come in— and his servants sat on his s
teps night and day to discourage thieves. Beautiful 

certainly, and the Englishman had not spoilt it, whereas Aziz in an occidental moment 

would have hung Maude Goodmans on the walls. Yet there was no doubt to whom the room 

really belonged. . . . 

"I am doing justice here. A poor widow who has been robbed comes along and I give her 

fifty rupees, to another a hundred, and so on and so on. I should like that." 

Mrs. Moore smiled, thinking of the modem method as exemplified in her son. "Rupees don't 


last for ever, I'm afraid," she said. 

"Mine would. God would give me more when he saw I gave. Always be giving, like the Nawab 

Bahadur. My father was the same, that is why he died poor." And pointing about the room 

he peopled it with clerks and officials, all benevolent because they lived long ago. "So we would 

sit giving for ever— on a carpet instead of chairs, that is the chief change between now and 

then, but I think we would never punish anyone." 

The ladies agreed. 

"Poor criminal, giv
e him another chance. It only makes a man worse to go to prison and be 

corrupted." His face grew very tender— the tenderness of one incapable of administration, and 

unable to grasp that if the poor criminal is let off he will again rob the poor widow. He was tender 

to everyone except a few family enemies whom he did not consider human: on these he 

desired revenge. He was even tender to the English; he knew at the bottom of his heart that 

they could not help being so cold and odd and circulating
 like an ice stream through his land. 

"We punish no one, no one," he repeated, "and in the evening we will give a great banquet with 

a nautch and lovely girls shall shine on every side of the tank with fireworks in their hands, and 

all shall be feasting and happiness until the next day, when there shall be justice as before— fifty 

rupees, a hundred, a thousand— till peace comes. Ah, why didn't we live in that time ?— But are 

you admiring Mr. Fielding's house? Do look how the pillars are pai
nted blue, and the verandah's 

pavilions— what do you call them ?— that are above us inside are blue also. Look at the carving 

on the pavilions. Think of the hours it took. Their little roofs are curved to imitate bamboo. So 

pretty— and the bamboos waving by the tank outside. Mrs. Moore! Mrs. Moore! " 

"Well?" she said, laughing. 

"You remember the water by our mosque? It comes down and fills this tank— a skilful arrangement 

of the Emperors. They stopped here going down into Bengal. They l
oved water. 

Wherever they went they created fountains, gardens, hammams. I was telling Mr. Fielding I 

would give anything to serve them." 

He was wrong about the water, which no Emperor, however skilful, can cause to gravitate 

uphill; a depression of some depth together with the whole of Chandrapore lay between the 

mosque and Fielding's house. Ronny would have pulled him up, Turton would have wanted to 



pull him up, but restrained himself. Fielding did not even want to pull him up; he had dulle
d his 

craving for verbal truth and cared chiefly for truth of mood. As for Miss Quested, she accepted 

everything Aziz said as true verbally. In her ignorance, she regarded him as "India," and never 

surmised that his outlook was limited and his method inaccurate, and that no one is India. 

He was now much excited, chattering away hard, and even saying damn when he got mixed 

up in his sentences. He told them of his profession, and of the operations he had witnessed and 

performed, and he went into 
details that scared Mrs. Moore, though Miss Quested mistook them 

for proofs of his broad-mindedness; she had heard such talk at home in advanced academic 

circles, deliberately free. She supposed him to be emancipated as well as reliable, and placed 

him on a pinnacle which he could not retain. He was high enough for the moment, to be sure, 

but not on any pinnacle. Wings bore him up, and flagging would deposit him. 

The arrival of Professor Godbole quieted him somewhat, but it remained his afternoon
. The 

Brahman, polite and enigmatic, did not impede his eloquence, and even applauded it. He took 

his tea at a little distance from the outcasts, from a low table placed slightly behind him, to 

which he stretched back, and as it were encountered food by accident; all feigned indifference 

to Professor Godbole's tea. He was elderly and wizen with a grey moustache and grey-blue 

eyes, and his complexion was as fair as a European's. He wore a turban that looked like pale 

purple macaroni, coat, waist
coat, dhoti, socks with clocks. The clocks matched the turban, and 

his whole appearance suggested harmony—as if he had reconciled the products of East and 

West, mental as well as physical, and could never be discomposed. The ladies were interested 

in him, and hoped that he would supplement Dr. Aziz by saying something about religion. But 

he only ate—ate and ate, smiling, never letting his eyes catch sight of his hand. 

Leaving the Mogul Emperors, Aziz turned to topics that could distress no on
e. He described 

the ripening of the mangoes, and how in his boyhood he used to run out in the Rains to a big 

mango grove belonging to an uncle and gorge there. "Then back with water streaming over you 

and perhaps rather a pain inside. But I did not mind. All my friends were paining with me. We 

have a proverb in Urdu: 'What does unhappiness matter when we are all unhappy together?' 

which comes in conveniently after mangoes. Miss Quested, do wait for mangoes. Why not settle 

altogether in India?" 


"I'm afraid I can't do that," said Adela. She made the remark without thinking what it 

meant. To her, as to the three men, it seemed in key with the rest of the conversation, and not 

for several minutes— indeed, not for half an hour— did she realize that it was an important remark, 

and ought to have been made in the first place to Ronny. 

"Visitors like you are too rare." 

"They are indeed," said Professor Godbole. "Such affability is seldom seen. But what can we 

offer to detain them? " 

"
Mangoes, mangoes." 

They laughed. "Even mangoes can be got in England now," put in Fielding. "They ship them 

in ice-cold rooms. You can make India in England apparently, just as you can make England in 

India." 

"Frightfully expensive in both cases," said the girl. 

"I suppose so." 

"And nasty." 

But the host wouldn't allow the conversation to take this heavy turn. He turned to the old 

lady, who looked flustered and put out— he could not imagine why— and asked about her own 

plans. She repli
ed that she should like to see over the College. Everyone immediately rose, with 

the exception of Professor Godbole, who was finishing a banana. 

"Don't you come too, Adela; you dislike institutions." 

"Yes, that is so," said Miss Quested, and sat down again. 

Aziz hesitated. His audience was splitting up. The more familiar half was going, but the 

more attentive remained. Refiecting that it was an "unconventional" afternoon, he stopped. 

Talk went on as before. Could one offer the visitors unripe m
angoes in a fool? "I speak now 



as a doctor: no." Then the old man said, "But I will send you up a few healthy sweets. I will 

give myself that pleasure." 

"Miss Quested, Professor Godbole's sweets are delicious," said Aziz sadly, for he wanted to 

send sweets too and had no wife to cook them. "They will give you a real Indian treat. Ah, in 

my poor position I can give you nothing." 

"I don't know why you say that, when you have so kindly asked us to your house." 

He thought again of his bungalow 
with horror. Good heavens, the stupid girl had taken him 

at his word! What was he to do? "Yes, all that is settled," he cried. "I invite you all to see me in 

the Marabar Caves." 

"I shall be delighted." 

"Oh, that is a most magnificent entertainment compared to my poor sweets. But has not 

Miss Quested visited our caves already?" 

"No. I've not even heard of them." 

"Not heard of them?" both cried. "The Marabar Caves in the Marabar Hills?" 

"We hear nothing interesting up at the club. Only tennis
 and ridiculous gossip." 

The old man was silent, perhaps feeling that it was unseemly of her to criticize her race, 

perhaps fearing that if he agreed she would report him for disloyalty. But the young man uttered 

a rapid "I know." 

"Then tell me everything you will, or I shall never understand India. Are they the hills I 

sometimes see in the evening? What are these caves?" 

Aziz undertook to explain, but it presently appeared that he had never visited the caves 

himself—had always been "meanin
g" to go, but work or private business had prevented him, 

and they were so far. Professor Godbole chaffed him pleasantly. "My dear young sir, the pot and 

the kettle! Have you ever heard of that useful proverb?" 

"Are they large caves?" she asked. 

"No, not large." 

"Do describe them. Professor Godbole." 

"It will be a great honour." He drew up his chair and an expression of tension came over his 

face. Taking the cigarette box, she offered to him and to Aziz, and lit up herself After an 

impressi
ve 

pause he said: "There is an entrance in the rock which you enter, and through the entrance 

is the cave." 

"Something like the caves at Elephanta?" 

"Oh no, not at all; at Elephanta there are sculptures of Siva and Parvati. There are no sculptures 

at Marabar." 

"They are immensely holy, no doubt," said Aziz, to help on the narrative. 

"Oh no, oh no." 

"Still, they are ornamented in some way." 

"Oh no." 

"Well, why are they so famous? We all talk of the famous Marabar Caves. Perhaps that is 


our empty brag." 

"No, I should not quite say that." 

"Describe them to this lady, then." 

"It will be a great pleasure." He forewent the pleasure, and Aziz realized that he was keeping 

back something about the caves. He realized because he often suffered from similar inhibitions 

himself Sometimes, to the exasperation of Major Callendar, he would pass over the one 

relevant fact in a position, to dwell on the hundred irrelevant. The Major accused him of 

disingenuousness, 

and was roughly right,
 but only roughly. It was rather that a power he couldn't 

control capriciously silenced his mind. Godbole had been silenced now; no doubt not willingly, 

he was concealing something. Handled subtly, he might regain control and announce that the 

Marabar Caves were—full of stalactites, perhaps; Aziz led up to this, but they weren't. 



The dialogue remained light and friendly, and Adela had no conception of its underdrift. She 

did not know that the comparatively simple mind of the Mohammedan was en
countering Ancient 

Night. Aziz played a thrilling game. He was handling a human toy that refused to work—he 

knew that much. If it worked, neither he nor Professor Godbole would be the least advantaged, 

but the attempt enthralled him and was akin to abstract thought. On he chattered, defeated at 

every move by an opponent who would nof even admit that a move had been made, and further 

than ever from discovering what, if anything, was extraordinary about the Marabar Caves. 

Into this Ronny droppe
d. 

With an annoyance he took no trouble to conceal, he called from the garden: "What's happened 

to Fielding? Where's my mother?" 

"Good evening!" she replied coolly. 

"I want you and mother at once. There's to be polo." 

"I thought there was to he no polo." 

"Everything's altered. Some soldier men have come in. Come along and I'll tell you about it." 

"Your mother will return shortly, sir," said Professor Godbole, who had risen with deference. 

"There is but little to see at our poor college." 


Ronny took no notice, but continued to address his remarks to Adela; he had hurried away 

from his work to take her to see the polo, because he thought it would give her pleasure. He 

did not mean to be rude to the two men, but the only link he could be conscious of with an Indian 

was the official, and neither happened to be his subordinate. As private individuals he forgot 

them. 

Unfortunately Aziz was in no mood to be forgotten. He would not give up the secure and 

intimate note of the last hour.
 He had not risen with Godbole, and now, offensively friendly, 

called from his seat, "Come along up and join us, Mr. Heaslop; sit down till your mother turns 

up." 

Ronny replied by ordering one of Fielding's servants to fetch his master at once. 

"He may not understand that. Allow me--" Aziz repeated the order idiomatically. 

Ronny was tempted to retort; he knew the type; he knew all the types, and this was the 

spoilt Westernized. But he was a servant of the Government, it was his job to avoid "in
cidents," 

so he said nothing, and ignored the provocation that Aziz continued to offer. Aziz was provocative. 

Everything he said had an impertinent flavour or jarred. His wings were failing, but he refused 

to fall without a struggle. He did not mean to be impertinent to Mr. Heaslop, who had 

never done him harm, but here was an Anglo-Indian who must become a man before comfort 

could be regained. He did not mean to be greasily confidential to Miss Quested, only to enlist 

her support; nor to be lo
ud and jolly towards Professor Godbole. A strange quartette—he fluttering 

to the ground, she puzzled by the sudden ugliness, Ronny fuming, the Brahman observing 

all three, but with downcast eyes and hands folded, as if nothing was noticeable. A scene from 

a play, thought Fielding, who now saw them from the distance across the garden grouped 

among the blue pillars of his beautiful hall. 

"Don't trouble to come, mother," Ronny called; "we're just starting." Then he hurried to 

Fielding, drew him 
aside and said with pseudo-heartiness, "I say, old man, do excuse me, but I 

think perhaps you oughtn't to have left Miss Quested alone." 

"I'm sorry, what's up?" replied Fielding, also trying to be genial. 

"Well . . . I'm the sun-dried bureaucrat, no doubt; still, I don't like to see an English girl left 

smoking with two Indians." 

"She stopped, as she smokes, by her own wish, old man." 

"Yes, that's all right in England." 

"I really can't see the harm." 

"If you can't see, you can't see. . . . 
Can't you see that fellow's a bounder?" 

Aziz flamboyant, was patronizing Mrs. Moore. 

"He isn't a bounder," protested Fielding. "His nerves are on edge, that's all." 

"What should have upset his precious nerves?" 



"I don't know. He was all right when I left." 

"Well, it's nothing I've said," said Ronny reassuringly. "I never even spoke to him." 

"Oh well, come along now, and take your ladies away; the catastrophe over." 

"Fielding . . . don't think I'm taking it badly, or anything of that sort. .
.. I suppose you 

won't come on to the polo with us? We should all be delighted." 

"I'm afraid I can't, thanks all the same. I'm awfully sorry you feel I've been remiss. I didn't 

mean to be." 

So the leave-taking began. Every one was cross or wretched. It was as if irritation exuded 

from the very soil. Could one have been so petty on a Scotch moor or an Italian alp? Fielding 

wondered afterwards. There seemed no reserve of tranquillity to draw upon in India. Either 

none, or else tranquillity swal
lowed up everything, as it appeared to do for Professor Godbole. 

Here was Aziz all shoddy and odious, Mrs. Moore and Miss Quested both silly, and he himself 

and Heaslop both decorous on the surface, but detestable really, and detesting each other. 

"Good-bye, Mr. Fielding, and thank you so much. What lovely College buildings!" 

"Good-bye, Mrs. Moore." 

"Good-bye, Mr. Fielding. Such an interesting afternoon ..." 

"Good-bye, Miss Quested." 

"Good-bye, Dr. Aziz." 

"Good-bye, Mrs. Moore." 

"Good-bye
, Dr. Aziz." 

"Good-bye, Miss Quested." He pumped her hand up and down to show that he felt at ease. 

"You'll jolly jolly well not forget those caves, won't you? I'll fix the whole show up in a jiffy." 

"Thank you. . ." 

Inspired by the devil to a final effort, he added, "What a shame you leave India so soon! 

Oh, do reconsider your decision, do stay." 

"Good-bye, Professor Godbole," she continued, suddenly agitated. "It's a shame we never 

heard you sing." 

"I may sing now," he replied, and did. 


His thin voice rose, and gave out one sound after another. At times there seemed rhythm, at 

times there was the illusion of a Western melody. But the ear, baffled repeatedly, soon lost any 

clue, and wandered in a maze of noises, none harsh or unpleasant, none intelligible. It was the 

song of an unknown bird. Only the servants understood it. They began to whisper to one another. 

The man who was gathering water chestnut came naked out of the tank, his lips parted 

with delight, disclosing his scarl
et tongue. The sounds continued and ceased after a few moments 

as casually as they had begun— apparently half through a bar, and upon the subs dominant. 

"Thanks so much: what was that?" asked Fielding. 

"I will explain in detail. It was a religious song. I placed myself in the position of a milkmaiden. 

I say to Shri Krishna, 'Come! come to me only.' The god refuses to come. I grow humble 

and say: 'Do not come to me only. Multiply yourself into a hundred Krishnas, and let one go 

to each of my h
undred companions, but one, O Lord of the Universe, come to me.' He refuses 

to come. This is repeated several times. The song is composed in a raga appropriate to the present 

hour, which is the evening." 

"But He comes in some other song, I hope?" said Mrs. Moore gently. 

"Oh no, he refuses to come," repeated Godbole, perhaps not understanding her question. "I 

say to Him, Come, come, come, come, come, come. He neglects to come." 

Ronny's steps had died away, and there was a moment of absolute sile
nce. No ripple disturbed 

the water, no leaf stirred. 

CHAPTER VIII 

Although Miss Quested had known Ronny well in England, she felt well advised to visit him 

before deciding to be his wife. India had developed sides of his character that she had never 

admired. His self-complacency, his censoriousness, his lack of subtlety, all grew vivid beneath a 

tropic sky; he seemed more indifferent than of old to what was passing in the minds of his fellows. 



more certain that he was right about them or th
at if he was wrong it didn't matter. When 

proved wrong, he was particularly exasperating; he always managed to suggest that she 

needn't have bothered to prove it. The point she made was never the relevant point, her arguments 

conclusive but barren, she was reminded that he had expert knowledge and she none, 

and that experience would not help her because she could not interpret it. A Public School, 

London University, a year at a crammer's, a particular sequence of posts in a particular province, 


a fall from a horse and a touch of fever were presented to her as the only training by 

which Indians and all who reside in their country can be understood; the only training she could 

comprehend, that is to say, for of course above Ronny there stretched the higher realms of 

knowledge, inhabited by Callendars and Turtons, who had been not one year in the country but 

twenty and whose instincts were superhuman. For himself he made no extravagant claims; she 

wished he would. It was the qualified bra
y of the callow official, the "I am not perfect, but--" 

that got on her nerves. 

How gross he had been at Mr. Fielding's—spoiling the talk and walking off in the middle of 

the haunting song! As he drove them away in the turn-turn, her irritation became unbearable, 

and she did not realize that much of it was directed against herself She longed for an opportunity 

to fly out at him, and since he felt cross too, and they were both in India, an opportunity 

soon occurred. They had scarcely left the 
College grounds before she heard him say to his 

mother, who was with him on the front seat, "What was that about caves?" and she promptly 

opened fire. 

"Mrs. Moore, your delightful doctor has decided on a picnic, instead of a party in his house; 

we are to meet him out there—you, myself, Mr. Fielding, Professor Godbole— exactly the same 

party." 

"Out where?" asked Ronny. 

"The Marabar Caves." 

"Well, I'm blessed," he murmured after a pause. "Did he descend to any details?" 

"He did not. If 
you had spoken to him, we could have arranged them." 

He shook his head, laughing. 

"Have I said anything funny?" 

"I was only thinking how the worthy doctor's collar climbed up his neck." 

"I thought you were discussing the caves." 

"So I am. Aziz was exquisitely dressed, from tie-pin to spats, but he had forgotten his back 

collar-stud, and there you have the Indian all over: inattention to detail; the fundamental slackness 

that reveals the race. Similarly, to 'meet' in the caves as if they were 
the clock at Charing 

Cross, when they're miles from a station and each other." 

"Have you been to them?" 

"No, but I know all about them, naturally." 

"Oh, naturally!" 

"Are you too pledged to this expedition, mother?" 

"Mother is pledged to nothing," said Mrs. Moore, rather unexpectedly. " Certainly not to this 

polo. Will you drive up to the bungalow first, and drop me there, please? I prefer to rest." 

"Drop me too," said Adela. "I don't want to watch polo either, I'm sure." 

"Simpler to drop 
the polo," said Ronny. Tired and disappointed, he quite lost self-control, 

and added in a loud lecturing voice, "I won't have you messing about with Indians any more! If 

you want to go to the Marabar Caves, you'll go under British auspices." 

"I've never heard of these caves, I don't know what or where they are," said Mrs. Moore, 

"but I really can't have "—she tapped the cushion beside her—" so much quarrelling and 

tiresomeness!" 

The young people were ashamed. They dropped her at the bungalo
w and drove on together 

to the polo, feeling it was the least they could do. Their crackling bad humour left them, but the 

heaviness of their spirit remained; thunderstorms seldom clear the air. Miss Quested was thinking 

over her own behaviour, and didn't like it at all. Instead of weighing Ronny and herself, and 



coming to a reasoned conclusion about marriage, she had incidentally, in the course of a talk 

about mangoes, remarked to mixed company that she didn't mean to stop in India. Which 

me
ant that she wouldn't marry Ronny: but what a way to announce it, what a way for a civilized 

girl to behave! She owed him an explanation, but unfortunately there was nothing to explain. 

The "thorough talk" so dear to her principles and temperament had been postponed until 

too late. There seemed no point in being disagreeable to him and formulating her complaints 

against his character at this hour of the day, which was the evening. . . . The polo took place on 

the Maidan near the entrance of Chand
rapore city. The sun was already declining and each of 

the trees held a premonition of night. They walked away from the governing group to a distant 

seat, and there, feeling that it was his due and her own, she forced out of herself the undigested 

remark: "We must have a thorough talk, Ronny, I'm afraid." 

"My temper's rotten, I must apologize," was his reply. "I didn't mean to order you and 

mother about, but of course the way those Bengalis let you down this morning annoyed me, 

and I don't want
 that sort of thing to keep happening." 

"It's nothing to do with them that I . . ." 

"No, but Aziz would make some similar muddle over the caves. He meant nothing by the 

invitation, I could tell by his voice; it's just their way of being pleasant." 

"It's something very different, nothing to do with caves, that I wanted to talk, over with 

you." She gazed at the colourless grass. "I've finally decided we are not going to be married, 

my dear boy." 

The news hurt Ronny very much. He had heard Aziz 
announce that she would not return to 

the country, but had paid no attention to the remark, for he never dreamt that an Indian could 

be a channel of communication between two English people. He controlled himself and said 

gently, "You never said we should marry, my dear girl; you never bound either yourself or me~ 

don't let this upset you." 

She felt ashamed. How decent he was! He might force his opinions down her throat, but did 

not press her to an "engagement," because he believed, like hersel
f, in the sanctity of personal 

relationships: it was this that had drawn them together at their first meeting, which had occurred 

among the grand scenery of the English Lakes. Her ordeal was over, but she felt it 

should have been more painful and longer. Adela will not marry Ronny. It seemed slipping away 

like a dream. She said, "But let us discuss things; it's all so frightfully important, we mustn't 

make false steps. I want next to hear your point of view about me~it might help us both." 

His 
manner was unhappy and reserved. "I don't much believe in this discussing—besides, 

I'm so dead with all this extra work Mohurram's bringing, if you'll excuse me." 

"I only want everything to be absolutely clear between us, and to answer any questions you 

care to put to me on my conduct." 

"But I haven't got any questions. You've acted within your rights, you were quite right to 

come out and have a look at me doing my work, it was an excellent plan, and anyhow it's no 

use talking further~we shou
ld only get up steam." He felt angry and bruised; he was too proud 

to tempt her back, but he did not consider that she had behaved badly, because where his 

compatriots were concerned he had a generous mind. 

"I suppose that there is nothing else; it's unpardonable of me to have given you and your 

mother all this bother," said Miss Quested heavily, and frowned up at the tree beneath which 

they were sitting. A little green bird was observing her, so brilliant and neat that it might have 

hopped str
aight out of a shop. On catching her eye it closed its own, gave a small skip and prepared 

to go to bed. Some Indian wild bird. "Yes, nothing else," she repeated, feeling that a profound 

and passionate speech ought to have been delivered by one or both of them. "We've 

been awfully British over it, but I suppose that's all right." 

"As we are British, I suppose it is." 

"Anyhow we've not quarrelled, Ronny." 

"Oh, that would have been too absurd. Why should we quarrel?" 

"I think we shall keep frie
nds." 



"I know we shall." 

"Quite so." 

As soon as they had exchanged this admission, a wave of relief passed through them both, 

and then transformed itself into a wave of tenderness, and passed back. They were softened by 

their own honesty, and began to feel lonely and unwise. Experiences, not character, divided 

them; they were not dissimilar, as humans go; indeed, when compared with the people who 

stood nearest to them in point of space they became practically identical. The Bhil who was 

h
olding an officer's polo pony, the Eurasian who drove the Nawab Bahadur's car, the Nawab 

Bahadur 

himself, the Nawab Bahadur's debauched grandson—none would have examined a difficulty 

so frankly and coolly. The mere fact of examination caused it to diminish. Of course they 

were friends, and for ever. "Do you know what the name of that green bird up above us is?" she 

asked, putting her shoulder rather nearer to his. 

"Bee-eater." 

"Oh no, Ronny, it has red bars on its wings." 

"Parrot," he haz
arded. 

"Good gracious no." 

The bird in question dived into the dome of the tree. It was of no importance, yet they 

would have liked to identify it, it would somehow have solaced their hearts. But nothing in India 

is identifiable, the mere asking of a question causes it to disappear or to merge in something 

else. 

"McBryde has an illustrated bird book," he said dejectedly. "I'm no good at all at birds, in 

fact I'm useless at any information outside my own job. It's a great pity." 

"So am I. I'
m useless at everything." 

"What do I hear?" shouted the Nawab Bahadur at the top of his voice, causing both of them 

to start. "What most improbable statement have I heard? An English lady useless? No, no, no, 

no, no." He laughed genially, sure, within limits, of his welcome. 

"Hallo, Nawab Bahadur! Been watching the polo again?" said Ronny tepidly. 

"I have, sahib, I have." 

"How do you do?" said Adela, likewise pulling herself together. She held out her hand. The 

old gentleman judged from so wa
nton a gesture that she was new to his country, but he paid 

little heed. Women who exposed their face became by that one act so mysterious to him that 

he took them at the valuation of their men folk rather than at his own. Perhaps they were not 

immoral, and anyhow they were not his affair. On seeing the City Magistrate alone with a 

maiden at twilight, he had borne down on them with hospitable intent. He had a new little car, 

and wished to place it at their disposal; the City Magistrate would deci
de whether the offer was 

acceptable. 

Ronny was by this time rather ashamed of his curtness to Aziz and Godbole, and here was 

an opportunity of showing that he could treat Indians with consideration when they deserved it. 

So he said to Adela, with the same sad friendliness that he had employed when discussing the 

bird, "Would half an hour's spin entertain you at all?" 

"Oughtn't we to get back to the bungalow?" 

"Why?" He gazed at her. 

"I think perhaps I ought to see your mother and dis cuss f
uture plans." 

"That's as you like, but there's no hurry, is there?" 

"Let me take you to the bungalow, and first the little spin," cried the old man, and hastened 

to the car. 

"He may show you some aspect of the country I can't, and he's a real loyalist. I thought you 

might care for a bit of a change." 

Determined to give him no more trouble, she agreed, but her desire to see India had suddenly 

decreased. There had been a factitious element in it. 

How should they seat themselves in the car? Th
e elegant grandson had to be left behind. 



The Nawab Bahadur got up in front, for he had no intention of neighbouring an English girl. 

"Despite my advanced years, I am learning to drive," he said. "Man can learn everything if he 

will but try." And foreseeing a further difficulty, he added, "I do not do the actual steering. I sit 

and ask my chauffeur questions, and thus learn the reason for everything that is done before I 

do it myself By this method serious and I may say ludicrous accidents, suc
h as befell one of my 

compatriots during that delightful reception at the English Club, are avoided. Our good Panna 

Lai! I hope, sahib, that great damage was not done to your flowers. Let us have our little spin 

down the Gangavati road. Half one league onwards!" He fell asleep. 

! Ronny instructed the chauffeur to take the Marabar road rather than the Gangavati, since 

the latter was under repair, and settled himself down beside the lady he had lost. The car made 

a burring noise and rushed along 
a chaussEe that ran upon an embankment above melancholy 

fields. Trees of a poor quality bordered, the road, indeed the whole scene was inferior, and 

suggested 

that the countryside was too vast to admit of excellence. In vain did each item in it call 

out, "Come, come." There was not enough god to go round. The two young people conversed 

feebly and felt unimportant. When the darkness began, it seemed to well out of the meagre 

vegetation, entirely covering the fields each side of them before it br
immed over the road. 

Ronny's face grew dim—an event that always increased her esteem for his character. Her hand 

touched his, owing to a jolt, and one of the thrills so frequent in the animal kingdom passed 

between them, and announced that all their difficulties were only a lovers' quarrel. Each was 

too proud to increase the pressure, but neither withdrew it, and a spurious unity descended on 

them, as local and temporary as the gleam that inhabits a firefly. It would vanish in a moment, 

perha
ps to reappear, but the darkness is alone durable. And the night that encircled them, absolute 

as it seemed, was itself only a spurious unity, being modified by the gleams of day that 

leaked up round the edges of the earth, and by the stars. 

They gripped . . . bump, jump, a swerve, two wheels lifted in the air, brakes on, bump with 

tree at edge of embankment, standstill. An accident. A slight one. Nobody hurt. The Nawab 

Bahadur 

awoke. He cried out in Arabic, and violently tugged his beard. 

"W
hat's the damage?" enquired Ronny, after the moment's pause that he permitted himself 

before taking charge of a situation. The Eurasian, inclined to be flustered, rallied to the sound 

of his voice, and, every inch an Englishman, replied, "You give me five minutes' time, I'll take 

you any dam anywhere." 

"Frightened, Adela?" He released her hand. 

"Not a bit." 

"I consider not to be frightened the height of folly," cried the Nawab Bahadur quite rudely. 

"Well, it's all over now, tears are useless,
" said Ronny, dismounting. "We had some luck 

butting that tree." 

"All over ... oh yes, the danger is past, let us smoke cigarettes, let us do anything we 

please. Oh yes . . enjoy ourselves—oh my merciful God ..." His words died into Arabic again. 

"Wasn't the bridge. We skidded." 

"We didn't skid," said Adela, who had seen the cause of the accident, and thought everyone 

must have seen it too. "We ran into an animal." 

A loud cry broke from the old man: his terror was disproportionate and ridic
ulous. 

"An animal?" 

"A large animal rushed up out of the dark on the right and hit us." 

"By Jove, she's right," Ronny exclaimed. "The paint's gone." 

"By Jove, sir, your lady is right," echoed the Eurasian. Just by the hinges of the door was a 

dent, and the door opened with difficulty. 

"Of course I'm right. I saw its hairy back quite plainly." 

"I say, Adela, what was it?" 

"I don't know the animals any better than the birds here— too big for a goat." 



"Exactly, too big for a goat ..." sa
id the old man. 

Ronny said, "Let's go into this; let's look for its tracks." 

"Exactly; you wish to borrow this electric torch." 

The English people walked a few steps back into the darkness, united and happy. Thanks to 

their youth and upbringing, they were not upset by the accident. They traced back the writhing 

of the tyres to the source of their disturbance. It was just after the exit from a bridge; the animal 

had probably come up out of the nullah. Steady and smooth ran the marks of the car, 
ribbons 

neatly nicked with lozenges, then all went mad. Certainly some external force had impinged, 

but the road had been used by too many objects for any one track to be legible, and 

the torch created such high lights and black shadows that they could not interpret what it revealed. 

Moreover, Adela in her excitement knelt and swept her skirts about, until it was she if 

anyone who appeared to have attacked the car. The incident was a great relief to them both. 

They forgot their abortive persona
l relationship, and felt adventurous as they muddied about in 

the dust. 

"I believe it was a buffalo," she called to their host, who had not accompanied them. 

"Exactly." 

"Unless it was a hyena." 

Ronny approved this last conjecture. Hyenas prowl in nullahs and headlights dazzle them. 

"Excellent, a hyena," said the Indian with an angry irony and a gesture at the night. "Mr. 

Harris!" 

"Haifa mo-ment. Give me ten minutes' time." 

" Sahib says hyena. " 

"Don't worry Mr. Harris. He saved us from 
a nasty smash. Harris, well done! " 

"A smash, sahib, that would not have taken place had he obeyed and taken us Gangavati 

side, instead of Marabar." 

"My fault that. I told him to come this way because the road's better. Mr. Lesley has made it 

pukka right up to the hills." 

"Ah, now I begin to understand." Seeming to pull himself together, he apologized slowly and 

elaborately for the accident. Ronny murmured, "Not at all," but apologies were his due, and 

should have started sooner: because Engl
ish people are so calm at a crisis, it is not to be assumed 

that they are unimportant. The Nawab Bahadur had not come out very well. 

At that moment a large car approached from the opposite direction. Ronny advanced a few 

steps down the road, and with authority in his voice and gesture stopped it. It bore the inscription 

Mudkul State" across its bonnet. All friskiness and friendliness. Miss Derek sat inside. 

Mr. Heaslop, Miss Quested, what are you holding up an innocent female for?" 

We've had a 
breakdown." 

But how putrid!" 

We ran into a hyena! " 

How absolutely rotten! " 

Can you give us a lift?" 

Yes, indeed." 

Take me too," said the Nawab Bahadur. 

Heh, what about me?" cried Mr. Harris. 

Now what's all this? I'm not an omnibus," said Miss Derek with decision. "I've a harmonium 
and two dogs in here with me as it is. I'll take three of you if one'! ! sit in front and nurse a pug. 
No more." 

"I will sit in front," said the Nawab Bahadur. 
"Then hop in: I've no notion who you are." 

"
Heh no, what about my dinner? I can't be left alone all the night." Trying to look and feel 
like a European, the chauffeur interposed aggressively. He still wore a topi, despite the darkness, 
and his face, to which the Ruling Race had contributed little beyond bad teeth, peered out 
of it pathetically, and seemed to say, "What's it all about? Don't worry me so, you blacks and 



whites. Here I am, stuck in dam India same as you, and you got to fit me in better than this." 

"Nussu will bring you out som
e suitable dinner upon a bicycle," said the Nawab Bahadur, 

who had regained his usual dignity. "I shall despatch him with all possible speed. Meanwhile, 

repair my car." 

They sped ofi^, and Mr. Harris, after a reproachfial glance, squatted down upon his hams. 

When English and Indians were both present, he grew self-conscious, because he did not know 

to whom he belonged. For a little he was vexed by opposite currents in his blood, then they 

blended, and he belonged to no one but himself 

But Mis
s Derek was in tearing spirits. She had succeeded in stealing the Mudkul car. Her 

Maharajah would be awfully sick, but she didn't mind, he could sack her if he liked. "I don't believe 

in these people letting you down," she said. "If I didn't snatch like the devil, I should be 

nowhere. He doesn't want the car, silly fool! Surely it's to the credit of his State I should be 

seen about in it at Chandrapore during my leave. He ought to look at it that way. Anyhow he's 

got to look at it that way. My Ma
harani's different—my Maharani's a dear. That's her fox terrier, 

poor little devil. I fished them out both with the driver. Imagine taking dogs to a Chiefs' 

Conference! 

As sensible as taking Chiefs, perhaps." She shrieked with laughter. "The harmonium—the 

harmonium's my little mistake, I own. They rather had me over the harmonium. I meant it to 

stop on the train. Oh lor' ! " 

Ronny laughed with restraint. He did not approve of English people taking service under the 

Native States, where th
ey obtain a certain amount of influence, but at the expense of the general 

prestige. The humorous triumphs of a free lance are of no assistance to an administrator, 

and he told the young lady that she would outdo Indians at their own game if she went on 

much longer. 

"They always sack me before that happens, and then I get another job. The whole of India 

seethes with Maharanis and Ranis and Begums who clamour for such as me." 

"Really. I had no idea." 

"How could you have any idea, Mr. Heaslop? 
What should he know about Maharanis, Miss 

Quested? Nothing. At least I should hope not." 

"I understand those big people are not particularly interesting," said Adela, quietly, disliking 

the young woman's tone. Her hand touched Ronny's again in the darkness, and to the animal 

thrill there was now added a coincidence of opinion. 

"Ah, there you're wrong. They're priceless." 

"I would scarcely call her wrong," broke out the Nawab Bahadur, from his isolation on the 

front seat, whither they had rele
gated him. "A Native State, a Hindu State, the wife of a ruler of 

a Hindu State, may beyond doubt be a most excellent lady, and let it not be for a moment supposed 

that I suggest anything against the character of Her Highness the Maharani of Mudkul. 

But I fear she will be uneducated, I fear she will be superstitious. Indeed, how could she be 

otherwise? What opportunity of education has such a lady had? Oh, superstition is terrible, terrible! 

oh, it is the great defect in our Indian character! "
and as if to point his criticism, the 

lights of the civil station appeared on a rise to the right. He grew more and more voluble. "Oh, 

it is the duty of each and every citizen to shake superstition off, and though I have little experience 

of Hindu States, and none of this particular one, namely Mudkul (the Ruler, I fancy, has a 

salute of but eleven guns)— yet I cannot imagine that they have been as successful as British 

India, where we see reason and orderliness spreading in every direction, l
ike a most healthgiving 

flood!" 

Miss Derek said "Golly!" 

Undeterred by the expletive, the old man swept on. His tongue had been loosed and his 

mind had several points to make. He wanted to endorse Miss Quested's remark that big people 

are not interesting, because he was bigger himself than many an independent chief; at the 

same time, he must neither remind nor inform her that he was big, lest she felt she had committed 

a discourtesy. This was the groundwork of his oration; worked in with it w
as his gratitude 



to Miss Derek for the lift, his wilhngness to hold a repulsive dog in his arms, and his general 

regret for the trouble he had caused the human race during the evening. Also he wanted to 

be dropped near the city to get hold of his cleaner, and to see what mischief his grandson was 

up to. As he wove all these anxieties into a single rope, he suspected that his audience felt no 

interest, and that the City Magistrate fondled either maiden behind the cover of the harnionium, 

but g
ood breeding compelled him to continue; it was nothing to him if they were bored, because 

he did not know what boredom is, and it was nothing to him if they were licentious, because 

God has created all races to be different. The accident was over, and his life, equably 

useful, distinguished, happy, ran on as before and expressed itself in streams of well-chosen 

words. 

When this old geyser left them, Ronny made no comment, but talked lightly about polo; 

Turton had taught him that it is sounder n
ot to discuss a man at once, and he reserved what he 

had to say on the Nawab's character until later in the evening. His hand, which he had removed 

to say good-bye, touched Adela's again; she caressed it definitely, he responded, and their firm 

and mutual pressure surely meant something. They looked at each other when they reached 

the bungalow, for Mrs. Moore was inside it. It was for Miss Quested to speak, and she said 

nervously, "Ronny, I should like to take back what I said on the Maidan." He 
assented, and they 

became engaged to be married in consequence. 

Neither had foreseen such a consequence. She had meant to revert to her former condition 

of important and cultivated uncertainty, but it had passed out of her reach at its appropriate 

hour. Unlike the green bird or the hairy animal, she was labelled now. She felt humiliated again, 

for she deprecated labels, and she felt too that there should have been another scene between 

her lover and herself at this point, something dramatic and
 lengthy. He was pleased instead of 

distressed, he was surprised, but he had really nothing to say. What indeed is there to say? To 

be or not to be married, that was the question, and they had decided it in the affirmative. 

"Come along and let's tell the mater all this "--opening the perforated zinc door that protected 

the bungalow from the swarms of winged creatures. The noise woke the mater up. She 

had been dreaming of the absent children who were so seldom mentioned, Ralph and Stella, 

and di
d not at first grasp what was required of her. She too had become used to thoughtful 

procrastination, 

and felt alarmed when it came to an end. 

When the announcement was over, he made a gracious and honest remark. "Look here, 

both of you, see India if you like and as you like~I know I made myself rather ridiculous at 

Fielding's, but . . . it's different now. I wasn't quite sure of myself " 

"My duties here are evidently finished, I don't want to see India now; now for my passage 

back," was Mrs.
 Moore's thought. She reminded herself of all that a happy marriage means, and 

of her own happy marriages, one of which had produced Ronny. Adela's parents had also been 

happily married, and excellent it was to see the incident repeated by the younger generation. 

On and on! the number of such unions would certainly increase as education spread and ideals 

grew loftier, and characters firmer. But she was tired by her visit to Government College, her 

feet ached, Mr. Fielding had walked too fast and 
far, the young people had annoyed her in the 

turn-turn, and given her to suppose they were breaking with each other, and though it was all 

right now she could not speak as enthusiastically of wedlock or of anything as she should have 

done. Ronny was suited, now she must go home and help the others, if they wished. She was 

past marrying herself, even unhappily; her function was to help others, her reward to be informed 

that she was sympathetic. Elderly ladies must not expect more than this. 

They
 dined alone. There was much pleasant and affectionate talk about the future. Later on 

they spoke of passing events, and Ronny reviewed and recounted the day from his own point of 

view. It was a different day from the women's because while they had enjoyed themselves or 

thought, he had worked. Mohurram was approaching, and as usual the Chandrapore Mohammedans 

were building paper towers of a size too large to pass under the branches of a certain 

pepul tree. One knew what happened next; the tower s
tuck, a Mohammedan climbed up the 



pepul and cut the branch off, the Hindus protested, there was a religious riot, and Heaven knew 

what, with perhaps the troops sent for. There had been deputations and conciliation committees 

under the auspices of Turton, and all the normal work of Chandrapore had been hung up. 

Should the procession take another route, or should the towers be shorter? The Mohammedans 

offered the former, the Hindus insisted on the latter. The Collector had favoured the Hindus, un
til 

he suspected that they had artificially bent the tree nearer the ground. They said it sagged 

naturally. Measurements, plans, an official visit to the spot. But Ronny had not disliked his day, 

for it proved that the British were necessary to India; there would certainly have been bloodshed 

without them. His voice grew complacent again; he was here not to be pleasant but to 

keep the peace, and now that Adela had promised to be his wife, she was sure to understand. 

"What does our old gentleman
 of the car think?" she asked, and her negligent tone was exactly 

what he desired. 

"Our old gentleman is helpful and sound, as he always is over public affairs. You've seen in 

him our show Indian." 

"Have I really?" 

"I'm afraid so. Incredible, aren't they, even the best of them? They're all—they all forget 

their back collar studs sooner or later. You've had to do with three sets of Indians to-day, the 

Bhattacharyas, Aziz, and this chap, and it really isn't a coincidence that they've all let 
you 

down." 

"I like Aziz, Aziz is my real friend," Mrs. Moore interposed. 

"When the animal runs into us the Nawab loses his head, deserts his unfortunate chauffeur, 

intrudes upon Miss Derek ... no great crimes, no great crimes, but no white man would have 

done it." 

"What animal?" 

"Oh, we had a small accident on the Marabar Road. Adela thinks it was a hyena." 

"An accident?" she cried. 

"Nothing; no one hurt. Our excellent host awoke much rattled from his dreams, appeared to 

think it was ou
r fault, and chanted exactly, exactly." 

Mrs. Moore shivered, "A ghost!" But the idea of a ghost scarcely passed her lips. The young 

people did not take it up, being occupied with their own outlooks, and deprived of support it 

perished, or was reabsorbed into the part of the mind that seldom speaks. 

"Yes, nothing criminal," Ronny summed up, "but there's the native, and there's one of the 

reasons why we don't admit him to our clubs, and how a decent girl like Miss Derek can take 

service under nat
ives puzzles me. . . . But I must get on with my work. Krishna!" Krishna was 

the peon who should have brought the files from his office. He had not turned up, and a terrific 

row ensued. Ronny stormed, shouted, howled, and only the experienced observer could tell that 

he was not angry, did not much want the files, and only made a row because it was the custom. 

Servants, quite understanding, ran slowly in circles, carrying hurricane lamps. Krishna the earth, 

Krishna the stars replied, until the Eng
lishman was appeased by their echoes, fined the absent 

peon eight annas, and sat down to his arrears in the next room. 

"Will you play Patience with your future mother-inlaw, dear Adela, or does it seem too 

tame?" 

"I should like to~I don't feel a bit excited—I'm just glad it's settled up at last, but I'm not 

conscious of vast changes. We are all three the same people still." 

"That's much the best feeling to have." She dealt out the first row of "demon." 

"I suppose so," said the girl thoughtf
ully. 

"I feared at Mr. Fielding's that it might be settled the other way . . . black knave on a red 

queen. ..." They chatted gently about the game. 

Presently Adela said: "You heard me tell Aziz and Godbole I wasn't stopping in their country. 

I didn't mean it, so why did I say it? I feel I haven't been— frank enough, attentive enough, or 

something. It's as if I got everything out of proportion. You have been so very good to me, and 

I meant to be good when I sailed, but somehow I haven't been. 
. . . Mrs. Moore, if one isn't 



absolutely 

honest, what is the use of existing?" 

She continued to lay out her cards. The words were obscure, but she understood the uneasiness 

that produced them. She had experienced it twice herself, during her own 

engagements—this vague contrition and doubt. All had come right enough afterwards and 

doubtless would this time—marriage makes most things right enough. "I wouldn't worry," she 

said. "It's partly the odd surroundings; you and I keep on attendin
g to trifles instead of what's 

important; we are what the people here call 'new.'" 

"You mean that my bothers are mixed up with India?" 

"India's—" She stopped. 

"What made you call it a ghost?" 

"Call what a ghost?" 

"The animal thing that hit us. Didn't you say 'Oh, a ghost,' in passing." 

"I couldn't have been thinking of what I was saying." 

"It was probably a hyena, as a matter of fact." 

"Ah, very likely." 

And they went on with their Patience. Down in Chandrapore the Nawab Bahadur waite
d for 

his car. He sat behind his town house (a small unfurnished building which he rarely entered) in 

the midst of the little court that always improvises itself round Indians of position. As if turbans 

were the natural product of darkness a fresh one would occasionally froth to the front, incline 

itself towards him, and retire. He was preoccupied, his diction was appropriate to a religious 

subject. Nine years previously, when first he had had a car, he had driven it over a drunken man 

and kill
ed him, and the man had been waiting for him ever since. The Nawab Bahadut was innocent 

before God and the Law, he had paid double the compensation necessary; but it was no 

use, the man continued to wait in an unspeakable form, close to the scene of his death. None 

of the English people knew of this, nor did the chauffeur; it was a racial secret communicable 

more by blood than speech. He spoke now in horror of the particular circumstances; he had led 

others into danger, he had risked the lives of
 two innocent and honoured guests. He repeated, 

"If I had been killed, what matter? it must happen sometime; but they who trusted me—" The 

company shuddered and invoked the mercy of God. Only Aziz held aloof, because a personal 

experience restrained him: was it not by despising ghosts that he had come to know Mrs. 

Moore? "You know, Nureddin," he whispered to the grandson— an effeminate youth whom he 

seldom met, always liked, and invariably forgot—" you know, my dear fellow, we Moslems simpl
y 

must get rid of these superstitions, or India will never advance. How long must I hear of the 

savage pig upon the Marabar Road?" Nureddin looked down. Aziz continued: "Your grandfather 

belongs to another generation, and I respect and love the old gentleman, as you know. I say 

nothing against him, only that it is wrong for us, because we are young. I want you to promise 

me— Nureddin, are you listening?— not to believe in Evil Spirits, and if I die (for my health grows 

very weak) to bring u
p my three children to disbelieve in them too." Nureddin smiled, and a 

suitable answer rose to his pretty lips, but before he could make it the car arrived, and his 

grandfather took him away. 

The game of Patience up in the civil lines went on longer than this. Mrs. Moore continued to 

murmur "Red ten on a black knave," Miss Quested to assist her, and to intersperse among the 

intricacies of the play details about the hyena, the engagement, the Maharani of Mudkul, the 

Bhattacharyas, and the day ge
nerally, whose rough desiccated surface acquired as it receded a 

definite outline, as India itself might, could it be viewed from the moon. Presently the players 

went to bed, but not before other people had woken up elsewhere, people whose emotions 

they could not share, and whose existence they ignored. Never tranquil, never perfectly dark, 

the night wore itself away, distinguished from other nights by two or three blasts of wind, which 

seemed to fall perpendicularly out of the sky and to bounce 
back into it, hard and compact, 

leaving no freshness behind them: the hot weather was approaching. 

CHAPTER IX 



Aziz fell ill as he foretold—slightly ill. Three days later he lay abed in his bungalow, pretending 

to be very ill. It was a touch of fever, which he would have neglected if there was anything 

important at the hospital. Now and then he groaned and thought he should die, but did not 

think so for long, and a very little diverted him. It was Sunday, always an equivocal day in the 

Eas
t, and an excuse for slacking. He could hear church bells as he drowsed, both from the civil 

station and from the missionaries out beyond the slaughter house—different bells and rung with 

different intent, for one set was calling firmly to Anglo-India, and the other feebly to mankind. 

He did not object to the first set; the other he ignored, knowing their inefficiency. Old Mr. 

Graysford 

and young Mr. Sorley made converts during a famine, because they distributed food; but 

when times improved 
they were naturally left alone again, and though surprised and aggrieved 

each time this happened, they never learnt wisdom. "No Englishman understands us except Mr. 

Fielding," he thought; "but how shall I see him again? If he entered this room the disgrace of it 

would kill me." He called to Hassan to clear up, but Hassan, who was testing his wages by ringing 

them on the step of the verandah, found it possible not to hear him; heard and didn't hear, 

just as Aziz had called and hadn't called. "That
's India all over . . . how like us . . . there we are 

..." He dozed again, and his thoughts wandered over the varied surface of life. 

Gradually they steadied upon a certain spot— the Bottomless Pit according to missionaries, 

but he had never regarded it as more than a dimple. Yes, he did want to spend an evening with 

some girls, singing and all that, the vague jollity that would culminate in voluptuousness. Yes, 

that was what he did want. How could it be managed? If Major Callendar had been an
 Indian, 

he would have remembered what young men are, and granted two or three days' leave to Calcutta 

without asking questions. But the Major assumed either that his subordinates were made 

of ice, or that they repaired to the Chandrapore bazaars— disgusting ideas both. It was only Mr. 

Fielding who 

"Hassan! 

The servant came running. 

"Look at those flies, brother;" and he pointed to the horrible mass that hung from the ceiling. 

The nucleus was a wire which had been inserted as a homage to 
electricity. Electricity had 

paid no attention, and a colony of eye-flies had come instead and blackened the coils with their 

bodies. 

"Huzoor, those are flies." 

"Good, good, they are, excellent, but why have I called you?" 

"To drive them elsewhere," said Hassan, after painful thought. 

"Driven elsewhere, they always return." 

"Huzoor." 

"You must make some arrangement against flies; that is why you are my servant," said Aziz 

gently. 

Hassan would call the little boy to borrow the stepladder
 from Mahmoud All's house; he 

would order the cook to light the Primus stove and heat water; he would personally ascend the 

steps with a bucket in his arms, and dip the end of the coil into it. 

"Good, very good. Now what have you to do?" 

"Kill flies." 

"Good. Doit." 

Hassan withdrew, the plan almost lodged in his head, and began to look for the little boy. 

Not finding him, his steps grew slower, and he stole back to his post on the verandah, but did 

not go on testing his rupees, in case his m
aster heard them clink. On twittered the Sunday 

bells; the East had returned to the East via the suburbs of England, and had become ridiculous 

during the detour. 

Aziz continued to think about beautiful women. 

His mind here was hard and direct, though not brutal. He had learnt all he needed concerning 

his own constitution many years ago, thanks to the social order into which he had been 



born, and when he came to study medicine he was repelled by the pedantry and fuss with 

which Europe tabula
tes the facts of sex. Science seemed to discuss everything from the wrong 

end. It didn't interpret his experiences when he found them in a German manual, because by 

being there they ceased to be his experiences. What he had been told by his father or mother 

or had picked up from servants—it was information of that sort that he found useful, and 

handed on as occasion offered to others. 

But he must not bring any disgrace on his children by some silly escapade. Imagine if it got 

about that he wa
s not respectable! His professional position too must be considered, whatever 

Major Callendar thought. Aziz upheld the proprieties, though he did not invest them with any 

moral halo, and it was here that he chiefly differed from an Englishman. His conventions were 

social. There is no harm in deceiving society as long as she does not find you out, because it is 

only when she finds you out that you have harmed her; she is not like a friend or God, who are 

injured by the mere existence of unfaithful
ness. Quite clear about this, he meditated what type 

of lie he should tell to get away to Calcutta, and had thought of a man there who could be 

trusted to send him a wire and a letter that he could show to Major Callendar, when the noise of 

wheels was heard in his compound. Someone had called to enquire. The thought of sympathy 

increased his fever, and with a sincere groan he wrapped himself in his quilt. 

"Aziz, my dear fellow, we are greatly concerned," said Hamidullah's voice. One, two, three, 


four bumps, as people sat down upon his bed. 

"When a doctor falls ill it is a serious matter," said the voice of Mr. Syed Mohammed, the assistant 

engineer. 

"When an engineer falls ill, it is equally important," said the voice of Mr. Haq, a police inspector. 

"Oh yes, we are all jolly important, our salaries prove it." 

"Dr. Aziz took tea with our Principal last Thursday afternoon," piped Rafi, the engineer's 

nephew. "Professor Godbole, who also attended, has sickened too, which seems rather a c
urious 

thing, sir, does it not?" 

Flames of suspicion leapt up in the breast of each man. "Humbug! " exclaimed Hamidullah, 

in authoritative tones, quenching them. 

"Humbug, most certainly," echoed the others, ashamed of themselves. The wicked schoolboy, 

having failed to start a scandal, lost confidence and stood up with his back to the wall. 

"Is Professor Godbole ill?" enquired Aziz, penetrated by the news. "I am sincerely sorry." 

Intelligent and compassionate, his face peeped out of the bright
 crimson folds of the quilt. 

"How do you do, Mr. Syed Mohammed, Mr. Haq? How very kind of you to enquire after my 

health! How do you do, Hamidullah? But you bring me bad news. What is wrong with him, the 

excellent fellow?" 

"Why don't you answer, Rafi? You're the great authority," said his uncle. 

"Yes, Rafi's the great man," said Hamidullah, rubbing it in. "Rafi is the Sherlock Holmes of 

Chandrapore. Speak up, Rafi." 

Less than the dust, the schoolboy murmured the word "Diarrhcra," but took cou
rage as 

soon as it had been uttered, for it improved his position. Flames of suspicion shot up again in 

the breasts of his elders, though in a different direction. Could what was called diarrhcea really 

be an early case of cholera? 

"If this is so, this is a very serious thing: this is scarcely the end of March. Why have I not 

been informed?" cried Aziz. 

"Dr. Panna Lai attends him, sir." 

"Oh yes, both Hindus; there we have it; they hang together like files and keep everything 

dark. Rafi, com
e here. Sit down. Tell me all the details. Is there vomiting also?" 

"Oh yes indeed, sir, and the serious pains." 

"That settles it. In twenty-four hours he will be dead." 

Everybody looked and felt shocked, but Professor Godbole had diminished his appeal by 

linking himself with a co-religionist. He moved them less than when he had appeared as a suffering 

individual. Before long they began to condemn him as a source of infection. "All illness 



proceeds from Hindus," Mr. Haq said. Mr. Syed Mohamme
d had visited religious fairs, at 

Allahabad 

and at Ujjain, and described them with biting scorn. At Allahabad there was flowing water, 

which carried impurities away, but at Ujjain the little river Sipra was banked up, and thousands 

of bathers deposited their germs in the pool. He spoke with disgust of the hot sun, the cowdung 

and marigold flowers, and the encampment of saddhus, some of whom strode stark naked 

through the streets. Asked what was the name of the chief idol at Ujjain, he replied t
hat he 

did not know, he had disdained to enquire, he really could not waste his time over such trivialities. 

His outburst took some time, and in his excitement he fell into Punjabi (he came from that 

side) and was unintelligible. 

Aziz liked to hear his religion praised. It soothed the surface of his mind, and allowed beautiful 

images to form beneath. When the engineer's noisy tirade was finished, he said, "That is 

exactly my own view." He held up his hand, palm outward, his eyes began to glow, 
his heart to 

fill with tenderness. Issuing still farther from his quilt, he recited a poem by Ghalib. It had no 

connection with anything that had gone before, but it came from his heart and spoke to theirs. 

They were overwhelmed by its pathos; pathos, they agreed, is the highest quality in art; a 

poem should touch the hearer with a sense of his own weakness, and should institute some 

comparison between mankind and flowers. The squalid bedroom grew quiet; the silly intrigues, 

the gossip, the sha
llow discontent were stilled, while words accepted as immortal filled the 

indifferent 

air. Not as a call to battle, but as a calm assurance came the feeling that India was 

one; Moslem; always had been; an assurance that lasted until they looked out of the door. 

Whatever Ghalib had felt, he had anyhow lived in India, and this consolidated it for them: he 

had gone with his own tulips and roses, but tulips and roses do not go. And the sister kingdoms 

of the north— Arabia, Persia, Ferghana, Turke
stan— stretched out their hands as he sang, sadly, 

because all beauty is sad, and greeted ridiculous Chandrapore, where every street and house 

was divided against itself, and told her that she was a continent and a unity. 

Of the company, only Hamidullah had any comprehension of poetry. The minds of the others 

were inferior and rough. Yet they listened with pleasure, because literature had not been divorced 

from their civilization. The police inspector, for instance, did not feel that Aziz had d
egraded 

himself by reciting, nor break into the cheery guffaw with which an Englishman averts 

the infection of beauty. He just sat with his mind empty, and when his thoughts, which were 

mainly ignoble, flowed back into it they had a pleasant freshness. The poem had done no 

"good" to anyone, but it was a passing reminder, a breath from the divine lips of beauty, a 

nightingale between two worlds of dust. Less explicit than the call to Krishna, it voiced our 

loneliness 

nevertheless, our isolatio
n, our need for the Friend who never comes yet is not entirely 

disproved. Aziz it left thinking about women again, but in a different way: less deflnite, more 

intense. Sometimes poetry had this effect on him, sometimes it only increased his local desires, 

and he never knew beforehand which effect would ensue: he could discover no rule for this or 

for anything else in life. 

Hamidullah had called in on his way to a worrying committee of notables, nationalist in tendency, 

where Hindus, Moslems, tw
o Sikhs, two Parsis, a Jam, and a Native Christian tried to like 

one another more than came natural to them. As long as someone abused the English, all went 

well, but nothing constructive had been achieved, and if the English were to leave India, the 

committee would vanish also. He was glad that Aziz, whom he loved and whose family was 

connected with his own, took no interest in politics, which ruin the character and career, yet 

nothing can be achieved without them. He thought of Cambridge— sad
ly, as of another poem 

that had ended. How happy he had been there, twenty years ago! Politics had not mattered in 

Mr. and Mrs. Bannister's rectory. There, games, work, and pleasant society had interwoven, and 

appeared to be sufficient substructure for a national life. Here all was wire-pulling and fear. 

Messrs. Syed Mohammed and Haq— he couldn't even trust them, although they had come in his 



carriage, and the schoolboy was a scorpion. Bending down, he said, "Aziz, Aziz, my dear boy, 

we mus
t be going, we are already late. Get well quickly, for I do not know what our little circle 

would do without you." 

"I shall not forget those affectionate words," replied Aziz. 

"Add mine to them," said the engineer. 

"Thank you, Mr. Syed Mohammed, I will." 

"And mine," "And, sir, accept mine," cried the others, stirred each according to his capacity 

towards goodwill. Little ineffectual unquenchable flames! The company continued to sit on the 

bed and to chew sugarcane, which Hassan had run for in
to the bazaar, and Aziz drank a cup of 

spiced milk. Presently there was the sound of another carriage. Dr. Panna Lai had arrived, 

driven by horrid Mr. Ram Chand. The atmosphere of a sick-room was at once re-established, 

and the invalid retired under his quilt. 

"Gentlemen, you will excuse, I have come to enquire by Major Callendar's orders," said the 

Hindu, nervous of the den of fanatics into which his curiosity had called him. 

"Here he lies," said Hamidullah, indicating the prostrate form. 

"D
r. Aziz, Dr. Aziz, I come to enquire." 

Aziz presented an expressionless face to the thermometer. 

"Your hand also, please." He took it, gazed at the flies on the ceiling, and finally announced, 

"Some temperature." 

"I think not much," said Ram Chand, desirous of fomenting trouble. 

"Some; he should remain in bed," repeated Dr. Panna Lai, and shook the thermometer 

down, so that its altitude remained for ever unknown. He loathed his young colleague since the 

disasters with Dapple, and he would hav
e liked to do him a bad turn and report to Major Callendar 

that he was shamming. But he might want a day in bed himself soon, —besides, though 

Major Callendar always believed the worst of natives, he never believed them when they carried 

tales about one another. Sympathy seemed the safer course. "How is stomach?" he enquired, 

"how head?" And catching sight of the empty cup, he recommended a milk diet. 

"This is a great relief to us, it is very good of you to call. Doctor Sahib," said Hamidullah,
 

buttering him up a bit. 

"It is only my duty." 

"We know how busy you are." 

"Yes, that is true." 

"And how much illness there is in the city." 

The doctor suspected a trap in this remark; if he admitted that there was or was not illness, 

either statement might be used against him. "There is always illness," he replied, "and I am always 

busy—it is a doctor's nature." 

"He has not a minute, he is due double sharp at Government College now," said Ram 

Chand. 

"You attend Professor Godbole th
ere perhaps?" 

The doctor looked professional and was silent. 

"We hope his diarrhoea is ceasing." 

"He progresses, but not from diarrhoea." 

"We are in some anxiety over him— he and Dr. Aziz are great friends. If you could tell us the 

name of his complaint we should be grateful to you." 

After a cautious pause he said, "Haemorrhoids." 

"And so much, my dear Rafi, for your cholera," hooted Aziz, unable to restrain himself 

"Cholera, cholera, what next, what now?" cried the doctor, greatly fussed
. "Who spreads 

such untrue reports about my patients?" 

Hamidullah pointed to the culprit. 

"I hear cholera, I hear bubonic plague, I hear every species of lie. Where will it end, I ask 

myself sometimes. This city is full of misstatements, and the originators of them ought to be 

discovered and punished authoritatively." 



"Rafi, do you hear that? Now why do you stuff us up with all this humbug?" 

The schoolboy murmured that another boy had told him, also that the bad English grammar 

the Govern
ment obliged them to use often gave the wrong meaning for words, and so led 

scholars into mistakes. 

"That is no reason you should bring a charge against a doctor," said Ram Chand. 

"Exactly, exactly," agreed Hamidullah, anxious to avoid an unpleasantness. Quarrels spread 

so quickly and so far, and Messrs. Syed Mohammed and Haq looked cross, and ready to fly out. 

"You must apologize properly, Rafi, I can see your uncle wishes it," he said. "You have not yet 

said that you are sorry for the trouble
 you have caused this gentleman by your carelessness." 

"It is only a boy," said Dr. Panna Lai, appeased. 

"Even boys must learn," said Ram Chand. 

"Your own son failing to pass the lowest standard, I think," said Syed Mohammed suddenly. 

"Oh, indeed? Oh yes, perhaps. He has not the advantage of a relative in the Prosperity 

Printing Press." 

"Nor you the advantage of conducting their cases in the Courts any longer. " 

Their voices rose. They attacked one another with obscure allusions and had a sil
ly quarrel. 

Hamidullali and the doctor tried to make peace between them. In the midst of the din someone 

said, "I say! Is he ill or isn't he ill?" Mr. Fielding had entered unobserved. All rose to their feet, 

and Hassan, to do an Englishman honour, struck up with a sugar-cane at the coil of flies. 

Aziz said, "Sit down," coldly. What a room! What a meeting! Squalor and ugly talk, the floor 

strewn with fragments of cane and nuts, and spotted with ink, the pictures crooked upon the 

dirty walls, no 
punkah! He hadn't meant to live like this or among these third-rate people. And 

in his confusion he thought only of the insignificant Rafi, whom he had laughed at, and allowed 

to be teased. The boy must be sent away happy, or hospitality would have failed, along the 

whole line. 

"It is good of Mr. Fielding to condescend to visit our friend," said the police inspector. "We 

are touched by this great kindness." 

"Don't talk to him like that, he doesn't want it, and he doesn't want three chairs; he's
 not 

three Englishmen," he flashed. "Rafi, come here. Sit down again. I'm delighted you could come 

with Mr. Hamidullah, my dear boy; it will help me to recover, seeing you." 

"Forgive my mistakes," said Rafi, to consolidate himself 

"Well, are you ill, Aziz, or aren't you?" Fielding repeated. 

"No doubt Major Callendar has told you that I am shamming." 

"Well, are you?" The company laughed, friendly and pleased. "An Englishman at his best," 

they thought; "so genial." 

"Enquire from Dr. Panna Lai
." 

"You're sure I don't tire you by stopping?" 

"Why, no! There are six people present in my small room already. Please remain seated, if 

you will excuse the informality." He turned away and continued to address Rafi, who was terrified 

at the arrival of his Principal, remembered that he had tried to spread slander about him, 

and yearned to get away. 

"He is ill and he is not ill," said Hamidullah, offering a cigarette. "And I suppose that most of 

us are in that same case." 

Fielding agreed; he
 and the pleasant sensitive barrister got on well. They were fairly intimate 

and beginning to trust each other. 

"The whole world looks to be dying, still it doesn't die, so we must assume the existence of 

a beneficent Providence." 

"Oh, that is true, how true! " said the policeman, thinking religion had been praised. 

"Does Mr. Fielding think it's true?" 

"Think which true? The world isn't dying. I'm certain of that! " 

"No, no—the existence of Providence." 

"Well, I don't believe in Providenc
e." 



"But how then can you believe in God?" asked Syed Mohammed. 

"I don't believe in God." 

A tiny movement as of "I told you so!" passed round the company, and Aziz looked up for 

an instant, scandalized. "Is it correct that most are atheists in England now?" Hamidullah enquired. 

"The educated thoughtful people? I should say so, though they don't like the name. The 

truth is that the West doesn't bother much over belief and disbelief in these days. Fifty years 

ago, or even when you and I were 
young, much more fuss was made." 

"And does not morality also decline?" 

"It depends what you call—yes, yes, I suppose morality does decline." 

"Excuse the question, but if this is the case, how is England justified in holding India?" 

There they were! Politics again. " It's a question I can't get my mind on to," he replied. "I'm 

out here personally because I needed a job. I cannot tell you why England is here or whether 

she ought to be here. It's beyond me." 

"Well-qualified Indians also need j
obs in the educational." 

"I guess they do; I got in first," said Fielding, smiling. 

"Then excuse me again—is it fair an Englishman should occupy one when Indians are available? 

Of course I mean nothing personally. Personally we are delighted you should be here, and 

we benefit greatly by this frank talk." 

There is only one answer to a conversation of this type: "England holds India for her good." 

Yet Fielding was disinclined to give it. The zeal for honesty had eaten him up. He said, "I'm 

de
lighted 

to be here too— that's my answer, there's my only excuse. I can't tell you anything about 

fairness. It mayn't have been fair I should have been bom. I take up some other fellow's air, 

don't I, whenever I breathe? Still, I'm glad it's happened, and I'm glad I'm out here. However 

big a badmash one is— if one's happy in consequence, that is some justification." 

The Indians were bewildered. The line of thought was not alien to them, but the words 

were too definite and bleak. Unless a se
ntence paid a few compliments to Justice and Morality 

in passing, its grammar wounded their ears and paralysed their minds. What they said and what 

they felt were (except in the case of affection) seldom the same. They had numerous mental 

conventions and when these were flouted they found it very difficult to function. Hamidullah 

bore up best. "And those Englishmen who are not delighted to be in India— have they no excuse?" 

he asked. 

"None. Chuck 'em out." 

"It may be difficult to separate t
hem from the rest," he laughed. 

"Worse than difficult, wrong," said Mr. Ram Chaiid. "No Indian gentleman approves chucking 

out as a proper thing. Here we differ from those other nations. We are so spiritual." 

"Oh, that is true, how true! " said the police inspector. 

"Is it true, Mr. Haq? I don't consider us spiritual. We can't co-ordinate, we can't co-ordinate, 

it only comes to that. We can't keep engagements, we can't catch trains. What more than this is 

the so-called spirituality of India? Yo
u and I ought to be at the Committee of Notables, we're 

not; our friend Dr. Lai ought to be with his patients, he isn't. So we go on, and so we shall continue 

to go, I think, until the end of time." 

"It is not the end of time, it is scarcely ten-thirty, ha, ha! " cried Dr. Panna Lai, who was 

again in confident mood. "Gentlemen, if I may be allowed to say a few words, what an interesting 

talk, also thankfulness and gratitude to Mr. Fielding in the first place teaches our sons and 

gives them all 
the great benefits of his experience and judgment— " 

"Dr. Lai!" 

"Dr. Aziz?" 

"You sit on my leg." 

"I beg pardon, but some might say your leg kicks." 

"Come along, we tire the invalid in either case," said Fielding, and they filed out— four 

Mohammedans, 



two Hindus and the Englishman. They stood on the verandah while their conveyances 

were summoned out of various patches of shade. 

"Aziz has a high opinion of you, he only did not speak because of his illness." 

"I quite understand," sai
d Fielding, who was rather disappointed with his call. The Club 

comment, "making himself cheap as usual," passed through his mind. He couldn't even get his 

horse brought up. He had liked Aziz so much at their first meeting, and had hoped for 

developments. 

CHAPTER X 

The heat had leapt forward in the last hour, the street was deserted as if a catastrophe had 

cleaned off humanity during the inconclusive talk. Opposite Aziz' bungalow stood a large 

unfinished 

house belonging to two brothers, ast
rologers, and a squirrel hung head-downwards on it, 

pressing its belly against burning scaffolding and twitching a mangy tail. It seemed the only 

occupant 

of the house, and the squeals it gave were in tune with the infinite, no doubt, but not 

attractive except to other squirrels. More noises came from a dusty tree, where brown birds 

creaked and fioundered about looking for insects; another bird, the invisible coppersmith, had 

started his "ponk ponk." It matters so little to the majority of livi
ng beings what the minority, 

that calls itself human, desires or decides. Most of the inhabitants of India do not mind how India 

is governed. Nor are the lower animals of England concerned about England, but in the 

tropics the indifference is more prominent, the inarticulate world is closer at hand and readier to 

resume control as soon as men are. tired. When the seven gentlemen who had held such various 

opinions inside the bungalow came out of it, they were aware of a common burden, a 

vague th
reat which they called "the bad weather coming." They felt that they could not do their 

work, or would not be paid enough for doing it. The space between them and their carriages, 

instead of being empty, was clogged with a medium that pressed against their fiesh, the carriage 

cushions scalded their trousers, their eyes pricked, domes of hot water accumulated under 

their head-gear and poured down their cheeks. Salaaming feebly, they dispersed for the interior 

of other bungalows, to recover their s
elf-esteem and the qualities that distinguished them from 

each other. 

All over the city and over much of India the same retreat on the part of humanity was beginning, 

into cellars, up hills, under trees. April, herald of horrors, is at hand. The sun was returning 

to his kingdom with power but without beauty—that was the sinister feature. If only 

there had been beauty! His cruelty would have been tolerable then. Through excess of light, he 

failed to triumph, he also; in his yellowy- white over
flow not only matter, but brightness itself lay 

drowned. He was not the unattainable friend, either of men or birds or other suns, he was not 

the eternal promise, the never-withdrawn suggestion that haunts our consciousness; he was 

merely a creature, like the rest, and so debarred from glory. 

CHAPTER XI 

Although the Indians had driven off, and Fielding could see his horse standing in a small 

shed in the comer of the compound, no one troubled to bring it to him. He started to get it 

himself, b
ut was stopped by a call from the house. Aziz was sitting up in bed, looking dishevelled 

and sad. "Here's your home," he said sardonically. "Here's the celebrated hospitality of the 

East. Look at the flies. Look at the chunam coming off the walls. Isn't it jolly? Now I suppose 

you want to be off, having seen an Oriental interior." 

"Anyhow, you want to rest." 

"I can rest the whole day, thanks to worthy Dr. Lai. Major Callendar's spy, I suppose you 

know, but this time it didn't work. I am allowed
 to have a slight temperature." 

"Callendar doesn't trust anyone, English or Indian: that's his character, and I wish you 

weren't under him; but you are, and that's that." 

"Before you go, for you are evidently in a great hurry, will you please unlock that drawer? 

Do you see a piece of brown paper at the top?" 



"Yes." 

"Open it." 

"Who is this?" 

"She was my wife. You are the first Englishman she has ever come before. Now put her 

photograph away." 

He was astonished, as a traveller who sudde
nly sees, between the stones of the desert, 

flowers. The fiowers have been there all the time, but suddenly he sees them. He tried to look 

at the photograph, but in itself it was just a woman in a sari, facing the world. He muttered, 

"Really, I don't know why you pay me this great compliment, Aziz, but I do appreciate it." 

"Oh, it's nothing, she was not a highly educated woman or even beautiful, but put it away. 

You would have seen her, so why should you not see her photograph?" 

"You would have
 allowed me to see her?" 

"Why not? I believe in the purdah, but I should have told her you were my brother, and she 

would have seen you. Hamidullah saw her, and several others." 

"Did she think they were your brothers?" 

"Of course not, but the word exists and is convenient. All men are my brothers, and as soon 

as one behaves as such he may see my wife." 

"And when the whole world behaves as such, there will be no more purdah?" 

"It is because you can say and feel such a remark as that, that I sh
ow you the photograph," 

said Aziz gravely. "It is beyond the power of most men. It is because you behave well while I 

behave badly that I show it you. I never expected you to come back just now when I called 

you. I thought, 'He has certainly done with me; I have insulted him.' Mr. Fielding, no one can 

ever realize how much kindness we Indians need, we do not even realize it ourselves. But we 

know when it has been given. We do not forget, though we may seem to. Kindness, more kindness, 

and even 
after that more kindness. I assure you it is the only hope." His voice seemed to 

arise from a dream. Altering it, yet still deep below his normal surface, he said, "We can't build 

up India except on what we feel. What is the use of all these reforms, and Conciliation Committees 

for Mohurram, and shall we cut the tazia short or shall we carry it another route, and 

Councils of Notables and official parties where the English sneer at our skins?" 

"It's beginning at the wrong end, isn't it? I know, bu
t institutions and the governments 

don't." He looked again at the photograph. The lady faced the world at her husband's wish and 

her own, but how bewildering she found it, the echoing contradictory world! 

"Put her away, she is of no importance, she is dead," said Aziz gently. "I showed her to you 

because I have nothing else to show. You may look round the whole of my bungalow now, and 

empty everything. I have no other secrets, my three children live away with their grandmamma, 

and that is all."
 

Fielding sat down by the bed, flattered at the trust reposed in him, yet rather sad. He felt 

old. He wished that he too could be carried away on waves of emotion. The next time they met, 

Aziz might be cautious and standoffish. He realized this, and it made him sad that he should 

realize it. Kindness, kindness, and more kindness—yes, that he might supply, but was that really 

all that the queer nation needed? Did it not also demand an occasional intoxication of the 

blood? What had he done to d
eserve this outburst of confidence, and what hostage could he 

give in exchange? He looked back at his own life. What a poor crop of secrets it had produced! 

There were things in it that he had shown to no one, but they were so uninteresting, it wasn't 

worth while lifting a purdah on their account. He'd been in love, engaged to be married, lady 

broke it off, memories of her and thoughts about her had kept him from other women for a 

time; then indulgence, followed by repentance and equilibrium. Mea
gre really except the 

equilibrium, 

and Aziz didn't want to have that confided to him~he would have called it "everything 

ranged coldly on shelves." 

"I shall not really be intimate with this fellow," Fielding thought, and then "nor with anyone." 

That was the corollary. And he had to confess that he really didn't mind, that he was content 



to help people, and like them as long as they didn't object, and if they objected pass on 

serenely. Experience can do much, and all that he had learnt in En
gland and Europe was an 

assistance 

to him, and helped him towards clarity, but clarity prevented him from experiencing 

something else. 

"How did you like the two ladies you met last Thursday?" he asked. 

Aziz shook his head distastefully. The question reminded him of his rash remark about the 

Marabar Caves. 

"How do you like Englishwomen generally?" 

"Hamidullah liked them in England. Here we never look at them. Oh no, much too careful. 

Let's talk of something else." 

"Hamidullah's right: th
ey are much nicer in England. There's something that doesn't suit 

them out here." 

Aziz after another silence said, "Why are you not married?" 

Fielding was pleased that he had asked. "Because I have more or less come through without 

it," he replied. "I was thinking of telling you a little about myself some day if I can make it 

interesting 

enough. The lady I liked wouldn't marry me~that is the main point, but that's fifteen 

years ago and now means nothing." 

But you haven't children." 

None."
 

Excuse the following question: have you any illegitimate children?" 

No. I'd wilhngly tell you if I had." 

Then your name will entirely die out." 

It must." 

Well." He shook his head. "This indifference is what the Oriental will never understand." 

I don't care for children." 

Caring has nothing to do with it," he said impatiently. 

I don't feel their absence, I don't want them weeping around my death-bed and being polite 
about me afterwards, which I believe is the general notion. I'd far rather
 leave a thought 
behind me than a child. Other people can have children. No obligation, with England getting so 
chock-a-block and overrunning India for jobs." 
"Why don't you marry Miss Quested?" 
"Good God! why, the girl's a prig." 
"Prig, prig? Kindly explain. Isn't that a bad word?" 

"Oh, I don't know her, but she struck me as one of the more pathetic products of Western 
education. She depresses me." 
"But prig, Mr. Fielding? How's that?" 

"She goes on and on as if she's at a lecture—trying ever 
so hard to understand India and 
life, and occasionally taking a note." 
"I thought her so nice and sincere." 

"So she probably is," said Fielding, ashamed of his roughness: any suggestion that he 
should marry always does produce overstatements on the part of the bachelor, and a mental 
breeze. "But I can't marry her if I wanted to, for she has just become engaged to the City 
Magistrate." 

"Has she indeed? I am so glad!" he exclaimed with relief, for this exempted him from the 
Marabar expedition: he w
ould scarcely be expected to entertain regular Anglo-Indians. 
"It's the old mother's doing. She was afraid her dear boy would choose for himself, so she 
brought out the girl on purpose, and flung them together until it happened." 
"Mrs. Moore did not mention that to me among her plans." 

"I may have got it wrong—I'm out of club gossip. But anyhow they're engaged to be married." 
"Yes, you're out of it, my poor chap," he smiled. "No Miss Quested for Mr. Fielding. However, 



she was not beautiful. She
 has practically no breasts, if you come to think of it." 

He smiled too, but found a touch of bad taste in the reference to a lady's breasts. 

"For the City Magistrate they shall be sufficient perhaps, and he for her. For you I shall arrange 

a lady with breasts like mangoes. ..." 

"No, you won't." 

"I will not really, and besides your position makes it dangerous for you." His mind had 

slipped from matrimony to Calcutta. His face grew grave. Fancy if he had persuaded the Principal 

to accompany hi
m there, and then got him into trouble! And abruptly he took up a new attitude 

towards his friend, the attitude of the protector who knows the dangers of India and is 

admonitory. "You can't be too careful in every way, Mr. Fielding; whatever you say or do in this 

damned country there is always some envious fellow on the lookout. Youmay be surprised to 

know that there were at least three spies sitting here when you came to enquire. I was really a 

good deal upset that you talked in that fashion abo
ut God. They will certainly report it." 

"To whom?" 

"That's all very well, but you spoke against morality also, and you said you had come to 

take other people's jobs. All that was very unwise. This is an awful place for scandal. Why, actually 

one of your own pupils was listening." 

"Thanks for telling me that; yes, I must try and be more careful. If I'm interested, I'm apt to 

forget myself Still, it doesn't do real harm." 

"But speaking out may get you into trouble." 

"It's often done so in the
 past." 

"There, listen to that! But the end of it might be that you lost your job." 

"If I do, I do. I shall survive it. I travel light." 

"Travel light! You are a most extraordinary race," said Aziz, turning away as if he were going 

to sleep, and immediately turning back again. "Is it your climate, or what?" 

"Plenty of Indians travel light too~saddhus and such. It's one of the things I admire about 

your country. Any man can travel light until he has a wife or children. That's part of my case 

a
gainst marriage. I'm a holy man minus the holiness. Hand that on to your three spies, and tell 

them to put it in their pipes." 

Aziz was charmed and interested, and turned the new idea over in his mind. So this was 

why Mr. Fielding and a few others were so fearless! They had nothing to lose. But he himself 

was rooted in society and Islam. He belonged to a tradition which bound him, and he had 

brought children into the world, the society of the future. Though he lived so vaguely in this 

flimsy bu
ngalow, nevertheless he was placed, placed. 

"I can't be sacked from my job, because my job's Education. I believe in teaching people to 

be individuals, and to understand other individuals. It's the only thing I do believe in. At 

Government 

College, I mix it up with trigonometry, and so on. When I'm a saddhu, I shall mix it up 

with something else." 

He concluded his manifesto, and both were silent. The eye-flies became worse than ever 

and danced close up to their pupils, or crawled into their e
ars. Fielding hit about wildly. The 

exercise 

made him hot, and he got up to go. 

"You might tell your servant to bring my horse. He doesn't seem to appreciate my Urdu." 

"I know. I gave him orders not to. Such are the tricks we play on unfortunate Englishmen. 

Poor Mr. Fielding! But I will release you now. Oh dear! With the exception of yourself and 

Hamidullah, 

I have no one to talk to in this place. You like Hamidullah, don't you?" 

"Very much." 

"Do you promise to come at once to us when you
 are in trouble?" 

"I never can be in trouble." 

"There goes a queer chap, I trust he won't came to grief," thought Aziz, left alone. His period 



of admiration was over, and he reacted towards patronage. It was difficult for him to remain 

in awe of anyone who played with all his cards on the table. Fielding, he discovered on 

closer acquaintance, was truly warm-hearted and unconventional, but not what can be called 

wise. That frankness of speech in the presence of Ram Chand Rafi and Co. was dange
rous and 

inelegant. It served no useful end. 

But they were friends, brothers. That part was settled, their compact had been subscribed 

by the photograph, they trusted one another, affection had triumphed for once in a way. He 

dropped off to sleep amid the happier memories of the last two hours—poetry of Ghalib, female 

grace, good old Hamidullah, good Fielding, his honoured wife and dear boys. He passed into a 

region where these joys had no enemies but bloomed harmoniously in an eternal garden
, or ran 

down watershoots of ribbed marble, or rose into domes whereunder were inscribed, black 

against white, the ninety-nine attributes of God. 

PART II: CAVES 

CHAPTER XII 

The Ganges, though flowing from the foot of Vishnu and through Siva's hair, is not an ancient 

stream. Geology, looking further than religion, knows of a time when neither the river nor 

the Himalayas that nourished it existed, and an ocean flowed over the holy places of Hindustan. 

The mountains rose, their debris silted u
p the ocean, the gods took their seats on them and 

contrived the river, and the India we call immemorial came into being. But India is really far 

older. In the days of the prehistoric ocean the southern part of the peninsula already existed, 

and the high places of Dravidia have been land since land began, and have seen on the one 

side the sinking of a continent that joined them to Africa, and on the other the upheaval of the 

Himalayas from a sea. They are older than anything in the world. No wate
r has ever covered 

them, and the sun who has watched them for countless aeons may still discern in their outlines 

forms that were his before our globe was torn from his bosom. If flesh of the sun's flesh is to 

be touched anywhere, it is here, among the incredible antiquity of these hills. 

Yet even they are altering. As Himalayan India rose, this India, the primal, has been depressed, 

and is slowly re-entering the curve of the earth. It may be that in aeons to come an 

ocean will flow here too, a
nd cover the sun-born rocks with slime. Meanwhile the plain of the 

Ganges encroaches on them with something of the sea's action. They are sinking beneath the 

newer lands. Their main mass is untouched, but at the edge their outposts have been cut off 

and stand knee-deep, throat-deep, in the advancing soil. There is something unspeakable in 

these outposts. They are like nothing else in the world, and a glimpse of them makes the 

breath catch. They rise abruptly, insanely, without the proportion that
 is kept by the wildest hills 

elsewhere, they bear no relation to anything dreamt or seen. To call them "uncanny" suggests 

ghosts, and they are older than all spirit. Hinduism has scratched and plastered a few rocks, but 

the shrines are unfrequented, as if pilgrims, who generally seek the extraordinary, had here 

found too much of it. Some saddhus did once settle in a cave, but they were smoked out, and 

even Buddha, who must have passed this way down to the Bo Tree of Gya, shunned a renunciation 


more complete than his own, and has left no legend of struggle or victory in the Marabar. 

The caves are readily described. A tunnel eight feet long, five feet high, three feet wide, 

leads to a circular chamber about twenty feet in diameter. This arrangement occurs again and 

again throughout the group of hills, and this is all, this is a Marabar Cave. Having seen one such 

cave, having seen two, having seen three, four, fourteen, twenty -four, the visitor returns to 

Chandrapore uncertain whether h
e has had an interesting experience or a dull one or any experience 

at all. He fmds it difficult to discuss the caves, or to keep them apart in his mind, for the 

pattern never varies, and no carving, not even a bees'-nest or a bat distinguishes one from another. 

Nothing, nothing attaches to them, and their reputation—for they have one— does not depend 

upon human speech. It is as if the surrounding plain or the passing birds have taken upon 

themselves to exclaim "extraordinary," and the word h
as taken root in the air, and been inhaled 

by mankind. 

They are dark caves. Even when they open towards the sun, very little light penetrates 



down the entrance tunnel into the circular chamber. There is little to see, and no eye to see it, 
until the visitor arrives for his five minutes, and strikes a match. Immediately another flame 
rises in the depths of the rock and moves towards the surface like an imprisoned spirit: the 
walls of the circular chamber have been most marvellously polished. The 
two flames approach 
and strive to unite, but cannot, because one of them breathes air, the other stone. A mirror inlaid 
with lovely colours divides the lovers, delicate stars of pink and grey interpose, exquisite 
nebulae, shadings fainter than the tail of a comet or the midday moon, all the evanescent life of 
the granite, only here visible. Fists and fingers thrust above the advancing soil—here at last is 
their skin, finer than any covering acquired by the animals, smoother than windless water, more
 
voluptuous than love. The radiance increases, the flames touch one another, kiss, expire. The 
cave is dark again, like all the caves. 

Only the wall of the circular chamber has been polished thus. The sides of the tunnel are 
left rough, they impinge as an afterthought upon the internal perfection. An entrance was necessary, 
so mankind made one. But elsewhere, deeper in the granite, are there certain chambers 
that have no entrances? Chambers never unsealed since the arrival of the gods. Local report 

declares that these exceed in number those that can be visited, as the dead exceed the living- 
four hundred of them, four thousand or million. Nothing is inside them, they were sealed up 
before the creation of pestilence or treasure; if mankind grew curious and excavated, nothing, 
nothing would be added to the sum of good or evil. One of them is rumoured within the boulder 
that swings on the summit of the highest of the hills; a bubble-shaped cave that has neither 
ceiling nor floor, and mirrors its o
wn darkness in every direction inflnitely. If the boulder falls 
and smashes, the cave will smash too— empty as an Easter egg. The boulder because of its 
hollowness 

sways in the wind, and even moves when a crow perches upon it: hence its name and 
the name of its stupendous pedestal: the Kawa Dol. 
CHAPTER XIII 

These hills look romantic in certain lights and at suitable distances, and seen of an evening 
from the upper verandah of the club they caused Miss Quested to say conversationally to Miss 
De
rek that she should like to have gone, that Dr. Aziz at Mr. Fielding's had said he would arrange 
something, and that Indians seem rather forgetful. She was overheard by the servant 
who offered them vermouths. This servant understood English. And he was not exactly a spy, 
but he kept his ears open, and Mahmoud Ali did not exactly bribe him, but did encourage him to 
come and squat with his own servants, and would happen to stroll their way when he was 
there. As the story travelled, it accreted emotion a
nd Aziz learnt with horror that the ladies were 
deeply offended with him, and had expected an invitation daily. He thought his facile remark 
had been forgotten. Endowed with two memories, a temporary and a permanent, he had hitherto 
relegated the caves to the former. Now he transferred them once for all, and pushed the 
matter through. They were to be a stupendous replica of the tea party. He began by securing 
Fielding and old Godbole, and then commissioned Fielding to approach Mrs.. Moore and Miss 
Qu
ested when they were alone— by this device Ronny, their official protector, could be circum 
vented. Fielding didn't like the job much; he was busy, caves bored him, he foresaw friction and 
expense, but he would not refuse the first favour his friend had asked from him, and did as required. 
The ladies accepted. It was a little inconvenient in the present press of their engagements, 
still, they hoped to manage it after consulting Mr. Heaslop. Consulted, Ronny raised no 
objection, provided Fielding und
ertook full responsibility for their comfort. He was not enthusiastic 
about the picnic, but, then, no more were the ladies— no one was enthusiastic, yet it took 
place. 

Aziz was terribly worried. It was not a long expedition— a train left Chandrapore just before 
dawn, another would bring them back for tiffin— but he was only a little official still, and feared 
to acquit himself dishonourably. He had to ask Major Callendar for half a day's leave, and be 
refused because of his recent malingering;
 despair; renewed approach of Major Callendar 
through Fielding, and contemptuous snarling permission. He had to borrow cutlery from Mahmoud 



Ali without inviting him. Then there was the question of alcohol; Mr. Fielding, and perhaps 

the ladies, were drinkers, so must he provide whisky-sodas and ports? There was the problem 

of transport from the wayside station of Marabar to the caves. There was the problem of Professor 

Godbole and his food, and of Professor Godbole and other people's food—two p
roblems, 

not one problem. The Professor was not a very strict Hindu—he would take tea, fruit, sodawater 

and sweets, whoever cooked them, and vegetables and rice if cooked by a Brahman; but 

not meat, not cakes lest they contained eggs, and he would not allow anyone else to eat beef: 

a slice of beef upon a distant plate would wreck his happiness. Other people might eat mutton, 

they might eat ham. But over ham Aziz' own religion raised its voice: he did not fancy other 

people eating ham. Trouble
 after trouble encountered him, because he had challenged the spirit 

of the Indian earth, which tries to keep men in compartments. 

At last the moment arrived. 

His friends thought him most unwise to mix himself up with English ladies, and warned him 

to take every precaution against unpunctuality. Consequently he spent the previous night at the 

station. The servants were huddled on the platform, enjoined not to stray. He himself walked up 

and down with old Mohammed Latif, who was to act as major-
domo. He felt insecure and also 

unreal. A car drove up, and he hoped Fielding would get out of it, to lend him solidity. But it 

contained Mrs. Moore, Miss Quested, and their Goanese servant. He rushed to meet them, suddenly 

happy. "But you've come, after all. Oh, how very very kind of you!" he cried. "This is the 

happiest moment in all my life." 

The ladies were civil. It was not the happiest moment in their lives, still, they looked forward 

to enjoying themselves as soon as the bother of the ea
rly start was over. They had not seen 

him since the expedition was arranged, and they thanked him adequately. 

"You don't require tickets— please stop your servant. There are no tickets on the Marabar 

branch line; it is its peculiarity. You come to the carriage and rest till Mr. Fielding joins us. Did 

you know you are to travel purdah? Will you like that?" 

They replied that they should like it. The train had come in, and a crowd of dependents 

were swarming over the seats of the carriage like m
onkeys. Aziz had borrowed servants from 

his friends, as well as bringing his own three, and quarrels over precedence were resulting. The 

ladies' servant stood apart, with a sneering expression on his face. They had hired him while 

they were still globe-trotters, at Bombay. In a hotel or among smart people he was excellent, 

but as soon as they consorted with anyone whom he thought second-rate he left them to their 

disgrace. 

The night was still dark, but had acquired the temporary look that indic
ates its end. Perched 

on the roof of a shed, the station-master's hens began to dream of kites instead of owls. Lamps 

were put out, in order to save the trouble of putting them out later; the smell of tobacco and 

the sound of spitting arose from third-class passengers in dark corners; heads were unshrouded, 

teeth cleaned on the twigs of a tree. So convinced was a junior official that another 

sun would rise, that he rang a bell with enthusiasm. This upset the servants. They shrieked that 

the tra
in was starting, and ran to both ends of it to intercede. Much had still to enter the purdah 

carriage— a box bound with brass, a melon wearing a fez, a towel containing guavas, a stepladder 

and a gun. The guests played up all right. They had no race-consciousness— Mrs. Moore 

was too old. Miss Quested too new— and they behaved to Aziz as to any young man who had 

been kind to them in the country. This moved him deeply. He had expected them to arrive with 

Mr. Fielding, instead of which they tr
usted themselves to be with him a few moments alone. 

"Send back your servant," he suggested. "He is unnecessary. Then we shall all be Moslems 

together." 

"And he is such a horrible servant. Antony, you can go; we don't want you," said the girl 

impatiently. 

"Master told me to come." 

"Mistress tells you to go." 

"Master says, keep near the ladies all the morning." 



"Well, your ladies won't have you." She turned to the host. "Do get rid of him, Dr. Aziz! " 

"Mohammed Latif ! " he called. 

The
 poor relative exchanged fezzes with the melon, and peeped out of the window of the 

railway carriage, whose confusion he was superintending. 

"Here is my cousin, Mr. Mohammed Latif Oh no, don't shake hands. He is an Indian of the 

old-fashioned sort, he prefers to salaam. There, I told you so. Mohammed Latif, how beautifully 

you salaam. See, he hasn't understood; he knows no English." 

"You spick lie," said the old man gently. 

"I spick a lie! Oh, jolly good. Isn't he a funny old man? We will have 
great jokes with him 

later. He does all sorts of little things. He is not nearly as stupid as you think, and awfully poor. 

It's lucky ours is a large family." He flung an arm round the grubby neck. "But you get inside, 

make yourselves at home; yes, you lie down." The celebrated Oriental confusion appeared at 

last to be at an end. "Excuse me, now I must meet our other two guests! " 

He was getting nervous again, for it was ten minutes to the time. Still, Fielding was an Englishman, 

and they never
 do miss trains, and Godbole was a Hindu and did not count, and, 

soothed by this logic, he grew calmer as the hour of departure approached. Mohammed Latif 

had bribed Antony not to come. They walked up and down the platform, talking usefully. They 

agreed that they had overdone the servants, and must leave two or three behind at Marabar 

station. And Aziz explained that he might be playing one or two practical jokes at the caves— 

not out of unkindness, but to make the guests laugh. The old man ass
ented with slight sideway 

motions of the head: he was always willing to be ridiculed, and he bade Aziz not spare him. 

Elated by his importance, he began an indecent anecdote. 

"Tell me another time, brother, when I have more leisure, for now, as I have already explained, 

we have to give pleasure to non-Moslems. Three will be Europeans, one a Hindu, which 

must not be forgotten. Every attention must be paid to Professor Godbole, lest he feel that he is 

inferior to my other guests." 

"I will discu
ss philosophy with him." 

"That will be kind of you; but the servants are even more important. We must not convey 

an impression of disorganization. It can be done, and I expect you to do it . . ." 

A shriek from the purdah carriage. The train had started. 

"Merciful God! " cried Mohammed Latif He flung himself at the train, and leapt on to the 

footboard of a carriage. Aziz did likewise. It was an easy feat, for a branch-line train is slow to 

assume special airs. "We're monkeys, don't worry," he ca
lled, hanging on to a bar and laughing. 

Then he howled, "Mr. Fielding! Mr. Fielding!" 

There were Fielding and old Godbole, held up at the level-crossing. Appalling catastrophe! 

The gates had been closed earlier than usual. They leapt from their tonga; they gesticulated, 

but what was the good. So near and yet so far! As the train joggled past over the points, there 

was time for agonized words. 

"Bad, bad, you have destroyed me." 

"Godbole's pujah did it," cried the Englishman. 

The Brahman lowe
red his eyes, ashamed of religion. For it was so: he had miscalculated the 

length of a prayer. 

"Jump on, I must have you," screamed Aziz, beside himself 

"Right, give a hand." 

"He's not to, he'll kill himself," Mrs. Moore protested. He jumped, he failed, missed his 

friend's hand, and fell back on to the line. The train rumbled past. He scrambled on to his feet, 

and bawled after them, "I'm all right, you're all right, don't worry," and then they passed beyond 

range of his voice. 

"Mrs. Moore, 
Miss Quested, our expedition is a ruin." He swung himself along the footboard, 

almost in tears. 

"Get in, get in; you'll kill yourself as well as Mr. Fielding. I see no ruin." 

"How is that? Oh, explain to me! " he said piteously, like a child. 



"We shall be all Moslems together now, as you promised." 

She was perfect as always, his dear Mrs. Moore. All the love for her he had felt at the 

mosque welled up again, the fresher for forgetfulness. There was nothing he would not do for 

her. He would 
die to make her happy. 

"Get in. Dr. Aziz, you make us giddy," the other lady called. "If they're so foolish as to miss 

the train, that's their loss, not ours." 

"I am to blame. I am the host." 

"Nonsense, go to your carriage. We're going to have a delightful time without them." 

Not perfect like Mrs. Moore, but very sincere and kind. Wonderful ladies, both of them, and 

for one precious morning his guests. He felt important and competent. Fielding was a loss 

personally, 

being a friend, increasi
ngly dear, yet if Fielding had come, he himself would have remained 

in leading-strings. "Indians are incapable of responsibility," said the officials, and Hamidullah 

sometimes said so too. He would show those pessimists that they were wrong. Smiling 

proudly, he glanced outward at the country, which was still invisible except as a dark movement 

in the darkness; then upwards at the sky, where the stars of the sprawling Scorpion had begun 

to pale. Then he dived through a window into a Secondclass ca
rriage. 

"Mohammed Latif, by the way, what is in these caves, brother? Why are we all going to see 

them?" 

Such a question was beyond the poor relative's scope. He could only reply that God and the 

local villagers knew, and that the latter would gladly act as guides. 

CHAPTER XIV 

Most of life is so dull that there is nothing to be said about it, and the books and talk that 

would describe it as interesting are obliged to exaggerate, in the hope of justifying their own 

existence. Inside its coco
on of work or social obligation, the human spirit slumbers for the most 

part, registering the distinction between pleasure and pain, but not nearly as alert as we pretend. 

There are periods in the most thrilling day during which nothing happens, and though we 

continue to exclaim, "I do enjoy myself," or, " I am horrified," we are insincere. " As far as I feel 

anything, it is enjoyment, horror "--it's no more than that really, and a perfectly adjusted organism 

would be silent. 

It so happened tha
t Mrs. Moore and Miss Quested had felt nothing acutely for a fortnight. 

Ever since Professor Godbole had sung his queer little song, they had lived more or less inside 

cocoons, and the difference between them was that the elder lady accepted her own apathy, 

while the younger resented hers. It was Adela's faith that the whole stream of events is important 

and interesting, and if she grew bored she blamed herself severely and compelled her lips 

to utter enthusiasms. This was the only insincerity in
 a character otherwise sincere, and it was 

indeed the intellectual protest of her youth. She was particularly vexed now because she was 

both in India and engaged to be married, which double event should have made every instant 

sublime. 

India was certainly dim this morning, though seen under the auspices of Indians. Her wish 

had been granted, but too late. She could not get excited over Aziz and his arrangements. She 

was not the least unhappy or depressed, and the various odd objects that surrou
nded her —the 

comic "purdah" carriage, the piles of rugs and bolsters, the rolling melons, the scent of sweet 

oils, the ladder, the brass-bound box, the sudden irruption of Mahmoud All's butler from the 

lavatory with tea and poached eggs upon a tray—they were all new and amusing, and led her to 

comment appropriately, but they wouldn't bite into her mind. So she tried to find comfort by 

reflecting that her main interest would hence forward be Ronny. 

"What a nice cheerful servant! What a reli
ef after Antony!" 

"They startle one rather. A strange place to make tea in," said Mrs. Moore, who had hoped 

for a nap. 

"I want to sack Antony. His behaviour on the platform has decided me." 

Mrs. Moore thought that Antony's better self would come to the front at Simla. Miss Quested 



was to be married at Simla; some cousins, with a house looking straight on to Thibet, had invited 

her. 

"Anyhow, we must get a second servant, because at Simla you will be at the hotel, and I 

don't think Ronny's 
Baldeo ..." She loved plans. 

"Very well, you get another servant, and I'll keep Antony with me. I am used to his unappetizing 

ways. He will see me through the Hot Weather." 

"I don't believe in the Hot Weather. People like Major Callendar who always talk about it—it's 

in the hope of making one feel inexperienced and small, like their everlasting, 'I've been twenty 

years in this country.' 

"I believe in the Hot Weather, but never did I suppose it would bottle me up as it will." For 

owing to th
e sage leisureliness of Ronny and Adela, they could not be married till May, and 

consequently 

Mrs. Moore could not return to England immediately after the wedding, which was 

what she had hoped to do. By May a barrier of fire would have fallen across India and the adjoining 

sea, and she would have to remain perched up in the Himalayas waiting for the world to 

get cooler. 

"I won't be bottled up," announced the girl. "I've no patience with these women here who 

leave their husbands grilling in th
e plains. Mrs. McBryde hasn't stopped down once since she 

married; she leaves her quite intelligent husband alone half the year, and then's surprised she's 

out of touch with him." 

"She has children, you see." 

"Oh yes, that's true," said Miss Quested, disconcerted. 

"It is the children who are the first consideration. Until they are grown up, and married off 

When that happens one has again the right to live for oneself—in the plains or the hills, as 

suits." 

"Oh yes, you're perfectly right. 
I never thought it out." 

"If one has not become too stupid and old." She handed her empty cup to the servant. 

"My idea now is that my cousins shall find me a servant in Simla, at all events to see me 

through the wedding, after which Ronny means to reorganize his staff entirely. He does it very 

well for a bachelor; still, when he is married no doubt various changes will have to be made— his 

old servants won't want to take their orders from me, and I don't blame them." 

Mrs. Moore pushed up the 
shutters and looked out. She had brought Ronny and Adela together 

by their mutual wish, but really she could not advise them further. She felt increasingly 

(vision or nightmare?) that, though people are important, the relations between them are not, 

and that in particular too much fuss has been made over marriage; centuries of carnal embracement, 

yet man is no nearer to understanding man. And to-day she felt this with such force 

that it seemed itself a relationship, itself a person who was trying
 to take hold of her hand. 

"Anything to be seen of the hills?" 

"Only various shades of the dark." 

"We can't be far from the place where my hyena was." She peered into the timeless twilight. 

The train crossed a nullah. "Pomper, pomper, pomper," was the sound that the wheels made as 

they trundled over the bridge, moving very slowly. A hundred yards on came a second nullah, 

then a third, suggesting the neighbourhood of higher ground. "Perhaps this is mine; anyhow, 

the road runs parallel with the
 railway." Her accident was a pleasant memory; she felt in her 

dry, honest way that it had given her a good shake up, and taught her Ronny's true worth. 

Then she went back to her plans; plans had been a passion with her from girlhood. Now and 

then she paid tribute to the present, said how friendly and intelligent Aziz was, ate a guava, 

couldn't eat a fried sweet, practised her Urdu on the servant; but her thoughts ever veered to 

the manageable future, and to the Anglolndian life she had decided t
o endure. And as she appraised 

it with its adjuncts of Turtons and Burtons, the train accompanied her sentences, "pomper, 

pomper," the train half asleep, going nowhere in particular and with no passenger of importance 

in any of its carriages, the branch-line train, lost on a low embankment between dull 



fields. Its message—for it had one—avoided her wellequipped mind. Far away behind her, with a 

shriek that meant business, rushed the Mail, connecting up important towns such as Calcutta 

and
 Lahore, where interesting events occur and personalities are developed. She understood 

that. Unfortunately, India has few important towns. India is the country, fields, fields, then hills, 

jungle, hills, and more fields. The branch line stops, the road is only practicable for cars to a 

point, the bullockcarts lumber down the side tracks, paths fray out into the cultivation, and 

disappear 

near a splash of red paint. How can the mind take hold of such a country? Generations 

of invaders have trie
d, but they remain in exile. The important towns they build are only retreats, 

their quarrels the malaise of men who cannot find their way home. India knows of their 

trouble. She knows of the whole world's trouble, to its uttermost depth. She calls "Come" 

through her hundred mouths, through objects ridiculous and august. But come to what? She 

has never defined. She is not a promise, only an appeal. 

"I will fetch you from Simla when it's cool enough. I will unbottle you in fact," continued the 

r
eliable girl. "We then see some of the Mogul stuff— how appalling if we let you miss the Taj 

!— and then I will see you off at Bombay. Your last glimpse of this country really shall be 

interesting." 

But Mrs. Moore had fallen asleep, exhausted by the early start. She was in rather low 

health, and ought not to have attempted the expedition, but had pulled herself together in case 

the pleasure of the others should suffer. Her dreams were of the same texture, but there it was 

her other children
 who were wanting something, Stella and Ralph, and she was explaining to 

them that she could not be in two families at once. When she awoke, Adela had ceased to plan, 

and leant out of a window, saying, "They're rather wonderful." 

Astonishing even from the rise of the civil station, here the Marabar were gods to whom 

earth is a ghost. Kawa Do! was nearest. It shot up in a single slab, on whose summit one rock 

was poised— if a mass so great can be called one rock. Behind it, recumbent, were the h
ills that 

contained the other caves, isolated each from his neighbour by broad channels of the plain. The 

assemblage, ten in all, shifted a little as the train crept past them, as if observing its arrival. 

"I'ld not have missed this for anything," said the girl, exaggerating her enthusiasm. "Look, 

the sun's rising— this'll be absolutely magnificent— come quickly— look. I wouldn't have missed 

this for anything. We should never have seen it if we'd stuck to the Turtons and their eternal 

ele
phants." 

As she spoke, the sky to the left turned angry orange. Colour throbbed and mounted behind 

a pattern of trees, grew in intensity, was yet brighter, incredibly brighter, strained from without 

against the globe of the air. They awaited the miracle. But at the supreme moment, when night 

should have died and day lived, nothing occurred. It was as if virtue had failed in the celestial 

fount. The hues in the east decayed, the hills seemed dimmer though in fact better lit, and a 

profound disap
pointment entered with the morning breeze. Why, when the chamber was prepared, 

did the bridegroom not enter with trumpets and shawms, as humanity expects? The sun 

rose without splendour. He was presently observed trailing yellowish behind the trees, or 

against insipid sky, and touching the bodies already at work in the fields. 

"Ah, that must be the false dawn— isn't it caused by dust in the upper layers of the atmosphere 

that couldn't fall down during the night? I think Mr. McBryde said so. Wel
l, I must admit 

that England has it as regards sunrises. Do you remember Grasmere?" 

"Ah, dearest Grasmere!" Its little lakes and mountains were beloved by them all. Romantic 

yet manageable, it sprang from a kindlier planet. Here an untidy plain stretched to the knees of 

the Marabar. 

"Good morning, good morning, put on your topis," shouted Aziz from farther down the train. 

"Put on your topis at once, the early sun is highly dangerous for heads. I speak as a doctor." 

"Good morning, good morning
, put on your own." 

"Not for my thick head," he laughed, banging it and holding up pads of his hair. 

"Nice creature he is," murmured Adela. 



"Listen—Mohammed Latif says 'Good morning' next." Various pointless jests. 

"Dr. Aziz, what's happened to your hills? The train has forgotten to stop." 

"Perhaps it is a circular train and goes back to Chandrapore without a break. Who knows! " 

Having wandered off into the plain for a mile, the train slowed up against an elephant. 

There was a platform to
o, but it shrivelled into insignificance. An elephant, waving her painted 

forehead at the mom! "Oh, what a surprise!" called the ladies politely. Aziz said nothing, but he 

nearly burst with pride and relief The elephant was the one grand feature of the picnic, and 

God alone knew what he had gone through to obtain her. Semi-official, she was best approached 

through the Nawab Bahadur, who was best approached through Nureddin, but he 

never answered letters, but his mother had great influence with hi
m and was a friend of Hamidulhah 

Begum's, who had been excessively kind and had promised to call on her provided the 

broken shutter of the purdah carriage came back soon enough from Calcutta. That an elephant 

should depend from so long and so slender a string filled Aziz with content, and with humorous 

appreciation of the East, where the friends of friends are a reality, where everything gets done 

sometime, and sooner or later every one gets his share of happiness. And Mohammed Latif was 

likewi
se content, because two of the guests had missed the train, and consequently he could 

ride on the howdah instead of following in a cart, and the servants were content because an 

elephant increased their self-esteem, and they tumbled out the luggage into the dust with 

shouts and bangs, issuing orders to one another, and convulsed with goodwill. 

"It takes an hour to get there, an hour to get back, and two hours for the caves, which we 

will call three," said Aziz, smiling charmingly. There was sudde
nly something regal about him. 

"The train back is at eleventhirty, and you will be sitting down to your tiffin in Chandrapore with 

Mr. Heaslop at exactly your usual hour, namely, one-fifteen. I know everything about you. Four 

hours—quite a small expedition— and an hour extra for misfortunes, which occur somewhat 

frequently 

among my people. My idea is to plan everything without consulting you; but you, Mrs. 

Moore, or Miss Quested, you are at any moment to make alterations if you wish, even i
f it 

means giving up the caves. Do you agree? Then mount this wild animal." 

The elephant had knelt, grey and isolated, like another hill. They climbed up the ladder, and 

he mounted shikar fashion, treading first on the sharp edge of the heel and then into the 

looped-up tail. When Mohammed Latif followed him, the servant who held the end of the tail let 

go of it according to previous instructions, so that the poor relative slipped and had to cling to 

the netting over the buttocks. It was a littl
e piece of Court buffoonery, and distressed only the 

ladies, whom it was intended to divert. Both of them disliked practical jokes. Then the beast 

rose in two shattering movements, and poised them ten feet above the plain. Immediately below 

was the scurf of life that an elephant always collects round its feet— villagers, naked babies. 

The servants flung crockery into tongas. Hassan annexed the stallion intended for Aziz, and defied 

Mahmoud All's man from its altitude. The Brahman who had been h
ired to cook for Professor 

Godbole was planted under an acacia tree, to await their return. The train, also hoping to 

retum, wobbled away through the fields, turning its head this way and that like a centipede. 

And the only other movement to be seen was a movement as of antennae, really the counterpoises 

of the wells which rose and fell on their pivots of mud all over the plain and dispersed a 

feeble flow of water. The scene was agreeable rather than not in the mild morning air, but there 

was l
ittle colour in it, and no vitality. 

As the elephant moved towards the hills (the pale sun had by this time saluted them to the 

base, and pencilled shadows down their creases) a new quality occurred, a spiritual silence 

which invaded more senses than the ear. Life went on as usual, but had no consequences, that 

is to say, sounds did not echo or thoughts develop. Everything seemed cut off at its root, and 

therefore infected with illusion. For instance, there were some mounds by the edge of the tra
ck, 

low, serrated, and touched with whitewash. What were these mounds— graves, breasts of the 

goddess Parvati? The villagers beneath gave both replies. Again, there was a confusion about a 

snake which was never cleared up. Miss Quested saw a thin, dark object reared on end at the 



farther side of a watercourse, and said, "A snake!" The villagers agreed, and Aziz explained: 

yes, a black cobra, very venomous, who had reared himself up to watch the passing of the elephant. 

But when she looked t
hrough Ronny's fieldglasses, she found it wasn't a snake, but the 

withered and twisted stump of a toddy-palm. So she said, "It isn't a snake." The villagers 

contradicted 

her. She had put the word into their minds, and they refused to abandon it. Aziz admitted 

that it looked like a tree through the glasses, but insisted that it was a black cobra really, 

and improvised some rubbish about protective mimicry. Nothing was explained, and yet there 

was no romance. Films of heat, radiated from the Kawa
 Dol precipices, increased the confusion. 

They came at irregular intervals and moved capriciously. A patch of field would jump as if it was 

being fried, and then lie quiet. As they drew closer the radiation stopped. 

The elephant walked straight at the Kawa Dol as if she would knock for admission with her 

forehead, then swerved, and followed a path round its base. The stones plunged straight into 

the earth, like cliffs into the sea, and while Miss Quested was remarking on this, and saying that 

i
t was striking, the plain quietly disappeared, peeled off, so to speak, and nothing was to be 

seen on either side but the granite, very dead and quiet. The sky dominated as usual, but 

seemed unhealthily near, adhering like a ceiling to the summits of the precipices. It was as if 

the contents of the corridor had never been changed. Occupied by his own munificence, Aziz 

noticed nothing. His guests noticed a little. They did not feel that it was an attractive place or 

quite worth visiting, and wishe
d it could have turned into some Mohammedan object, such as a 

mosque, which their host would have appreciated and explained. His ignorance became evident, 

and was really rather a drawback. In spite of his gay, confident talk, he had no notion 

how to treat this particular aspect of India; he was lost in it without Professor Godbole, like 

themselves. 

The corridor narrowed, then widened into a sort of tray. Here, more or less, was their goal. 

A ruined tank held a little water which would do for th
e animals, and close above the mud was 

punched a black hole—the first of the caves. Three hills encircled the tray. Two of them pumped 

out heat busily, but the third was in shadow, and here they camped. 

"A horrid, stuffy place really," murmured Mrs. Moore to herself 

"How quick your servants are! " Miss Quested exclaimed. For a cloth had already been laid, 

with a vase of artificial flowers in its centre, and Mahmoud All's butler offered them poached 

eggs and tea for the second time. 

"I thoug
ht we would eat this before our caves, and breakfast after." 

Isn't this breakfast?" 

"This breakfast? Did you think I should treat you so strangely?" He had been warned that 

English people never stop eating, and that he had better nourish them every two hours until a 

solid meal was ready. 

"How very well it is all arranged." 

"That you shall tell me when I return to Chandrapore. Whatever disgraces I bring upon myself, 

you remain my guests." He spoke gravely now. They were dependent on him for a 
few 

hours, and he felt grateful to them for placing themselves in such a position. All was well so far; 

the elephant held a fresh cut bough to her lips, the tonga shafts stuck up into the air, the 

kitchen-boy peeled potatoes, Hassan shouted, and Mohammed Latif stood as he ought, with a 

peeled switch in his hand. The expedition was a success, and it was Indian; an obscure young 

man had been allowed to show courtesy to visitors from another country, which is what all Indians 

long to do— even cy
nics like Mahmoud Ali~but they never have the chance. Hospitality had 

been achieved, they were "his" guests; his honour was involved in their happiness, and any 

discomfort 

they endured would tear his own soul. 

Like most Orientals, Aziz overrated hospitality, mistaking it for intimacy, and not seeing that 

it is tainted with the sense of possession. It was only when Mrs. Moore or Fielding was near him 

that he saw further, and knew that it is more blessed to receive than to give. These two had 




strange and beautiful effects on him-they were his friends, his for ever, and he theirs for ever; 

he loved them so much that giving and receiving became one. He loved them even better than 

the Hamidullah's because he had surmounted obstacles to meet them, and this stimulates a 

generous mind. Their images remained somewhere in his soul up to his dying day, permanent 

additions. He looked at her now as she sat on a deckchair, sipping his tea, and had for a moment 

a joy that held the seeds of its ow
n decay, for it would lead him to think, "Oh, what more 

can I do for her?" and so back to the dull round of hospitality. The black bullets of his eyes filled 

with soft expressive light, and he said, "Do you ever remember our mosque, Mrs. Moore?" 

"I do. I do," she said, suddenly vital and young. 

"And how rough and rude I was, and how good you were." 

"And how happy we both were." 

"Friendships last longest that begin like that, I think. Shall I ever entertain your other children?" 

"Do you know a
bout the others? She will never talk about them to me," said Miss Quested, 

unintentionally breaking a spell. 

"Ralph and Stella, yes, I know everything about them. But we must not forget to visit our 

caves. One of the dreams of my life is accomplished in having you both here as my guests. You 

cannot imagine how you have honoured me. I feel like the Emperor Babur." 

"Why like him?" she enquired, rising. 

"Because my ancestors came down with him from Afghanistan. They joined him at Herat. 

He also 
had often no more elephants than one, none sometimes, but he never ceased showing 

hospitality. When he fought or hunted or ran away, he would always stop for a time among hills, 

just like us; he would never let go of hospitality and pleasure, and if there was only a little food, 

he would have it arranged nicely, and if only one musical instrument, he would compel it to play 

a beautiful tune. I take him as my ideal. He is the poor gentleman, and he became a great 

king." 

"I thought another Empero
r is your favourite—I forget the name—you mentioned him at Mr. 

Fielding's: what my book calls Aurangzebe." 

"Alamgir? Oh yes, he was of course the more pious. But Babur—never in his whole life did 

he betray a friend, so I can only think of him this morning. And you know how he died? He laid 

down his life for his son. A death far more difficult than battle. They were caught in the heat. 

They should have gone back to Kabul for the bad weather, but could not for reasons of state, 

and at Agra 
Humayun fell sick. Babur walked round the bed three times, and said, T have borne 

it away,' and he did bear it away; the fever left his son and came to him instead, and he died. 

That is why I prefer Babur to Alamgir. I ought not to do so, but I do. However, I mustn't delay 

you. I see you are ready to start." 

"Not at all," she said, sitting down by Mrs. Moore again. "We enjoy talk like this very much." 

For at last he was talking about what he knew and felt, talking as he had in Fielding's gardenho
use; 

he was again the Oriental guide whom they appreciated. 

"I always enjoy conversing about the Moguls. It is the chief pleasure I know. You see, those 

first six emperors were all most wonderful men, and as soon as one of them is mentioned, no 

matter which, I forget everything else in the world except the other five. You could not find six 

such kings in all the countries of the earth, not, I mean, coming one after the other —father, 

son." 

"Tell us something about Akbar." 

"Ah, you have he
ard the name of Akbar. Good. Hamidullah— whom you shall meet— will tell 

you that Akbar is the greatest of all. I say, 'Yes, Akbar is very wonderful, but half a Hindu; he 

was not a true Moslem,' which makes Hamidullah cry, 'No more was Babur, he drank wine.' But 

Babur always repented afterwards, which makes the entire difference, and Akbar never repented 

of the new religion he invented instead of the Holy Koran." 

"But wasn't Akbar's new religion very fine? It was to embrace the whole of India.
" 

"Miss Quested, fine but foolish. You keep your religion, I mine. That is the best. Nothing 

embraces the whole of India, nothing, nothing, and that was Akbar's mistake." 



"Oh, do you feel that, Dr. Aziz?" she said thoughtfully. "I hope you're not right. There will 
have to be something universal in this country—I don't say religion, for I'm not religious, hut 
something, or how else are barriers to be broken down?" 

She was only recommending the universal brotherhood he sometimes dreamed of, but
 as 
soon as it was put into prose it became untrue. 

"Take my own case," she continued—it was indeed her own case that had animated her. " I 
don't know whether you happen to have heard, but I'm going to marry Mr. Heaslop." 
"On which my heartiest congratulations." 

"Mrs. Moore, may I put our difficulty to Dr. Aziz~I mean our Anglo-Indian one?" 
"It is your difficulty, not mine, my dear." 

" Ab, that's true. Well, by marrying Mr. Heaslop, I shall become what is known as an Anglo- 
Indian." 

He held 
up his hand in protest. "Impossible. Take back such a terrible remark." 
"But I shall! it's inevitable. I can't avoid the label. What I do hope to avoid is the mentality. 
Women like--" She stopped, not quite liking to mention names; she would boldly have said 
"Mrs. Turton and Mrs. Callendar" a fortnight ago. "Some women are so—well, ungenerous and 
snobby about Indians, and 1 should feel too ashamed for words if I turned like them, but— and 
here's my difficulty— there's nothing special about me, n
othing specially good or strong, which 
will help me to resist my environment and avoid becoming like them. I've most lamentable defects. 
That's why I want Akbar's 'universal religion' or the equivalent to keep me decent and 
sensible. Do you see what I mean?" 

Her remarks pleased him, but his mind shut up tight because she had alluded to her marriage. 
He was not going to be mixed up in that side of things. "You are certain to be happy with 
any relative of Mrs. Moore's," he said with a formal bow. 

"O
h, my happiness— that's quite another problem. I want to consult you about this Anglo- 
Indian difficulty. Can you give me any advice?" 

"You are absolutely unlike the others, I assure you. You will never be rude to my people." 
"I am told we all get rude after a year." 

"Then you are told a lie," he fiashed, for she had spoken the truth and it touched him on 
the raw; it was itself an insult in these particular circumstances. He recovered himself at once 
and laughed, but her error broke up their conv
ersation— their civilization it had almost been— 
which scattered like the petals of a desert fiower, and left them in the middle of the hills. "Come 
along," he said, holding out a hand to each. They got up a little reluctantly, and addressed 
themselves to sightseeing. 

The first cave was tolerably convenient. They skirted the puddle of water, and then climbed 
up over some unattractive stones, the sun crashing on their backs. Bending their heads, they 
disappeared one by one into the interior of th
e hills. The small black hole gaped where their 
varied forms and colours had momentarily functioned. They were sucked in like water down a 
drain. Bland and bald rose the precipices; bland and glutinous the sky that connected the precipices; 
solid and white, a Brahminy kite flapped between the rocks with a clumsiness that 
seemed intentional. Before man, with his itch for the seemly, had been bom, the planet must 
have looked thus. The kite flapped away. . . . Before birds, perhaps. . . . And then the ho
le 
belched and humanity returned. 

A Marabar cave had been horrid as far as Mrs Moore was concerned, for she had nearly 
fainted in it, and had some difficulty in preventing herself from saying so as soon as she got 
into the air again. It was natural enough: she had always suffered from faintness, and the cave 
had become too full, because all their retinue followed them. Crammed with villagers and servants, 
the circular chamber began to smell. She lost Aziz and Adela in the dark, didn't know 
who touc
hed her, couldn't breathe, and some vile naked thing struck her face and settled on her 
mouth like a pad. She tried to regain the entrance tunnel, but an influx of villagers swept her 
back. She hit her head. For an instant she went mad, hitting and gasping like a fanatic. For not 
only did the crush and stench alarm her; there was also a terrifying echo. 



Professor Godbole had never mentioned an echo; it never impressed him, perhaps. There 

are some exquisite echoes in India; there is the whisper rou
nd the dome at Bijapur; there are 

the long, solid sentences that voyage through the air at Mandu, and return unbroken to their 

creator. The echo in a Marabar cave is not like these, it is entirely devoid of distinction. Whatever 

is said, the same monotonous noise replies, and quivers up and down the walls until it is 

absorbed into the roof "Bourn" is the sound as far as the human alphabet can express it, or 

"bou-ourn," or "ou-boum,"~utterly dull. Hope, politeness, the blowing of a nose, the squea
k of 

a boot, all produce "bourn." Even the striking of a match starts a little worm coiling, which is 

too small to complete a circle but is eternally watchful. And if several people talk at once, an 

overlapping howling noise begins, echoes generate echoes, and the cave is stuffed with a snake 

composed of small snakes, which writhe independently. 

After Mrs. Moore all the others poured out. She had given the signal for the reflux. Aziz and 

Adela both emerged smiling and she did not want him to th
ink his treat was a failure, so smiled 

too. As each person emerged she looked for a villain, but none was there, and she realized that 

she had been among the mildest individuals, whose only desire was to honour her, and that the 

naked pad was a poor little baby, astride its mother's hip. Nothing evil had been in the cave, but 

she had not enjoyed herself; no, she had not enjoyed herself, and she decided not to visit a 

second one. 

"Did you see the reflection of his match—rather pretty?" asked A
dela. 

"I forget. . ." 

"But he says this isn't a good cave, the best are on the Kawa Dol." 

"I don't think I shall go on to there. I dislike climbing." 

"Very well, let's sit down again in the shade until breakfast's ready." 

"Ah, but that'll disappoint him so; he has taken such trouble. You should go on; you don't 

mind." 

"Perhaps I ought to," said the girl, indifferent to what she did, but desirous of being amiable. 

The servants, etc., were scrambling back to the camp, pursued by grave censure
s from Mohammed 

Latif Aziz came to help the guests over the rocks. He was at the summit of his powers, 

vigorous and humble, too sure of himself to resent criticism, and he was sincerely pleased 

when he heard they were altering his plans. "Certainly, Miss Quested, so you and I will go together, 

and leave Mrs. Moore here, and we will not be long, yet we will not hurry, because we 

know that will be her wish." 

"Quite right. I'm sorry not to come too, but I'm a poor walker." 

"Dear Mrs. Moore, what
 does anything matter so long as you are my guests? I am very glad 

you are not coming, which sounds strange, but you are treating me with true frankness, as a 

friend." 

"Yes, I am your friend," she said, laying her hand on his sleeve, and thinking, despite her 

fatigue, how very charming, how very good, he was, and how deeply she desired his happiness. 

"So may I make another suggestion? Don't let so many people come with you this time. I think 

you may find it more convenient." 

"Exactly, exactly
," he cried, and, rushing to the other extreme, forbade all except one guide 

to accompany Miss Quested and him to the Kawa Dol. "Is that all right?" he enquired. 

"Quite right, now enjoy yourselves, and when you come back tell me all about it." And she 

sank into the deck-chair. 

If they reached the big pocket of caves, they would be away nearly an hour. She took out 

her writing-pad, and began, "Dear Stella, Dear Ralph," then stopped, and looked at the queer 

valley and their feeble invasion of it.
 Even the elephant had become a nobody. Her eye rose 

from it to the entrance tunnel. No, she did not wish to repeat that experience. The more she 

thought over it, the more disagreeable and frightening it became. She minded it much more 

now than at the time. The crush and the smells she could forget, but the echo began in some 

indescribable way to undermine her hold on life. Coming at a moment when she chanced to be 

fatigued, it had managed to murmur, "Pathos, piety, courage—they exist, but are 
identical, and 



so is filth. Everything exists, nothing has value." If one had spoken vileness in that place, or 
quoted lofty poetry, the comment would have been the same--" ou-bourn." If one had spoken 
with the tongues of angels and pleaded for all the unhappiness and misunderstanding in the 
world, past, present, and to come, for all the misery men must undergo whatever their opinion 
and position, and however much they dodge or bluff—it would amount to the same, the serpent 
would descend and ret
urn to the ceiling. Devils are of the North, and poems can be written 
about them, but no one could romanticize the Marabar because it robbed infinity and eternity of 
their vastness, the only quality that accommodates them to mankind. 
She tried to go on with her letter, reminding herself that she was only an elderly woman 
who had got up too early in the morning and journeyed too far, that the despair creeping over 
her was merely her despair, her personal weakness, and that even if she got a sunstroke a
nd 
went mad the rest of the world would go on. But suddenly, at the edge of her mind. Religion 
appeared, poor little talkative Christianity, and she knew that all its divine words from "Let there 
be Light" to "It is finished" only amounted to "bourn." Then she was terrified over an area 
larger than usual; the universe, never comprehensible to her intellect, offered no repose to her 
soul, the mood of the last two months took definite form at last, and she realized that she didn't 
want to write to her 
children, didn't want to communicate with anyone, not even with God. She 
sat motionless with horror, and, when old Mohammed Latif came up to her, thought he would 
notice a difference. For a time she thought, "I am going to be ill," to comfort herself, then she 
surrendered to the vision. She lost all interest, even in Aziz, and the affectionate and sincere 
words that she had spoken to him seemed no longer hers but the air's. 
CHAPTER XV 

Miss Quested and Aziz and a guide continued the slightly tedious 
expedition. They did not 
talk much, for the sun was getting high. The air felt like a warm bath into which hotter water is 
trickling constantly, the temperature rose and rose, the boulders said, "I am alive," the small 
stones answered, "I am almost alive." Between the chinks lay the ashes of little plants. They 
meant to climb to the rocking-stone on the summit, but it was too far, and they contented 
themselves with the big group of caves. En route_ for these, they encountered several isolated 
caves, 
which the guide persuaded them to visit, but really there was nothing to see; they lit a 
match, admired its refiection in the polish, tested the echo and came out again. Aziz was "pretty 
sure they should come on some interesting old carvings soon," but only meant he wished there 
were some carvings. His deeper thoughts were about the breakfast. Symptoms of disorganization 
had appeared as he left the camp. He ran over the menu: an English breakfast, porridge 
and mutton chops, but some Indian dishes to c
ause conversation, and pan afterwards. He had 
never liked Miss Quested as much as Mrs. Moore, and had little to say to her, less than ever 
now that she would marry a British official. 

Nor had Adela much to say to him. If his mind was with the breakfast, hers was mainly with 
her marriage. Simla next week, get rid of Antony, a view of Thibet, tiresome wedding bells, 
Agra in October, see Mrs. Moore comfortably off from Bombay —the procession passed before 
her again, blurred by the heat, and then she 
turned to the more serious business of her life at 
Chandrapore. There were real difficulties here—Ronny's limitations and her own—but she enjoyed 
facing difficulties, and decided that if she could control her peevishness (always her weak 
point), and neither rail against Anglo-India nor succumb to it, their married life ought to be 
happy and profitable. She mustn't be too theoretical; she would deal with each problem as it 
came up, and trust to Ronny's common sense and her own. Luckily, each had ab
undance of 
common sense and good will. 

But as she toiled over a rock that resembled an inverted saucer, she thought, "What about 
love?" The rock was nicked by a double row of footholds, and somehow the question was suggested 
by them. Where had she seen footholds before? Oh yes, they were the pattern traced in 
the dust by the wheels of the Nawab Bahadur's car. She and Ronny— no, they did not love each 
other. 
"Do I take you too fast?" enquired Aziz, for she had paused, a doubtful expression on her 




face. The discovery had come so suddenly that she felt like a mountaineer whose rope had broken. 

Not to love the man one's going to marry! Not to find it out till this moment! Not even to 

have asked oneself the question until now! Something else to think out. Vexed rather than appalled, 

she stood still, her eyes on the sparkling rock. There was esteem and animal contact at 

dusk, but the emotion that links them was absent. Ought she to break her engagement off? 

She was inclined to think not—
it would cause so much trouble to others; besides, she wasn't 

convinced that love is necessary to a successful union. If love is everything, few marriages 

would survive the honeymoon. "No, I'm all right, thanks," she said, and, her emotions well under 

control, resumed the climb, though she felt a bit dashed. Aziz held her hand, the guide adhered 

to the surface like a lizard and scampered about as if governed by a personal centre of 

gravity. 

"Are you married. Dr. Aziz?" she asked, stopping again
, and frowning. 

"Yes, indeed, do come and see my wife "--for he felt it more artistic to have his wife alive for 

a moment. 

"Thank you," she said absently. 

"She is not in Chandrapore just now." 

"And have you children?" 

"Yes, indeed, three," he replied in firmer tones. 

"Are they a great pleasure to you?" 

"Why, naturally, I adore them," he laughed. 

"I suppose so." What a handsome little Oriental he was, and no doubt his wife and children 

were beautiful too, for people usually get what they
 already possess. She did not admire him 

with any personal warmth, for there was nothing of the vagrant in her blood, but she guessed 

he might attract women of his own race and rank, and she regretted that neither she nor Ronny 

had physical charm. It does make a difference in a relationship—beauty, thick hair, a fine skin. 

Probably this man had several wives— Mohammedans always insist on their full four, according 

to Mrs. Turton. And having no one else to speak to on that eternal rock, she ga
ve rein to the 

subject of marriage and said in her honest, decent, inquisitive way: "Have you one wife or more 

than one?" 

The question shocked the young man very much. It challenged a new conviction of his 

community, and new convictions are more sensitive than old. If she had said, "Do you worship 

one god or several?" he would not have objected. But to ask an educated Indian Moslem how 

many wives he has— appalling, hideous! He was in trouble how to conceal his confusion. "One, 

one in my own
 particular case," he sputtered, and let go of her hand. Quite a number of caves 

were at the top of the track, and thinking, "Damn the English even at their best," he plunged 

into one of them to recover his balance. She followed at her leisure, quite unconscious that she 

had said the wrong thing, and not seeing him, she also went into a cave, thinking with half her 

mind "sight-seeing bores me," and wondering with the other half about marriage. 

CHAPTER XVI 

He waited in his cave a minute, and lit
 a cigarette, so that he could remark on rejoining her, 

"I bolted in to get out of the draught," or something of the sort. When he returned, he found 

the guide, alone, with his head on one side. He had heard a noise, he said, and then Aziz heard 

it too: the noise of a motor-car. They were now on the outer shoulder of the Kawa Dol, and by 

scrambling twenty yards they got a glimpse of the plain. A car was coming towards the hills 

down the Chandrapore road. But they could not get a good view of it, 
because the precipitous 

bastion curved at the top, so that the base was not easily seen and the car disappeared as it 

came nearer. No doubt it would stop almost exactly beneath them, at the place where the 

pukka road degenerated into a path, and the elephant had turned to sidle into the hills. 

He ran back to tell the strange news to his guest. 

The guide explained that she had gone into a cave. 

"Which cave?" 

He indicated the group vaguely. 



"You should have kept her in sight, it was your du
ty," said Aziz severely. "Here are twelve 
caves at least. How am I to know which contains my guest? Which is the cave I was in myself? 

The same vague gesture. And Aziz, looking again, could not even be sure he had returned 
to the same group. Caves appeared in every direction—it seemed their original spawning place— 
and the orifices were always the same size. He thought, "Merciful Heavens, Miss Quested is 
lost," then pulled himself together, and began to look for her calmly. 
"Shout!" he commanded
. 

When they had done this for awhile, the guide explained that to shout is useless, because a 
Marabar cave can hear no sound but its own. Aziz wiped his head, and sweat began to stream 
inside his clothes. The place was so confusing; it was partly a terrace, partly a zigzag, and full 
of grooves that led this way and that like snaketracks. He tried to go into every one, but he 
never knew where he had started. Caves got behind caves or confabulated in pairs, and some 
were at the entrance of a gully. 


"Come here!" he called gently, and when the guide was in reach, he struck him in the face 
for a punishment. The man fled, and he was left alone. He thought, "This is the end of my career, 
my guest is lost." And then he discovered the simple and sufficient explanation of the mystery. 
Miss Quested wasn't lost. She had joined the people in the car—friends of hers, no doubt, 
Mr. Heaslop perhaps. He had a sudden glimpse of her, far down the gully— only a glimpse, but 
there she was quite plain, framed b
etween rocks, and speaking to another lady. He was so relieved 
that he did not think her conduct odd. Accustomed to sudden changes of plan, he supposed 
that she had run down the Kawa Do! impulsively, in the hope of a little drive. He started 
back alone towards his camp, and almost at once caught sight of something which would have 
disquieted him very much a moment before: Miss Quested's field glasses. They were lying at 
the verge of a cave, half-way down an entrance tunnel. He tried to hang them over 
his shoulder, 
but the leather strap had broken, so he put them into his pocket instead. When he had 
gone a few steps, he thought she might have dropped something else, so he went back to look. 
But the previous difficulty recurred: he couldn't identify the cave. Down in the plain he heard 
the car starting; however, he couldn't catch a second glimpse of that. So he scrambled down 
the valley-face of the hill towards Mrs. Moore, and here he was more successful: the colour and 
confusion of his little camp
 soon appeared, and in the midst of it he saw an Englishman's topi, 
and beneath it— oh, joy !— smiled not Mr. Heaslop, but Fieldlug. 
"Fielding! Oh, I have so wanted you!" he cried, dropping the "Mr." for the first time. 
And his friend ran to meet him, all so pleasant and jolly, no dignity, shouting explanations 
and apologies about the train. Fielding had come in the newly arrived car— Miss Derek's ear- 
that other lady was Miss Derek. Chatter, chatter, all the servants leaving their cooking to li
sten. 
Excellent Miss Derek! She had met Fielding by chance at the post office, said, "Why haven't you 
gone to the Marabar?" heard how he missed the train, offered to run him there and then. Another 
nice English lady. Where was she? Left with car and chauffeur while Fielding found camp. 
Car couldn't get up— no, of course not— hundreds of people must go down to escort Miss Derek 
and show her the way. The elephant in person. . . . 
"Aziz, can I have a drink?" 
"Certainly not." He flew to get one. 

"
Mr. Fielding! " called Mrs. Moore, from her patch of shade; they had not spoken yet, because 
his arrival had coincided with the torrent from the hill. 
"Good morning again!" he cried, relieved to find all well. 
"Mr. Fielding, have you seen Miss Quested?" 
"But I've only just arrived. Where is she?" 
"I do not know." 

"Aziz! Where have you put Miss Quested to?" 

Aziz, who was returning with a drink in his hand, had to think for a moment. His heart was 
full of new happiness. The picnic, after a nasty sh
ock or two, had developed into something beyond 



his dreams, for Fielding had not only come, but brought an uninvited guest. "Oh, she's all 

right," he said; "she went down to see Miss Derek. Well, here's luck! Chin-chin!" 

"Here's luck, but chin-chin I do refuse," laughed Fielding, who detested the phrase. " Here's 

to India!" 

"Here's luck, and here's to England!" 

Miss Derek's chauffeur stopped the cavalcade which was starting to escort his mistress up, 

and informed it that she had gone back w
ith the other young lady to Chandrapore; she had 

sent him to say so. She was driving herself 

"Oh yes, that's quite likely," said Aziz. "I knew they'd gone for a spin." 

"Chandrapore? The man's made a mistake," Fielding exclaimed. 

"Oh no, why?" He was disappointed, but made light of it; no doubt the two young ladies 

were great friends. He would prefer to give breakfast to all four; still, guests must do as they 

wish, or they become prisoners. He went away cheerfully to inspect the porridge and th
e ice. 

"What's happened?" asked Fielding, who felt at once that something had gone queer. All the 

way out Miss Derek had chattered about the picnic, called it an unexpected treat, and said that 

she preferred Indians who didn't invite her to their entertainments to those who did it. Mrs. 

Moore sat swinging her foot, and appeared sulky and stupid. She said: " Miss Derek is most 

unsatisfactory 

and restless, always in a hurry, always wanting something new; she will do anything 

in the world except
 go back to the Indian lady who pays her." 

Fielding, who didn't dislike Miss Derek, replied: "She wasn't in a hurry when I left her. There 

was no question of returning to Chandrapore. It looks to me as if Miss Quested's in the hurry." 

"Adela ?~she's never been in a hurry in her life," said the old lady sharply. 

"I say it'll prove to be Miss Quested's wish, in fact I know it is," persisted the schoolmaster. 

He was annoyed—chiefly with himself He had begun by missing a train—a sin he was never 


guilty of— and now that he did arrive it was to upset Aziz' arrangements for the second time. He 

wanted someone to share the blame, and frowned at Mrs. Moore rather magisterially. "Aziz is a 

charming fellow," he announced. 

"I know," she answered, with a yawn. 

"He has taken endless trouble to make a success of our picnic." 

They knew one another very little, and felt rather awkward at being drawn together by an 

Indian. The racial problem can take subtle forms. In their case it had induced a s
ort of jealousy, 

a mutual suspicion. He tried to goad her enthusiasm; she scarcely spoke. Aziz fetched them to 

breakfast. 

"It is quite natural about Miss Quested," he remarked, for he had been working the incident 

a little in his mind, to get rid of its roughnesses. "We were having an interesting talk with our 

guide, then the car was seen, so she decided to go down to her friend." Incurably inaccurate, 

he already thought that this was what had occurred. He was inaccurate because he was sensitiv
e. 

He did not like to remember Miss Quested's remark about polygamy, because it was unworthy 

of a guest, so he put it from his mind, and with it the knowledge that he had bolted into 

a cave to get away from her. He was inaccurate because he desired to honour her, and— facts 

being entangled— he had to arrange them in her vicinity, as one tidies the ground after extracting 

a weed. Before breakfast was over, he had told a good many lies. "She ran to her friend, I 

to mine," he went on, smiling.
 "And now I am with my friends and they are with me and each 

other, which is happiness." 

Loving them both, he expected them to love each other. They didn't want to. Fielding 

thought with hostility, "I knew these women would make trouble," and Mrs. Moore thought, 

"This man, having missed the train, tries to blame us"; but her thoughts were feeble; since her 

faintness in the cave she was sunk in apathy and cynicism. The wonderful India of her opening 

weeks, with its cool nights and acceptable hin
ts of infinity, had vanished. 

Fielding ran up to see one cave. He wasn't impressed. Then they got on the elephant and 

the picnic began to unwind out of the corridor and escaped under the precipice towards the 



railway station, pursued by stabs of hot air. They came to the place where he had quitted the 

car. A disagreeable thought now struck him, and he said: "Aziz, exactly where and how did you 

leave Miss Quested?" 

"Up there." He indicated the Kawa Dol cheerfully. 

"But how--" A gully, or rat
her a crease, showed among the rocks at this place; it was scurfy 

with cactuses. "I suppose the guide helped her." 

"Oh, rather, most helpful." 

"Is there a path off the top?" 

"Millions of paths, my dear fellow." 

Fielding could see nothing but the crease. Everywhere else the glaring granite plunged into 

the earth. 

"But you saw them get down safe?" 

"Yes, yes, she and Miss Derek, and go off in the car." 

"Then the guide came back to you?" 

"Exactly. Got a cigarette?" 

"I hope she wasn't ill,
" pursued the Englishman. The crease continued as a nullah across the 

plain, the water draining off this way towards the Ganges. 

"She would have wanted me, if she was ill, to attend her." 

"Yes, that sounds sense." 

"I see you're worrying, let's talk of other things," he said kindly. "Miss Quested was always 

to do what she wished, it was our arrangement. I see you are worrying on my account, but 

really I don't mind, I never notice trifles." 

"I do worry on your account. I consider they have been
 impolite! " said Fielding, lowering his 

voice. "She had no right to dash away from your party, and Miss Derek had no right to abet 

her." 

So touchy as a rule, Aziz was unassailable. The wings that uplifted him did not falter, because 

he was a Mogul emperor who had done his duty. Perched on his elephant, he watched 

the Marabar Hills recede, and saw again, as provinces of his kingdom, the grim untidy plain, the 

frantic and feeble movements of the buckets, the white shrines, the shallow graves, th
e suave 

sky, the snake that looked like a tree. He had given his guests as good a time as he could, and 

if they came late or left early that was not his affair. Mrs. Moore slept, swaying against the rods 

of the howdah, Mohammed Latif embraced her with efficiency and respect, and by his own side 

sat Fielding, whom he began to think of as "Cyril." 

"Aziz, have you figured out what this picnic will cost you?" 

"Sh! my dear chap, don't mention that part. Hundreds and hundreds of rupees. The completed
 

account will be too awful; my friends' servants have robbed me right and left, and as for 

an elephant, she apparently eats gold. I can trust you not to repeat this. And M.L.~ please employ 

initials, he listens—is far the worst of all." 

"I told you he's no good." 

"He is plenty of good for himself; his dishonesty will ruin me." 

"Aziz, how monstrous!" 

"I am delighted with him really, he has made my guests comfortable; besides, it is my duty 

to employ him, he is my cousin. If money goes, mon
ey comes. If money stays, death comes. 

Did you ever hear that useful Urdu proverb? Probably not, for I have just invented it." 

"My proverbs are: A penny saved is a penny earned; A stitch in time saves nine; Look before 

you leap; and the British Empire rests on them. You will never kick us out, you know, until you 

cease employing M.L.'s and such." 

"Oh, kick you out? Why should I trouble over that dirty job? Leave it to the politicians. . . . 

No, when I was a student I got excited over your damne
d countrymen, certainly; but if they'll 

let me get on with my profession and not be too rude to me officially, I really don't ask for 

more." 

"But you do; you take them to a picnic." 



"This picnic is nothing to do with Enghsh or Indian; it is an expedition of friends." 

So the cavalcade ended, partly pleasant, partly not; the Brahman cook was picked up, the 

train arrived, pushing its burning throat over the plain, and the twentieth century took over 

from the sixteenth. Mrs. Moore entered her c
arriage, the three men went to theirs, adjusted the 

shutters, turned on the electric fan and tried to get some sleep. In the twilight, all resembled 

corpses, and the train itself seemed dead though it moved—a coffin from the scientific north 

which troubled the scenery four times a day. As it left the Marabars, their nasty little cosmos 

disappeared, and gave place to the Marabars seen from a distance, finite and rather romantic. 

The train halted once under a pump, to drench the stock of coal in 
its tender. Then it caught 

sight of the main line in the distance, took courage, and bumped forward, rounded the civil station, 

surmounted the level-crossing (the rails were scorching now), and clanked to a standstill. 

Chandrapore, Chandrapore! The expedition was over. 

And as it ended, as they sat up in the gloom and prepared to enter ordinary life, suddenly 

the long drawn strangeness of the morning snapped. Mr. Haq, the Inspector of Police, flung 

open the door of their carriage and said in shr
ill tones: "Dr. Aziz, it is my highly painful duty to 

arrest you." 

"Hullo, some mistake," said Fielding, at once taking charge of the situation. 

"Sir, they are my instructions. I know nothing." 

"On what charge do you arrest him?" 

"I am under instructions not to say." 

"Don't answer me like that. Produce your warrant." 

"Sir, excuse me, no warrant is required under these particular circumstances. Refer to Mr. 

McBryde." 

"Very well, so we will. Come along, Aziz, old man; nothing to fuss about,
 some blunder." 

"Dr. Aziz, will you kindly come ?~a closed conveyance stands in readiness." 

The young man sobbed—his first sound— and tried to escape out of the opposite door on to 

the line. 

"That will compel me to use force," Mr. Haq wailed. 

"Oh, for God's sake—" cried Fielding, his own nerves breaking under the contagion, and 

pulled him back before a scandal started, and shook him like a baby. A second later, and he 

would have been out, whistles blowing, a man-hunt. . . . "Dear fellow
, we're coming to McBryde 

together, and enquire what's gone wrong— he's a decent fellow, it's all unintentional . . . he'll 

apologize. Never, never act the criminal." 

"My children and my name!" he gasped, his wings broken. 

"Nothing of the sort. Put your hat straight and take my arm. I'll see you through." 

"Ah, thank God, he comes," the Inspector exclaimed. 

They emerged into the midday heat, arm in arm. The station was seething. Passengers and 

porters rushed out of every recess, many Governm
ent servants, more police. Ronny escorted 

Mrs. Moore. Mohammed Latif began wailing. And before they could make their way through the 

chaos. Fielding was called off by the authoritative tones of Mr. Turton, and Aziz went on to 

prison alone. 

CHAPTER XVII 

The Collector had watched the arrest from the interior of the waiting-room, and throwing 

open its perforated doors of zinc, he was now revealed like a god in a shrine. When Fielding 

entered the doors clapped to, and were guarded by a servant, w
hile a punkah, to mark the 

importance 

of the moment, flapped dirty petticoats over their heads. The Collector could not 

speak at first. His face was white, fanatical, and rather beautiful— the expression that all English 

faces were to wear at Chandrapore for many days. Always brave and unselfish, he was now 

fused by some white and generous heat; he would have killed himself, obviously, if he had 

thought it right to do so. He spoke at last. "The worst thing in my whole career has happened," 


he said. "Miss Quested has been insulted in one of the Marabar caves." 



"Oh no, oh no, no," gasped the other, feeling sickish. 

"She escaped—by God's grace." 

"Oh no, no, but not Aziz . . . not Aziz ..." 

He nodded. 

"Absolutely impossible, grotesque." 

"I called you to preserve you from the odium that would attach to you if you were seen 

accompanying 

him to the Police Station," said Turton, paying no attention to his protest, indeed 

scarcely hearing it. 

He repeated "Oh no," like a fool. 
He couldn't frame other words. He felt that a mass of 

madness had arisen and tried to overwhelm them all; it had to be shoved back into its pit 

somehow, and he didn't know how to do it, because he did not understand madness: he had 

always gone about sensibly and quietly until a difficulty came right. "Who lodges this infamous 

charge?" he asked, pulling himself together. 

"Miss Derek and—the victim herself ..." He nearly broke down, unable to repeat the girl's 

name. 

"Miss Quested herself defi
nitely accuses him of—" 

He nodded and turned his face away. 

"Then she's mad." 

"I cannot pass that last remark," said the Collector, waking up to the knowledge that they 

differed, and trembling with fury. "You will withdraw it instantly. It is the type of remark you 

have permitted yourself to make ever since you came to Chandrapore." 

"I'm excessively sorry, sir; I certainly withdraw it unconditionally." For the man was half mad 

himself. 

"Pray, Mr. Fielding, what induced you to speak to me 
in such a tone?" 

"The news gave me a very great shock, so I must ask you to forgive me. I cannot believe 

that Dr. Aziz is guilty." 

He slammed his hand on the table. "That— that is a repetition of your insult in an aggravated 

form." 

"If I may venture to say so, no," said Fielding, also going white, but sticking to his point. "I 

make no reflection on the good faith of the two ladies, but the charge they are bringing against 

Aziz rests upon some mistake, and five minutes will clear it up. The 
man's manner is perfectly 

natural; besides, I know him to be incapable of infamy." 

"It does indeed rest upon a mistake," came the thin, biting voice of the other. "It does indeed. 

I have had twenty-five years' experience of this country "—he paused, and "twenty -five 

years" seemed to fill the waiting-room with their staleness and ungenerosity— " and during those 

twenty-five years I have never known anything but disaster result when English people and Indians 

attempt to be intimate socially.
 Intercourse, yes. Courtesy, by all means. Intimacy— never, 

never. The whole weight of my authority is against it. I have been in charge at Chandrapore for 

six years, and if everything has gone smoothly, if there has been mutual respect and esteem, it 

is because both peoples kept to this simple rule. New-comers set our traditions aside, and in an 

instant what you see happens, the work of years is undone and the good name of my District 

ruined for a generation. I— I — can't see the end of th
is day's work, Mr. Fielding. You, who are 

imbued with modern ideas— no doubt you can. I wish I had never lived to see its beginning, I 

know that. It is the end of me. That a lady, that a young lady engaged to my most valued 

subordinate— that she— an English girl fresh from England— that I should have lived—" 

Involved in his own emotions, he broke down. What he had said was both dignified and pathetic, 

but had it anything to do with Aziz? Nothing at all, if Fielding was right. It is impo
